
HP 1-Harry Potter
The magic stone
Harry Potter and the magic stone
Harry Potter
and
the magic stone
Joan K. Rowling
HP 1-Harry Potter
The magic stone
HEAD FIRST
The boy who survived
Mr. R. And Mrs. Dursley of House Number Four on Tisova Street
if thIecyawneprreoucodmlypslaeytely normal, thank you very much. They were the last
people from whom
you can expect them to be involved in something strange or
mysterious, because they are simply
they do not accept such nonsense.
Mr. Dursley was a director of a firm called Grunnings, which
produced
drills. It was a large, bullied man, who was almost not
the door, although he had
very big moustache. Mrs. Dursley is a slim blonde, and she's almost two
times more
from the ordinary circumference of the neck, which proved to be very useful, because it is
spent so much
time, traveling through garden fences, your children from spying
for the neighbors. The Dursley bio
a little son, named Dudley, and, in their opinion, the best boy
it was nowhere.
In Dursley was everything they wanted, but they were also secret, and
their biggest fear was whether anyone discovered it. They thought that
it won't do if anyone knows about Potterah. Mrs. Potter was a sister. Ma'am
Dursley, but they had not met for several years; in fact, Mrs. Dursley
she said she didn't have a sister because she was her sister and her sister.
my husband was as unruly as possible. Dursley
sodrognulis
when he thinks about what the neighbors would say, if Potters showed up on
streets.
Dursley knew that Potter for, too, was a little son, but they never even
they didn't see him. This boy was another reason to keep Potter
further; they are
they wanted Dudley to talk to such a child.
When Mr. and Mrs. Dursley awoke to a dull, grey Tuesday,
of which
our story begins, in the cloud the sky outside the window there was nothing, which
it makes sense that it is Strange and
mysterious things will soon be over all over the country. Mr.
Dursley
hummed, choosing his most boring tie to work with, and Mrs. Dursley
None of them noticed a large yellow-brown owl, flying
by the window.
joyfully entwined, as she instilled the weapon of Dowling at his high
chair.
In the middle of the ninth Mr. Dursley took his portfolio, stumped
Mrs.
Dursley in the cheek and tried to kiss Dudley goodbye, but missed it because
now he's hysterical and he's stuck in the wall.
"Little baby," snorted Mr. Dursley, leaving home. He sat in
andymouorveodwnbaccakrwards with access to the fourth house trail.
It was on the corner of the street he noticed the first sign that
something unusual-a cat, reading a map. Within a few seconds, Mr.
Dursley
was, what he saw — - then, he abruptly turned his head, to see once more.
On the corner of Tisovo Street
there was a cat, but
the field of view was not a card. What could he think of? You should
bud, it's a game.
lights. Mr. Dursley blinks, and stares at the cat. She set up on
his answer. When Mr. Dursley
turning the corner, and marching on the road, he looked for the cat in the mirror.
Now he reads a sign with the inscription " Biryuchinovy travel — - no, he looked at
sign; cats
they can't read cards or threesomes. Mr. Dursley is a little wary and
bacio
cat in the head. On the way to the city he thought of Nothing, beside
great order on the drill, which is hoping to be in this day.
But on the outskirts of the city the drills were driven out of their heads by something
others. Standing in regular morning traffic, he couldn't help but
I notice that
the eye seemed, there were a lot of strangely dressed people. Men in coats. Mr.
Dursley could not stand the men, who were dressed in funny clothes —
the clothes you wear
look at the young people! He suggested it was some stupid new fashion. He
zabarabanil fingers on the rudder, and his gaze fell on a bunch of these
weirdo, standing nearby. They are excited about each other. Mr.
Dursley came into a rage, seeing that the two of them were not young; but on
in the end, this
the man was supposed to be older than him and wear an emerald green robe!
And the courage of him! But then Mr. Dursley remembered that it was
he was probably a stupid
trick's people obviously raised money for something ... Yes, that would be
exactly. The movement continued, and a few minutes later
Dursley
parking "Grannings", again focusing on drelya.
Mr. Dursley always sat with his back to the window in his
the Office of the
ninth floor. If he didn't do it, he might, it would be harder to get
focus on training
in the morning. He didn't see the Owls, the speeding rides of the past in broad daylight,
although
people down in the street saw; they pointed and looked, by opening their mouth,
when one
the owl for the other passed over the head. Most of them have never seen
owl even at night. With Mr.
Dursley, however, was a completely normal morning without an owl. He wrote on
pet
different people. He made several important phone calls and
a little more poor
. He was in a very good mood until dinner, when he decided to
stretch
feet and jump across the street, to buy himself a bun at the bakery.
He knew all about men in coats, until he passed the group
near the bakery. Walking by, he looked angrily at them. He
he did not know
why, but they care about him. The company is also excited
perishepta, and
he hasn't seen a single one to collect donations. Passing
next to them on the road,
squeezing in his hand a large doughnut in a package, he caught a few words from
what they are
talking.
"Potter, that's true, that's what I heard ..."
"... that's their son, Harry..." Mr. Dursley stopped as if on my way. Overwhelmed him with fear. He is
shephteulnooovk,eadsaitf he wanted to tell them something, but changed his mind.
He rushed back across the street, rushed to his office, barked
secretary, that she was not broken, grabbed the phone and almost finished
they recruit their house number when they change their mind. He put the phone back.
and smoothed the moustache, thinking...but he was acting stupid. Potter
it wasn't such an unusual name. He was sure that there were many
Potter,
he had a son named Harry. If you think, he wasn't even sure that
his niece
the name's Harry. He had never even seen the boy. It could have been Harvey.
Or
Harold. There was no point in bothering Mrs. Dursley; she was always so
rastraivalas
any mention of your sister. He did not vinyl her — if he had such a
sister...
But still, these men in coats....
That day it is much harder for him to focus on training, and when
he left the building at Five O'clock, and was still so delighted that he
hit someone right behind the door.
"I'm sorry ," said grunjali, when the little old man tripped and almost
fell. It has passed
a few seconds before Mr. Dursley realized that the man was
dressed in purple
cloak. He seems to be a little sad about it, so that he doesn't get knocked down by something.
leg.
On the contrary, his face burst into a wide smile, and he said
the voice, which is
"don't apologize, my dear sir, today."
nothing can harm me!
Be glad, because you know who left in the end! They are maggots, just like you.
let's celebrate this happy, glorious day!"
And the old man hugged Mr. Dursley around his waist and left. Mr. Dursley stood in my way. She accepted it completely.
unknown person. He also meant to call it a Maggle, whatever that
meant it. He is
he was shocked. He rushed in his car and drove home, hoping to
MU mereshtsi
things he had never hoped for before, for he had not approved
imagination. When he entered the yard path to house number four, the first thing he
video —
and it did not improve his mood, - was a striped cat, which he
noticed in the morning. She
now he sits on the wall of his garden. He was sure it was the same animal.;
they are with him
same marks around the eyes.
"Shoo!"said Mr. Dursley loudly.
The cat did not pass. He just threw a cruel look at him. Is that
behnaovrmal basketball ior? Mr. Dursley in mind. Trying to get together, he is
he entered
in thMerHs ouse. He was still determined not to mention anything to his wife. . Dursley's had a good day. At dinner, she told him.
all
about Mrs. problem neighbors with daughter and then, like Dudley
he learned a new word ("I will not!"). Mr. Dursley tried to behave
normal. When Dudley
was put to bed, he went out into the living room in time to catch
latest report
in the Evening News:
"And finally, ornithologists around the world reported that,
the owl of the Earth behaved very unusual today. Although owls usually hunt
at night and that they are almost never visible in daylight, with Dawn they are
hundreds of times, when
these birds flew in all directions. Experts cannot
explain why owls suddenly changed their sleep regime."
The leader allowed himself to laugh. "Very mysterious. And now yes
let's move on to Jim
Makgaffin's weather forecast. There will be more showers tonight.
Owls,
Jim?
"Well, Ted," said the meteorologist, " I don't know what it is, but no
only the Owls behaved strangely today. People who are so far away
others like Kent.,
Yorkshire and Dundee, rang to report that instead of rain, which I
yesterday, we had a blast from a falling star! Maybe people
early celebrated the night of the campfire - it's just going to happen next
Sunday, boys! Ali
I can promise a rainy night tonight." Mr. Dursley carried out in his chair. The stars fall all over
Great Britain?
Owls fly in daylight? All the mysterious men in coats? And
whiMsper, whisper about Potterah.... rs. Dursley entered the living room with two glasses of tea. It was
useless. He had to tell her something. He nodded nervously. "Uh
... Petunia, dear, you haven't heard anything about your sister lately,
righAt?"s expected, Mrs. Dursley looked shocked and
shesiesrudsituoayl.lyIndethtaeineendd,without a sister.
"No," she said sharply. "Why?"
"Funny material in the news," muttered Mr. Dursley. "Owls ...
staruss..i.ntghere were a lot of funny people in town today...."
"And what?"Mrs. Dursley is dead.
"Well, I just thought......maybe it has something to do with you...
you know...his company."
Mrs. Dursley slipped her tea, lured her lips. Mr. Dursley asked
would he have dared to tell her that if he'd heard the name "Potter"? He decided to
no
he dares. Instead, he said so carelessly, as I could, " their
his son was now
as many years as Dudley, right?"
"I suppose so," said Mrs. Dursley stiffly.
"Again, what's his name? Howard, right?"
"Harry. Will, common name, if you want to know my opinion."
"Oh, yes," said Mr. Dursley, and his heart fell terribly. "Yes,
I am quite
I agree."
He did not say a word on this subject, as they rose to the stairs to go into
bed. While Mrs. Dursley was in the bathroom, Mr. Dursley pulled up to
the bedroom window and looked into the garden in front of the House. The cat was still
there. It
he looked at the airport as if he was waiting for something.
Surprised him? Could it have anything to do with
Potter? If that were to happen ... If they knew they were connected
steam... Well, he's not
thouDguht you could handle it. rsley went to bed. Mrs. Dursley quickly fell asleep, but Mr.
Dursley lies awake, moving through it all in sight. His last,
comforting thoughts
before he fell asleep, it was that even if the Potters were involved, they were not
they had
reasons to come to him and Mrs. Dursley. The Potters knew very well.
, that he and Petunia think of them and them alike....He could not have
understand how it is
and Petunia could be entangled in whatever it was, which could have been
desi-on
yavned and rolled over to the other side-it can not affect them ....
How right he was. Mr. Dursley, perhaps, and plunged into a restless sleep, but the cat
the wall outside showed no signs of drowsiness. He was sitting
impermanent, as
the statue, the eyes, without blinking, were pointed at the far corner of the Yew Tree.
streets. He doesn't even
not when the door of the machine collapsed on the next street, not when
two owls
passed over the head. In fact, it was almost midnight, before the cat
at all, you suck.
On the corner, behind which the cat was looking, a man appeared, so
he was suddenly and quietly, if he thought he'd just fallen out of the ground.
The cat's tail twitches, and the eyes twitches.
Nothing like this man has ever been seen on Tisovo Street. He
he was high,
thin and very old, judging by the Silver of his hair and beard, which were
long enough to close the belt. On it are long dresses, purple
cloak,
it flows to the ground, and high-heeled boots with boots. His blue
eyes are bright,
bright and sparkling for glasses-half-glasses, and the nose was very long
and dishonest, as if he had pierced it at least twice. This man was
Albus Dumbledore.
Albus Dumbledore, it seemed, did not know that he had just arrived at the
the street, where everything from his name to his shoes, was undesirable. He was
busy trying to break into his cabin, he's looking for something. But he is,
he seems to understand
to look behind him, because he suddenly raised his eyes on the cat, which is still
he looked at her from across the street. For some reason kind of
the cat, it seemed, dealt with him. he croaked and muttered: "I am
he had to guess." He found what he was looking for, in his inner pocket. Apparently, it was
silver lighter. He clicked it open, lifted it into the air and froze.
The nearest street lantern comes out with black cotton. He shrugged it off even more.
once — next
the lamp is gone, lost in the darkness. Twelve times he threw his switch, while
the only lights left on the entire street do not become two small points in the
the distance, which
the eyes of the cat, staring at him. If anyone would look at my
Windows
now, even Mrs. Dursley with eye-catching businesses, they were unable to
see nothing of what
it happens down on the sidewalk. Dumbledore's thrust blanket back
under his cloak and headed down the street to house number four, where he sat
on the wall next to the cat. He did not look at him, but in a moment
spoke to him.
"Good to see you here, Professor McGonagall."
He turned, to smile the striped cat, but she disappeared. Instead
a rastoh,ehres'hsasrmpiling. look at the woman, who wore square points just
such
the shape that you are a cat around the eyes. He, too, was
cloak, Emerald. Her black hair was collected in a tight bundle.
She looked
it's clear.
"How did you know it was me?"- she asked.
"My dear professor, I have never seen a cat sit like that
hard".
Pro"feWssoourldMtchGeyonbaeghaulln. g up if they sat on the wall all day long," he said. "All day? When Could you celebrate? I should be, is above
ten stops and a party on the way here."
Professor McGonagall angrily frowned.
"Oh, yeah, we're celebrating, everything's fine," she said impatiently. "It could
theytowtohuink, ld be a little more careful, but there is no-even maggly noticed
something's going on. It was in their news." She shook her head
back, to
dark windows in the living room Dursley. "I heard that. A flock of owls ... fall
stars ... well, they're not entirely stupid. They had to notice something.
. The stars are falling in Kent-I bet it was Deadalus Diggle. With him
there was never much common sense."
"You can't blame them," Dumbledore said quietly. "We had
for pelreevceionuysears little reason to celebrate".
"I know that," said Professor McGonagall angrily. "But it is not
reason
to lose his head. People act completely carelessly, leaving on
Street
in the middle of the day, not even dressed in magglove clothes, and Exchange
rumors."
She threw her sharp, oblique gaze at Dumbledore, as if it were
in the hope that he would tell her something, but he did not do it, so she
continued. "It would be good,
if on the same day, when I-you know - which, it seems, finally disappeared
magglas learned about us all. I guess he really left.,
Dumbledore?
"It's definitely like that," Dumbledore said. "We have something
. Dolnet'tuysoubewgarnattelefumlon juice?"
"What?"
"Lemon Lollipop. It's a kind of magglove candy, which I love very much.
".
"No, thank you," replied Professor McGonagall coldly, as if she
she did not
I mean, now it's time for lemon candy. "As I said, even
if I-you know-who
he's"Mgoyndee.a..r" professor, is such a reasonable man, like you, unable to
they call him
name? All this "Sam-you-know — com" nonsense within eleven years
Sam
he tried to convince people to call him by this name: Voldemort". Professor
McGonagall trembles, but Dumbledore, who uncovers two slices of lemon,
apparently, he didn't notice. "Everything becomes so confusing if we continue to
they say, " You Know Yourself."- Who". I've never seen a reason to be afraid to speak
the name of Voldemort."
"I know you're not doing it," said Professor McGonagall, sounding half
angry, half delighted. "But you are different. Everyone knows you are
the only one I-you know-oh, all right, Voldemort, scared.
"I'm sorry," Dumbledore said quietly. "We Voldemort are the forces that
it wIilwl nilelvneortbbee".
"Just because you're too much ... well... blessed to use them."
"What is dark? I've been so hard not to fancy since then, as Madame
sheFsraiiedsshe liked my new headphones."
Professor McGonagall took a sharp look at Dumbledore and said:"
Owls-nothing compared to rumors, which go around. You know what
they say? About why she disappeared? About that, you finally stopped making it?"
It looked like Professor McGonagall would have reached, if she had more than
all
wanted to talk, the real cause, by which the whole
the day devoured on a cold solid wall, for not like a cat, nor a woman, she
she didn't look at Dumbledore that way.
looking forward, as it is now. It was clear, whatever he was saying.,
"everything",
she wouldn't believe it until Dumbledore would tell her it was true.
"They say - she insisted, - that last night Voldemort
appeared in Godric's loщine. He went in search of a posse for. Talker
DifuitmwbelerdeoLriely, however, chose another lemon candy and did not respond.
and James Potter ... yes, they are... the dead."
Dumbledore bowed his head. Professor McGonagall ahnula.
"Lily and James...I can't believe it...I didn't want to believe that...O, Albus..."
Dumbledore reached out and patted him on the shoulder. "I know...I
I know... - hardly said he.
Professor McGonagall's voice shuddered as she continued. "That still
not everything.
They say he tried to kill Potter's son, Harry. But he was not in
condition yes. He
he couldn't have killed this little boy. No one knows why or how, but
they say yes
when he was unable to kill Harry Potter, The Power of Voldemort on some
the way weakened-and
that's why he left."
Dumbledore nodded his head.
"That's — that's true?"hesitant," asked Professor McGonagall.
all t"hAeftpeeroapllle, whheaktilhleedd.i.d..H..e couldn't kill the little boy? It's just
striking ... From
anything that could stop him ... But in the name of all things holy, as Harry is
survived?"
"We can only guess," Dumbledore said. "Maybe never
we will not know."
Professor McGonagall performed laid lace handkerchief and promoted
their own
eyes under the glasses. Dumbledore snorted loudly when he took it out of his pocket
Golden
watch and examine them. These are very strange hours. He has twelve
Sagittarius, but there are no digits; instead, on the edge were moving small
planet. However, it
it must have made sense for Dumbledore, because he put it back in
he said, " Hagrid is late. Among other things, I think he
I told you I'd be here?
"."
"Yes," said Professor McGonagall. "And I don't suppose you will
tell me, why are you here, of all places?"
"I'm here to take Harry to his aunt and uncle. They are the only
whifcahmhiely,now has."
"You have in mind-you can't keep in mind the people who live here?" -
he exclaimed
Professor McGonagall, jumping on his feet and pointing to the number four.
"Dumbledore-you can't. I watched them all day. You couldn't find
two people who look less like us. And they have this son-I've seen how
the Pinal
your mother all the way up the street, demanding candy. Come To Harry Potter
and live here! "
"This is the best place for him," Dumbledore said. "His
aunt and
uncle will be able to explain everything to him when he gets older. I have written
it's their letter." "Letter?"- barely audibly repeated Professor McGonagall, sitting again
on
the wall. "True, Dumbledore, do you think you can explain all this in a letter?
These people will never understand! He will become famous-legend-I
I wouldn't be surprised if in the future today will be known as Dan Harry
Potter —
books will be written about Harry — every child in our world will know
his name!"
"Namely."said Dumbledore, looking very seriously over his
point-half-assed. "That would be enough to wrap the head of any boy.
Known before
learn to walk and talk! It is a familiar topic, about which he does not even remember!
Can you
you see, how much better he is that he will grow away from all this, until he is
ready
to aPcrcoefpetssito?r" McGonagall opens her mouth, changes her mind, shrugs
and then she said, " Yeah-yeah, you're right, of course. As a child he came
here, Dumbledore?"She suddenly looked at his cloak, as if he thought
that he can
he hid under Harry.
"Hagrid will do it."
"You mean, it's reasonable to-to entrust Hagrid with something so important, as
that?"
"I would entrust Hagrid with my life," Dumbledore said.
"I'm not saying, that he had a heart out of place," - reluctantly said
McGporonfaegsasollr, " but you can't pretend you're not roasted. He really is
Slon
yeaAh .l.o.uWdhnaotisweabsrtohkaet?the silence around them. The sound has become
always louder, as they searched the street in search of some sign
the light of the headlights; he grew into a roar, when they both looked up into the sky - and
veliki
the motorcycle flew out of the air and landed in front of them. If the engine was huge, then it was for the man, the one sitting on it
with faces, it doesn't mean anything.
He was almost twice above the common man and at least five times wider.
He is
looked too big that it was allowed, and so wild-long matte
black
hair and beard hid most of his face, his hands were the size of
bin tank covers, and
the feet in the leather shoes were similar to Dolphin Cubs. In his
huge musculistic hands
he held a bunch of blankets.
"Hagrid," Dumbledore said with obvious relief. "Eventually.
youAtnodokwthheartebike?"
"He borrowed Professor Dumbledore's, sir," - said the giant,
careful with the motorcycle in these words. "Young Sirius Black
he lent it to me. I
got him, Sir. "No problem, wasn't it?"
"No, sir-the house was almost destroyed, but I pulled it out on
Magtigmlye,bbeegfaonretothsewarm around. He fell asleep when we flew over
Bristol.
Dumbledore is also Professor McGonagall bent over svertka
blankets. Inside, barely visible, tightly sleeping little boy. Under the air coalblack hair on his forehead seen a cut of bizarre shapes, as
hit
Thunder. "Is that there?.."- whispered Professor McGonagall.
"Yes," said Dumbledore. "He will be this scar forever."
"Could you do something with this Dumbledore?"
"Even if I could, I wouldn't. Scars can be useful. Imam
there is such a
above the left knee, which is the ideal map of the London metro. PA,
giveDiutmhebre, Hagrid-that we better get rid of this." ledore picked up Harry on his hands and turned to Dursley's House.
. "May I, may I say goodbye to him, Sir?"asked Hagrid.
He threw his
a huge lohmatt head above Harry and confided in her, it must be, very much
prickly kiss with bristles. Then, suddenly, Hagrid howled, as
wounded
dog.
"Sh-sh-sh!"- passed Professor McGonagall, " you're awake
magglow!"
"With-with-forgiveness", - vshlipnul Hagrid, taking out a large handkerchief placidly
and
put it in her face. "But I'm n-n-I can't stand-Lily and
James is dead and poor.
littl"eYHesa,ryryesi,sifto'srcaelldvteorylivseadw,ibthutt,hgeemt iatgtgolgaesth..e."r, Hagrid, or US
will find, " - whispered Professor McGonagall, gently patting Hagrid in
hands, when
Dumbledore stepped through the low garden fence and headed for the door. He is
gently Harry on the threshold, took out from under his cloak a letter, stuck under the floor
blanket Harry and then went back to the two others. The whole minute
the three of us stood and watched a small bundle; the shoulders of Hagrid
zatrяслись,
Professor McGonagall ferociously tedious, and flickering light, which
usually
it came from the eyes of Dumbledore, it seemed extinguished.
"Well," finally Dumbledore said, " that's all. That we have no need to
herest.aWy ith the same success we can go and join the celebration."
"Yes," said Hagrid in a very muffled voice, " I forget his Sirius.
getbbiaccykclaegain. Good night, Professor McGonagall
DumVbylteedreovres,leSeirv.e" jackets watery eyes, Hagrid jump
on the engine and started the engine; with urlik he grew in
air and air at night.
"I hope to see you soon, Professor McGonagall," he said.
Dumbledore nodded his head. Professor McGonagall
ansDwuemr.bledore turned and went back to the street. On the corner he
he stopped and took the silver sheet. He clicked on it once, and
twelve balls
the light rushed back to his street fonaryama, so that Biryuchinová
street suddenly bright orange
and he could see a striped cat, stealing for a corner on another.
end
streets. He could only see a bundle of blankets at House level number
four.
"Good luck, Harry," he muttered. He turned on his heels and
wzmahnuv of his cloak, disappeared.
The breeze shook the neat fence of Biryuchinovoy Street, which lay
quiet and exact
under the Black Sky, which is the last place to be expected
something strange
happens. Harry Potter surrendered under his blankets, without waking up. One
a small handle sat on the letter next to him, and he continued to sleep,
not knowing that he is
special, not knowing that he is famous, not knowing that in a few
hours to wake him up Mrs. Dursley's scream, when she opens the front door, yes
revelation
milk bottles, and for the next few weeks he leads under the offer
and
the children of their cousin Dudley .... He couldn't have known that at this point
people, secretly happening all over the country, hoisted their glasses and
"for Harry Potter-the boy who
survived!"
HP 1-Harry Potter
The magic stone
THE OTHER HEAD
DISAPPEARING GLASS
ten years have passed since then, as Dursley woke up and discovered his
a nephew on the porch, but the Tisova Street almost did not change. Sun
has grown over the same specific palisadnikami and illuminated copper number
four at the door
Dursley; it sprang into his living room, which was almost completely
same as it was that night, when Mr. Dursley saw that
fateful informational
report on the owl. Only the photos on the fireplace really showed
how much time has passed. Ten years ago there were many pictures.
something similar to a large pink beach ball in color schjepkah —
but Dudley Dursley was no longer a child, and now he is in the photos is
shown
big light boy, sitting on his first bike,
ringishpil at the fair, game in
a computer game with his father, who is hugged and kissed by his mother. In
the room at all there was no indication that there was another living in the House
a boy.
However, Harry Potter was still there, at this point he was sleeping.,
but not for long.
His Aunt Petunia woke up, and it was her piercing voice that produced the first
noise
for this day.
"Get up! Get up! Now!"
Harry, woken up. His mother knocked on the door again.
"Get up!"- shrieked her. Harry heard him go into the kitchen, and
then the sound of the dishes, which he puts on the stove. He was lying on his back
I tried to remember the dream he had. He was good.
He had a flying bicycle in him. He had a strange feeling that
he had the same dream before.
His aunt is behind the door again.
"Are you up yet?"requested, she asked.
"It's over," Harry said.
"Well, hurry up, I want to watch you for bacon. And that you are not
daudio don't you dare let it burn, I want you on the day of your birth
"DaHddayrrwyagsropaenrfeedc.t."
"What did you say?"my aunt ran out the door.
"Nothing, nothing..."
the birthday of Dudley-how could he forget? Harry stood up.
he got out of bed and started looking for socks. He found a pair under his
bed and then
he pulled a spider off one of them, dressed them up. Harry got used to spiders, because
there were a lot of them in the closet under the stairs, and that's where he slept.
Dressed, he walked into the kitchen. Table
he was almost hidden by all the gifts of Dudley on the day of his birth. Everything is
it looked like Yes
Dudley got the new computer he wanted, not to mention another.
TV and bicycle racing. Why does Dudley need bike racing, is
a mystery to Harry, because Dudley was very fat and hated exercise — except
if, Of course,
it does not involve itself applying blows to someone. Favorite boxing
the pear organization Dudley is Harry, but
he often can't catch it. Harry didn't look like that, but he was.
very fast.
Maybe, it's somehow connected to life in a dark closet, but Harry
he was always small and skinny for his age. He looked less and
hudee, but in fact, because all he had to wear , - it was old clothes
Dudley, and Dudley is about four times his size. Harry is evil.
face, knobby knees, black hair and light-green eyes. He wore a round
glasses,
signed with a lot of tape because he gave it many times
beat him on the nose. The only thing Harry liked about his appearance
, there was a very thin scar on the forehead in the form of lightning. She's with him.
from then on, he remembered, and the first question that was,
I remember, he asked his Aunt Petunia, and he was about how he got it.
"In a car accident, when your parents were killed," she said.
quehsteiro.n"sA"n. d do not give
Don't ask questions-that's the first rule of a peaceful life with
Dursley.
Uncle Vernon went into the kitchen when Harry was washing bacon.
"Communion!"he barked instead of the morning greeting.
About once a week Uncle Vernon peeping through the newspaper
and he yelled that Harry needed encouragement. At Harry's, it should have been, it was
more than a haircut, than a code
the other boys in my class, taken together, but it had no
value, his hair
it just grew like that-everywhere.
Harry was baking eggs at the time Dudley appeared in the kitchen with his
mother. Dudley is very similar to Uncle Vernon. He had a big pink face, no.
large neck, small watery-blue eyes and thick blonde hair, which is smooth
lie on
his Fat Head. Aunt Petunia often said that Dudley looked like
little angeloch
Harry used to say that Dudley looked like a pig in a wig.
Harry put a plate of egg and bacon on the table, which was not
easy, because
the place is small. In the meantime, he received his gifts. His
face to face. "Thirty-six," he said, looking at his mother and father. "That on two
less than last year."
"Darling, you're not considering Aunt Marge's gift, look, he's here
under this great gift from mom and dad".
"Well, then thirty - seven," Dudley said, spraying paint. Harry,
who saw that Dudley was beginning a real hysteria, began to entwine bacon
as quickly as possible on the case, if Dudley is to transfer the table.
Aunt Petunia, obviously, listened too much to the danger, because she quickly
he said:
"And we will buy you two more presents, until we are home today.
How do you do that?,
Popkin? Two more gifts. Everything is fine"
Dudley thought for a moment. It seemed like hard work. Finally
slowhley:sa"sido I'm thirty...thirty..."
"Thirty-nine, Sweet," said Aunt Petunia.
"Oh". Dudley found it difficult to sit and grab the nearest bundle. "Good
then."
Uncle Vernon zakicotta.
"A child wants his money is worth it, just like his father. "Bravo,
Dudley!"On взъерошил косу Дадли.
At that moment the phone rang, and Aunt Petunia went to remove
headset,
while Harry and Uncle Vernon watched as Dudley spread bike racing, video
camera
, remote-controlled aircraft, sixteen new computer games and
video recorder. He
fryval paper with gold wristwatch, when Aunt Petunia returned from
talking on the phone at the same time and worried.
"Bad news, Vernon," she said. "Mrs. Figg broke her leg. She
shecnaondndoetd her head towards Harry.
Dudley's mouth was opened in horror, but Harry's heart was broken. Each
the year on the day of his birth Dudley's parents took him with a friend for a whole day in
parks, restaurants with hamburgers or a movie theater. Every year Harry
left with Mrs. Figg, a crazy old lady who lived over two
the streets of us. Harry
hated this place. Whole house collapse cabbage and Mrs. Figg forced to make it
you see pictures of all the cats she's ever been. "And now what?"- asked Aunt Petunia, angrily looking at Harry, as if
it's masterminded. Harry knew he needed to be sorry, that he was
Mrs. Figg broke
leg, but it was not easy, when he recalled that a year would pass
before we have to look at Tibbles again, Snow, Mr.
Crow and taffeta.
"We could call Marge," suggested Uncle Vernon.
"Don't talk nonsense, Vernon, she hates the boy."
Dursley often talked about Harry tone, as if he hadn't been there.
- or, instead, as if something was very evil, that he could not understand them
as a servant.
"And how about-there-her— name, your friend - Yvonne?"
at night, introduction, such as on the day to go to school, where over him already laughed because of poor workmanship.,,,
"On vacation on Majorka", - Rez tetka Petuniya.
"You could just leave me here," - with hope involved Harry (he could
for yaecshange see what he wanted, on TV and, can be, even to climb
on
comApuuntterPeDtuudnley). ia looked like it was just to take a lemon.
"And go back and find a home in the ruins?"she cut.
"I'm not going to blow up the House," Harry said, but they didn't listen.
"I guess we could drive him to the zoo, - slowly
said Aunt Petunia, -... and leave him in the car...."
"This machine is new, it sits in it not one...."
Dudley cried loudly. In fact, he didn't actually cry-it was
years passed from then on, as he cried, truly, - but he knew
yes, if he's hiding his face
and"zDairnekvyeDt,ahdidsimdaomthse,rdwonil'ltgcirvye, Mhimomevdeorny'tthlientghhime wspaonitlsy.our
Dans!p"eshcieayl elled, hugging him.
"Me...no...I want you to...yeah...it's him...t-t-finish!"Dudley shouted in between
loud,
detention facilities. "He's always N-spoiling everything!"He sent Harry
merzku stupid smile
through the crack in the arms of the mother.
At that moment, the bell rings, " oh, my God, they're here!"- in
despairing aunt
Petunia, - and a moment later best friend Dudley, Piers Polkiss,
he went in with his mother. Pierce was a skinny boy with a face like krysinoe.
He is
he was usually the one who held people's hands behind his back, while Dudley was beating
them. Dudley immediately stopped pretending to cry.
Half an hour later, Harry, who couldn't believe his luck, sat down.
on
the back seat of the car Dursley Pier and dally on the way to the zoo
for the first time in my life. His aunt and uncle could not come to
more
to be done with him, but before they left, Uncle Vernon moved
Harry in the country.
"I warn you —" he said, approaching your big bagrovoe face
close to the face of Harry, - I warn you now, boy-every fun story,
anything you want - and you'll be sitting in this closet from that moment until
Christmas." "I'm not going to do anything, "Harry said," Honestly..."
Uncle Vernon didn't believe him. No one ever believed.
The problem is, that around Harry there were often strange things going on, and
just
ituwsealsess to say that he is not guilty in this, that it
hapOpenneedda.y Aunt Petunia, tired of it, that Harry had returned from
hairdressing salon
such a form,
as if he wasn't there at all, he took the kitchen scissors and stirred it up.
so short, he became almost bald, except for the motorcycle, which he left,
"to hide this
a terrible scar." Dudley was foolish to laugh at Harry, who had spent a furious
clothes and swears. The next morning, wake up.,
he is
discovered that his hair was exactly the same as they were before Aunt
He's got a penchant for it, for what?
Dali weeks lying in the closet, although he tried to explain
you can't explain how they're growing back so fast.
The second time Aunt Petunia tried to put it on disgusting
old sweater Dudley (Brown with orange sloenymy balls). More difficult
she tried
pull him through his head, less looked, became, until, finally, he would not
yes
it fits hand puppets, but I'm sure Harry wouldn't come. Aunt Petunia
she decided,
On the other hand, he had terrible trouble finding him on the
school kitchen roof. The Dudley gang, as usual, led him, when he,
that he, must be, sat down during the wash, and, to his great relief, Harry
he was not punished.
to Harry's surprise, like everyone else, he was sitting on the
chimney. Dursley received a very angry letter from
director Harry, in which it is stated that Harry is climbing at the school
buildings. But all that he is
trying to do (as he shouted to Uncle Vernon through the locked
the door of his
Swedish table), it jumps for large trash cans behind the kitchen door.
Harry
he suggested that the wind, should be, caught him in the middle of the jump.
But today everything had to go wrong. It was even worth it,
to be
Dudley and the docks, to spend the day somewhere, next to the school, his
SweWdihsh table or Mrs. smelling cabbage living room Figga. ile driving the car, Uncle Vernon pitied Aunt Petunia. He liked to
complain about things: people at work, Harry, Council, Harry, Bank and
Harry is just one of his favorite subjects. This morning it was motorcycles.
"... caught dangerous, like maniacs, young bullies, " - he said,
theywwheenre overtaken by a motorcycle.
"I had a dream about a motorcycle," Harry said, suddenly remembering.
"It was a flight."
Uncle Vernon almost hit the vehicle in front. He turned
at his seat and bellowed on Harry, his face resembles a giant beet
with moustache:
"MODTuOdRCYCLES DON'T FLY!" ley and Pierce zahihikali.
"I know they don't," Harry said. "It was just a dream."
But he regretted saying anything at all. If it's something, then
Dursley hated even more than he was the one asking the questions,
these were his conversations about what was
anything does not behave as it should, regardless of whether it is
in a dream, or even
cartoon - they seemed to think he might come up with a dangerous idea.
It was a very sunny Saturday, and the zoo was full.
families.
Dursley bought a Dudley and docks large chocolate chip ice cream at
entrance and
then, because the kissing lady in the van asked Harry, what he wanted earlier
they were able to sink him they bought him a cheap lemon bar with
ice. "It was also not
bad, " thought Harry, licking him, as they watched the gorilla scratch.
head,
who was incredibly similar to Dudley, besides, that she was blonde.
It's the best morning in a long time. He was cautious and
went a little to the side of Dursley to Dudley and Pierce, who was having dinner
animals
they started to get bored, they didn't come back on their own
dear occupation-to win. They ate at the " zoo " restaurant, and
when Dudley
he turned hysterical because in his "nickerboxer fame" there was no
enough ice cream
from above, Uncle Vernon bought him another one, and Harry was allowed to eat
first.
Later Harry felt that he needed to know, that it was all
conttoinougeo. od to
After dinner they went to the reptile house. It was cold and dark,
from the windows lights on all the walls. Behind the glass all kinds of lizards and
the snake was glided in pieces of wood and stone. Dudley and
Pierce wanted to see huge Poisonous Cobra and fat, capable of breaking
the python man.
Dudley quickly found the largest snake in this place. He could have done it twice
finish your
body around Uncle Vernon's machine and break it into garbage-but in
at this point, he didn't seem to be in the mood. In fact, he is
sleep tight.
Dudley stood, pressed his nose against the glass, stared at
great brown rings.
"Let her move," he whispers to his father. Uncle Vernon knocked on
glass, but the serpent did not move from its place.
"Do it again," Dudley ordered. Uncle Vernon knocked vigorously
his obnoxgelrashsands, but the snake just kept taking a nap.
"That's boring," the prostonal Dudley. He shagged away.
Harry came to the aquarium and looked closely at the snake. He
he was not surprised if she herself would die of boredom — no company,
other than stupid people, barabbing their fingers on the glass, trying to
annoy him whole
a day away. This is worse than having a closet as a bedroom, where the only
a visitor is Aunt Petunia, knocking at the door, to wake you; at least,
he could have
visit the remaining part of the House.
The snake suddenly opened its eyes-a ball. Slowly, very slowly
herhhoeiastd, while her eyes did not find themselves on the same level with Harry's eyes.
It lifted.
Harry stared. Then, he quickly looked around to see if he was looking
. Thseoymdeidonne't notice. He looked at the snake again and too Winky.
The snake turned its head to the side of Uncle Vernon and Dudley, then lifted
eyes on the ceiling. She threw at Harry's gaze, which clearly stated:
"I get it all the time".
"I know," Harry muttered through the glass, though he was not sure that
the Serpent could hear him. "It should be, it's really annoying."
The snake nodded vigorously.
"By the way, Where Are you from?"Asked Harry.
A snake woven its tail into a small badge near the glass. Harry vsmotrelsya
into her.
Boa-constrictor, Brazil.
"That was good?"
Boa-constrictor again pointed tail in sign, and Harry read
Th next:
is specimen was placed in the zoo. "Oh, it's clear-so you
you have never been in
BraWzilh?e"n the snake shook its head, the deafening cry behind Harry made them both
bounce. "Dudley! MR. DURSLEY! GO AND LOOK AT THIS
Snake! YOU DIDN'T BELIEVE WHAT HE WAS DOING!"
Dudley Waddle got to them as fast as I could.
"Out of the way, you are," he said, weaving Harry's fist into his ribs.
sudZdeanstl
iyg,nHuatýrry crashed hard on the concrete floor. What happened next,
it happened so quickly that
no one saw how it happened — in one second Pierce and Dudley
prilonilis
close to the glass, and the next they jumped off with screams of horror.
Harry sits and sigh: glass front of the aquarium with BoAconstrictor
gone. The giant snake quickly spread, and
floor. People all over the House of reptiles screamed and rushed to
corrWect. hen the snake quickly slid past him, Harry could swear that he was
ThesVouonicdeesdaliodw, "hBirsaszinilg, I'm going.... Thank you, amigo."
The guardian of the reptile house was in shock.
"But the glass," he continued, " Where did the glass go?"
The director of the zoo personally prepared Aunt Petunia a cup of strong
h sweet tea e apologized again and again. Pierce and Dudley could only
unclear, mutter.
As far as Harry saw, the snake did nothing, only mischievously
on their heels, when he passed by, but at a time when they were all
back in Uncle Vernon's car,
Dudley was telling them how that she was something not a little off his leg, while
Pierce
he swore that she had tried to smother him to death. But the worst of all,
at least for Harry.,
is what Pierce calmed down enough to say: "Harry talked to him, didn't he?
no,
Harry?"
Uncle Vernon waited for Pierce to safely get out of the house, before
than jumping on Harry. He was so angry that he could hardly speak.
He managed to say,
"Go-to the closet-stay-without food", before it collapsed on
the chair, and
Aunt Petunia had to run away and bring him a large portion of brandy.
Much later Harry lay in his dark closet, saving, that there was no
he khnoeuwrsw. Hhaetdhooeusrn,'tand he couldn't be sure Dursley was still asleep.
Until they were ready to, he couldn't risk, making his way into
kitcHheen for food. lived with Dursly for almost ten years, ten unhappy years,
how he remembered, from then on, how he was a child and his parents killed
in that car accident. He could not remember, as if he had been in
car, when his parents
dead. Sometimes, when he frayed his memory during long hours in his
closet, to his mind a strange vision: a wonderful flash of green light and
burning pain in the forehead. He assumed it was an accident, though
he couldn't stand where the green light came from. He could not at all
remember your own
parents. His aunt and uncle never spoke of them, and, of course, MU
it was forbidden to ask questions. There was no one in the House
photos.
When Harry was younger, he dreamed that some
an unknown relative will come to pick it up, but it did not happen;
Dursley was his only family. Sometimes I think (or,
it may be, yes.
strangers on the street, it seems, knew him. they, too, were very strange
foreigners
. A little man in a purple cylinder once gave him a gift, when he was going to
shopping
with Aunt Petuniey and Dudley. They were looking hard for Harry, did he know this one?
man,
Aunt Petunia took them out of the store, not buying anything. One
Dana, on the bus he had fun dikovatogo
the kind of older woman, dressed in everything is green.
A bald man in a very long purple coat really flaps his hand at
Street
the other day, and then he left, not saying a word. The strangest thing in all
to these people, it seemed, he disappeared in the same second, as Harry did
he tried to
take a closer look.
There was no one at Harry's school. Everyone knew that the gang Dudley was
he hated
that Strange Harry Potter in his mixed old clothes and broken
glasses and no one.
he didn't like getting along with The Dudley gang.
HP 1-Harry Potter
The magic stone
HEAD THIRD
LETTERS FROM NO ONE
Escape Brazilian drowning brought Harry what was long in his life
punishment
. At the time when he was again allowed to fly out of Chulan, the summer began
break up, and Dudley already broke his new camera,
broke his plane with remote control and, for the first time ever, flew on his own
racing bike,
shot down old Mrs. Figg, when she peresek Tisovuju Avenue on her
crutches.
Harry was glad that school was over, but from
The Dudley gang can't escape anywhere, who went to every man's House
day. Pierce, Dennis, Malcolm and
Gordon was all big and stupid, but since Dudley was the greatest and
stupid from
everyone, he was a leader. Everyone else was pretty happy to join.
on your beloved form of Sport Dudley: the hunt for Harry.
That's why Harry spent more time out of the House.,
wandering around and thinking about the end of the vacation, where he could see
a little ray of hope. When September comes, he will go to the middle
school and, for the first time in his life, not to give it away. Dudley
they went to Uncle Vernon's old private school, the Smeltings. Pierce Polkiss
he also went there. Harry, on the other hand, went to Stonewall Hay, a local
public school. Dudley seemed very funny.
"They were dropping people's heads into the toilet on their first day at Stonewall.", -
said Harry. "Do you want to go up and exercise?"
"No, thank you," Harry said. "In a bad toilet never relax anything more
it's more frustrating than your head — it can suck." Then, he ran away.
before giving
he wOans able to understand what he said. e day in July, Aunt Petunia drove Dudley to London, to buy him
smelling uniforms, leaving Harry with Mrs. Figg. Mrs. Figg
it wasn't as bad as
and usually. It turned out that she had broken her leg, spotting one of the
her cat, and she
she didn't seem to love them as much as before. She took care of Harry.
watching TV and
gave him a piece of chocolate cake, the taste of which was such, as if she was
he ate a few
year.
That evening Dudley defiliroval in front of his family in the living room at
its completely new form. The boys of the Smeltings wore dark-Bordeaux
fraki, Orange
pants and straight straw hats, called kanotye. They are also
wearing socks
the staff, which beat each other, when the teacher is not looking. It was
it was supposed to be a good exercise for life.
Looking at Dudley in his new bridging, Uncle Vernon hoarse
he said it was the greatest moment of his life.
Aunt Petunia burst into tears
and she said she couldn't believe it was her abominable Daredevil, he was
he looked so
beautiful and grown up. Harry didn't believe himself to speak. He thought it was
two
the ribs, perhaps, have already shaken from the attempt not to laugh.
* * *
The next morning, when Harry went to the kitchen, there was a terrible stand in the
kitchen.
smell
for breakfast. It looked like the sound came from a large metal bath in the
sink. He is
went to see. The bathroom was filled with something similar to dirty rags,
floating in
grey water.
"What is it?"he asked Aunt Petunia. Her lips are thickened, as well as
if healdwaaryesd to ask a question.
"Your new school form," she said.
Harry looked at the bowl again.
"Oh," he said , " I did not imagine it should be so
wet."
"Don't talk nonsense", - огрызнулась тетка Петуния. "I am afraid
some of the old things gave in gray
for you. It will look just like everyone else when I'm done."
Harry seriously doubted it, but thought it best not to
I argue. He sat down
at the table and tried not to think about what he would look like in his
first day at Stonewall Hay —
probUanbly, as if there were pieces of old elephant skin on it. cle Vernon, both of whom died because of
the smell of a new form of Harry. Uncle Vernon, as
and usually, he ran the newspaper, and Dally knocked on his blue stick, which was
he took it all with him, yes.
table. They heard the click of the mailbox and the smack of letters on the envelope on
the door.
"Take the mail, Dudley," Uncle Vernon said because of his newspaper.
"Let Harry get this."
"Get the Mail, Harry."
"The law gave it up."
"Touch your blue stick, dude."
Harry escaped from the Blue Sticks and left the post office. Three things
on the mats at the door lay: a postcard from Uncle Vernon's sister
Mary, who is
rested on the Isle Of Wight, brown envelopes, similar result, and —
e-mHail to Harry. arry took him, and stared at him, his heart beating like a giant tire
. No one has ever written for him in his entire life. Who would do that?
He had no
friend, no other relatives — he did not belong to the library, so he
never even
received rough notes with a request to return the books. And yet, that's it, email, it is so
cleaMrly, the error Cannot Be: r. K. Potter
Closet under the stairs, Malo-Uinging, 4 by Tisovoy Street,
Little Uing,
Surrey
The envelope was thick and heavy, of yellowish parchment, and
the address is written in emerald green ink. There was no seal.
Turning envelope shaking hands, Harry video purple wax
seal with coat of arms: lion, eagle, Badger and snake, surrounding
the Big letter H.
"Hurry up, boy!"Uncle Vernon shouted from the kitchen. "If you were
working, checking, no letter bombs?"He's playing his own joke.
Harry returned to the kitchen, still staring at his letter. He instructed
uncle
Vernon's account and postcard, sat down and slowly began to open yellow
envUelnope. cle Vernon tore up the bill, snorted in disgust and turned
postcard.
"Marge got sick," he said to Aunt Petunia. "He ate funny fish...."
"Dad!"suddenly he said, Dudley. "Dad, we Harry there is something!"
Harry was to distribute his letter, which was written on
the same traffic parchment, as the envelope, when Uncle Vernon abruptly
wrenched had it from
hands. "That's mine!"Harry said, trying to pull him back.
"Which would you write?"- zakikota Uncle Vernon, waving a letter
hold one hand and look at him. His face was replaced by a color of
red to green faster
it's traffic lights. And that's where it all ended. Within a few seconds she was
she became
gray-white, like old oatmeal.
"N-N-Petuniya!"said gasped.
Dudley tried to grab a letter to read, but Uncle Vernon kept
out iot'fshhisigrheach. Aunt Petunia curiously took it and read it
first line. On
for a moment, I felt like I was passing out. She nodded her head and
drop
the sound.
"Vernon! Oh my God, Vernon!"
They stared at each other, it seemed, forgetting that Harry and
Dudley was still in the room. Dudley was not used to ignoring him. He is
sharp knock
father on his head with his blue stick.
"I want you to read this letter," he said loudly.
"I want you to read this, "Harry said fiercely,"because this is mine."
"March, both of you," - hissing Uncle Vernon, poking a letter back
in an envelope.
Harry didn't move.
"I WANT YOUR LETTER!"- he shouted.
"Let me have a look at him!"demanded Dudley.
"There!"- howling Uncle Vernon and taking away Harry and Dudley for
warm up, threw them out in the hallway, snapping for them kitchen door
. Harry and Dudley immediately organized a violent, but inconclusive, fight for the
what, who
will eavesdrop into the keyhole; Dudley won, so Harry, hang on
glasses are
one ear, lying on his stomach, to eavesdrop in the cracks between the neck and
floor.
"Vernon," said Aunt Petunia with a trembling voice, " look at
address-how could they even know where he was sleeping? Don't you think
are they looking at home?
"He looks ... spying ... it may be, for us to spy," - murmur
wildU.ncle Vernon
"But what do we do, Vernon? Do you answer me? Tell them that we
we don't want to..."
Harry could see how shining black Nike Uncle Vernon swagger forward and
in thbeackkitchen.
"No," he said at the end. "No, I'm projecting that. If they will not
Yeaghe, tita'lnl baensbwetetre.r..that way ... We're not doing anything..."
"But..."
"I did nothing like it in the House, Petunia! Did we not promise when
take it to yourself, to eradicate this dangerous nonsense?"
That evening, upon returning from work, Uncle Vernon did what
he's never done it before: he came to see Harry in his closet.
"Where is my letter?"Harry asked, when Uncle Vernon opposed her."
. "Wdhooortells me?"
"Nobody. It was addressed to you by mistake " - the uncle replied briefly
"I bVurenrnedoni.t."
"It wasn't a mistake," said Harry angrily, " it was mine on him.
the Cabinet."
"Calm down!"- cried Uncle Vernon, and a pair of spiders fell from the ceiling
. He took a few deep breaths and then forced himself to
smile, it is
it se"eUmhed pretty painful. ... yeah, Harry-about this office. I like your aunt
thought ... you're really getting a little more mature for that ... We think that we would
it would be nice if you
he moved into Dudley's other room.
"Why?"asked Harry.
"Don't ask questions!"it was his uncle. "Take it upstairs,
immediately".
P There are four bedrooms in Dursley's house: one for Uncle Vernon and aunts etunia, one for visitors (usually the Sisters of Uncle Vernon, Marge), one where
he slept with Dudley, and others, where Dudley kept all the toys and things that
they are not located
in the first room. Harry took only one camping trip up, to convey everything
what is with him
either, from the Cabinet to this room. He sat on the bed and looked around.
around. Almost everything here is broken. Camcorder a month ago
was lying on a small working tank, which had one day strangled
neighbor's dog; in the corner stood the first in the life of TV Dudley, who
he broke his leg, when he canceled his favorite program; there
there was a large bird cell, in which once sat a parrot, which he gave
exchange in
school on a real pneumatic rifle, which stood on the shelf with
the end, because
Dudley was sitting on it. Other shelves are up books. They are the only ones
things in the room, which looked as if they had never been touched.
From below he brought a scream to his mother: "I am
I don't want him to be there...I need this room ... the right to wear it
..."Harry sighed and stretched on the bed. Yesterday, I would give
everything to be here. Today, he decided to return to his closet with this
letter
, than to climb here without him.
The next morning at breakfast everyone was quite quiet. Dudley was
He isnhosuhtoecdk,. beat his father with a blue stick, to
deliberately vomiting, he kicked Mike and threw his turtle through the roof
greenhouse,
he hasn't returned to his room yet. Harry thought about that time
yesterday, I was very sorry that I didn't put the letter in the Hall. Uncle Vernon
andWAunt Petunia continued to look gloomy at each other. hen the mail came, Uncle Vernon, who seems to have tried to be
cute
with Harry, he made Dudley go and pick him up.
on the subject of his
A blue stick across the Hall. Then he yelled, " there's another one!
"Mr. K. Potter, smallest bedroom, Tisova Street, 4 ..." With a strangled scream Uncle Vernon jumped out of his seat and led through
the hallway, Harry directly behind him. Uncle Veron must have died
Earth,
to take away the letter from him, which is made difficult by the fact that Harry
he grabbed Uncle Vernon from behind by the neck. After a few minutes uneventful
the battle, in which everyone received many blows of the Blue stick, Uncle Vernon
stra"iGghotteoneyodu, rpacnlotsinegt ,..s.q"uineemzyinbgeidnrtooHma,r"rHy'asrhryanwdhaislpeetrterd..
"Dudley, go ... just go."
Harry went circles in his new room. Someone knew that he was
moved out of his closet, and, apparently, knew that he didn't get his first
letters. Surely that meant he'd try again? This time he will
make sure that they
they failed. He had a plan.
The renovated alarm clock rang at six o'clock the next morning. Harry
I wapsuqt uiticokulty and quietly trained. He shouldn't wake Dursley. He
snuck
dowHnethweansttaeidrst,onmoteientctlhuedipnogstamnyanligohntsth. e corner of Tisovo Street and
first up are the letters for the fourth number. His heart was beating when he was king.
through
dark"AhAaAllAtAoAtRheRRfrGonHt
!"door —
Harry refused into the air; he stepped on something big and soft
floor mats from the door - something alive!
On the floor turned on the light, and, to her disappointment, Harry realized that
it is a great,
it was his uncle's face. Uncle Vernon lies in
at the foot of the door in the apartment bag, clearly making sure that Harry did not do
exactly what he was trying to do. He yelled at Harry about half
SATA
he ordered her to go and make a cup of tea. Harry is unhappy.
I looked up at the
kitchen, and by the time he returned, the Mail had already arrived, right on his knees
uncle
Vernon. Harry picked up three letters, addressed in green ink.
"I want to..."he began, but Uncle Vernon tortured letters to
pieces of him in his eyes.
Uncle Vernon didn't go to work that day. He stayed at home and
maizlbaokxo.lotil
"You see," he explained to Aunt Petunia with the nails of her mouth.,
they- iwf othne'tybaereable to deliver them, they just give up."
"I'm not sure that will work, Vernon."
"Oh, the minds of these people work a strange way, Petunia, they are not as they are
you and me, " said Uncle Vernon, trying to nail the piece
fruit cake, which Aunt Petunia only brought him.
On Friday, Harry had no fewer than twelve letters. Because they could not
thropuagshs the address slit spilled them under the door, spilled over
wall, and some even protruded through a small window in the
bathroom on the first floor.
Uncle Vernon stayed home again. After burning all the letters, he
he took out
hammer and nails and knotted cracks in front and behind
the door so no one could get out. During
Rada hummed "stealing on his fingers through tulips" and vzdragival on the smallest
noise.
On Saturday, the situation began to get out of control. Twenty-four
letters to Harry
they came into the House, rolled and hidden inside each of the two
a dozen eggs, which a very confused milkman passed to Aunt Petunia through
living room window. While Uncle Vernon hit hard on
mail and in the dairy, trying to find, who to complain to, Aunt
Petunia
she"wWrhoote letters in the kitchen. , for God's sake, wants to talk to you so strongly?"
Asked by Dudley Harry.
* * *
On Sunday morning, Uncle Vernon sat down for a table breakfast.
tired and sick, but happy.
"No Mail on Sunday," - is fun he reminded them of prayer
"no fucking letters today ..."
As he spoke, something from the whistle fell out of my kitchen tube and
hit him hard on the back. In the next thirty or
forty letters
he flew out of the fireplace, like bullets. Dursley nodded, Ali Harry.
she"
jOumutp!eOdu
itn!"
to the air, trying to catch one. —
Uncle Vernon grabbed Harry around his waist and threw him into the hallway.
When Aunt Petunia and Dudley ran out, who covered her face with her hands,
Uncle Vernon slammed the door. They could hear, as letters continue to flow
in the room, they bounce off the walls and floor.
"That's all," said Uncle Vernon, trying to speak calmly, but
at the same time vydergivaya
big beams from your mustache. "I wish you were all back here in five
one minute, ready to go. We're leaving. Just collect some clothes.
None
disputes!"
He looked so dangerous without half a moustache, that no one would dare
to argue. Ten minutes later, they broke through the boarding
the door and they were in the car chasing on the highway. Dudley hlupal nose
in the back seat; his father hit him on the head, he held them, while
trying to pack a TV, video recorder and computer in a bag.
They were driving. And they left. Even Aunt Petunia did not smile
I wonder where to
they travel. At the time of Uncle Vernon suddenly swarachiwal and
he was driving in the opposite direction for a while. "Shoot them ... "get them out of here," he muttered, whenever he did.
They did not stay all day to eat or drink. In the night Dudley began to
they howl.
He has never had such a bad day in his life. He was hungry, he was
missed five
television programs, which he wanted to see, and he never so long did not
a stFranger on his computer. inally Uncle Vernon stopped at the blurry look of the hotel at
peripherals of the great city. Dudley and Harry share a room with two separate beds
and
wet, covered with mold leaves. Dudley snored, but Harry doesn't sleep, sits on
Simsa, looking down at the lights passing cars and thinking....
For breakfast they ate reckless cornflakes and cold
thecnaenxnteddayto.mThaetoyehsaodnjutosatsftinished, when their
table, the hotel owner approached.
"Excuse me, but one of you is Mr. K. Potter? I just got
likeaaboreuctetpetnion."
She picks up the letter so that they can read the address, written in green
ink:
Mr. K. Potter,
number 17
Hotel"Rejlvью"
Kokuort
Harry tried to grab the letter, but Uncle Vernon kicked it out of his hands.
the road. The woman put up with him.
"I attribute them," said Uncle Vernon, quickly rising and going for
she came out of the dining room.
* * *
"Wouldn't it be better to just go home, Dear?"Aunt Petunia proposed
shyly, a few hours later, Uncle Vernon, it seemed, had not heard of her.
That he
asked, none of them knew. He tied them up in the thick of the forest,
he went out, looked around, shook his head, got back in the car, and they
they left again
. The same thing happened in the middle of vspahannogo field, halfway through
hanging bridge and on the top floor of the garage.
"My dad is crazy, isn't he?"He asked his aunt late.
on the same day. Uncle Vernon parked on the shore, locked them all in
car and gone.
It started to rain. Large drops of barabanil on the roof of the car.
Dudley whimpered.
I wa"nTtoditatyoisstMoposnodmaye,w" hheerteolodffhtihsemToVth."er. "Tonight The Great Umberto". I
Monday. It reminded Harry of something about. If it were a Monday
it w-aasnudsually possible to count on what Dudley knew the days of the week,
because
TV-then tomorrow, Tuesday, was Harry's eleventh birthday. Of course,
his birthday was never particularly cheerful-in the last year
Dursley gave him
designed hanger for coats and a pair of Old Uncle Vernon socks. And yet you
it wasn't eleven.
every day.
Uncle Vernon returned, and he smiled. He also wore a long,
a thin bundle and did not answer Aunt Petunia, when she asked what he was
bouFgohut.nd the ideal place!"- he said. "Gone! Everybody out!"
Outside the machine was very cold. Uncle Vernon pointed to that
it lowokheadt like a big stone far out into the sea. At the top of the Cliff stood
poor shredding, as one can only imagine. One thing is clear
of course : it was not
television. "Forecast storm on today!"- joyfully said Uncle Vernon, clapping
. "Ahnadntdhsis gentleman graciously agreed to lend us his boat!"
After him a leisurely gait approached a toothless old man, indicating with a rather
the evil smile on the old scratching ship, popping on the grey-steel
lead"Iunder them. 've already got some soldering for us ," said Uncle Vernon, " so
All Aboard!"
andItthweacsocldolwd i
inndthisewbhoiaptp. iIncge tsheeamspornaythaenidr fraacinesa.cLqautierre,ditthloeomkesdheliykaema clock.,
they are
they reached the Rock, where Uncle Veron, poskalzivaya, led them to
destroyed house. Inside it was terrible; very smelling algae, wind
he whistled cracks in the wooden walls, and in the fireplace it was damp and
empty. There were two rooms.
Uncle Vernon's diet was a packet of chips on every and four
bananas. He tried to build a fire, but empty packages from-under
the chips are only
smorchilis. "Didn't stop you from getting any of these letters now, huh?"fun," he said.
He was in a very good mood. Obviously, he thought that
comneohoenreehinasaastcohramncteo deliver the mail. Harry agreed to,
although this thought did not cheer him up.
With the arrival of the night, a warning storm erupted around them. Spray from
high waves shattered the wall of the hut, and the wild wind dreaded in
dirty
Windows. Aunt Petunia found several dancing blankets in
the second room and
she put her feet on the couch. She's also Uncle Vernon.
they went to the cot by the door, and Harry stayed to look for
the most gentle part of the floor,
who could only, and to settle up under a very thin, most hairy
a blanket.
The night went on, the storm raged. Harry
he couldn't sleep. He groaned and surrendered, trying to find a sitting,
his
my stomach was hungry. Snoring Dudley is sinking in low Rascals
Thunder, which began around midnight. One prominent clock Dowly, which are
hanging from the edge of the sofa at his Tolstoy's wrist, said Harry, that through
ten minutes, he'll be eleven
. He lay down and watched as his birthday approached.,
vspomnya Li
Dursley in general, bitch, where is the author of the letter now.
Five minutes left. Harry heard something scrawled on the outside. He
hoped, yes
the roof does not decay, although, perhaps, it would be warmer, if that happened.
Four minutes left
. It may be, the House on the dust disk will be so full of letters, when they
they return, that somehow he can steal one.
Three minutes left. That was the sea, that was it.
hard hitting a rock? And (two minutes remaining) that's for a funny snack?
Rock falling into the sea?
One minute left, and it was eleven. Thirty seconds ...
ninetw- ecnotuyl.d..bten, .h..e woke up to give, just to sicken him-three ...
twoB..o. omne....
The whole cabin lingered, and Harry suddenly stood up, staring at the door.
Someone was outside, kicking in.
HP 1-Harry Potter
The magic stone
CHAPTER FOUR
KEY KEEPER
he's back. They're knocking again. Dudley suddenly woke up.
"Where is the gun?"he asked stupidly.
Behind them there was a tremor, and in the room vkatilsa Uncle Veron
. He held a gun in his hands – they now know that he is in
a long, thin package, which he brought with him.
"Who's there?"he shouts. "I warn you-I am armed!"
There was a break. Then —
Defeat!
At the door struck with such force, that she was out with a loop and
with deafening down with the crash landed flat on the floor.
In the door opening stood a man of giant growth. His face was
almost
completely removed long, lohmatoy mane of hair and wild, sputannoy
the beard, but
it was possible to see eyes, blestevšie under the hair, like black bugs.
The giant protruded into the hut, squatting small, so that his head was barely
the question of the ceiling. He bowed, took the door and easily interfered with it
back in the frame. The noise of the storm outside a little verse. He turned his eyes
on them all. "I couldn't make you a cup of tea, huh? It's an easy journey.
..."
He came to the couch, on which he sat for fear of Daudly.
"Move, big Knot," said the stranger.
Dudley squeaked and ran to hide behind his mother, who scored,
in fear, for Uncle Vernon.
And here's Harry!"said the giant.
Harry looked at the Wild, Wild, shaded face and saw that
the eyes-the bugs in a smile.
"The last time I saw you, you were just a child," said the giant.
he l"oYookus laoolokt like your dad, but you have your mother's eyes."
Uncle Vernon made a funny screeching sound.
"I demand that they leave immediately, sir!"- he said. "You are
throvuzglahm!"yva
"Ah, shut up, Dursley, you're a great prune," said the giant; he
reached for me
clutched in the back of the sofa, snatched the gun from Uncle Vernon's hand, squashed it
in
knot, so easy, as if it was made of rubber and thrown into the corner
roomUns.cle Vernon made another strange sound, as if it had come upon a mouse.
"Anyway, Harry," said the giant, turning his back on Durslam, "
you happy birthday. I have something here for you there-in
one moment I may, I'll try, but to taste everything will be in
all rFigrohmt".the inside pocket of his black coat he pulled out a little helpful
box. Harry opened it with trembling fingers. There was a big sticky inside.
chocolate
cakHe with the inscription "Happy Birthday Harry" green glaze. arry raises his eyes to the giant. He wanted me to say "thank you," but the words
he loses his way to his mouth, and instead he says, " Who Are you?"
The giant croaked.
"Yes, I did not present it. Rubeus Hagrid, Keeper of the keys
Territory in Hogwarts."
He reached a large lunch and shook Harry's whole hand completely.
"What is tea, then?"he said, rubbing his hands. "I would
he did not refuse from something stronger, if you have it, keep it in mind."
His eyes fell on an empty grid with smorchen packages
from-under chips, and he
snorted. He was over the fireplace; they could not see that he had done
but when seconds later he pulled it, there was a fire raging. That is
probably fulfilled
all the raw huts sparkled light, and Harry felt like heat ocatilo
Ga
it's like being immersed in a warm bath.
Jinn sat down again on the couch, which chased under his weight, and
started getting all kinds of things from the pockets of your coat: copper coffee,
masistaju packing sausage, kočergu, teapot, several salvaged cups and
a bottle with some amber liquid, from which he made a breath, before it starts
yes brev tea.
Soon the hut is filled with the sound and smell of Shippy sausage. No one
the Prophet ni
words, while the giant was working, but when he took off from poker the first six fat,
juicy, a little bit
I burned sausages, gave it a little fidgeted. Uncle Vernon
suddenly, he said, "Don't touch anything, that he's giving you, Dudley."
The giant grimly croaks.
"Your lovely puhlenky son should no longer be fat, Dursley, no
worry".
He passed the sausages to Harry, who was so hungry, that he never
he tried
nothing more delicious, but he still couldn't separate his eyes from the giant.
Finally, since
no one seemed to want to explain anything, he said, " I'm sorry, but I
I am so far
The giant drank a sip of tea and wiped the mouth of the back of his hand
I really don't know who you are."
.............
"Call Me Hagrid, "he said," everything is a name. And, as I am to you
TheIkseayidk,eIeapmer at Hogwarts-you, of course, will know all about Hogwarts.
"Uh... "no," said Harry.
Hagrid looked shocked.
"I'm sorry," Harry said quickly.
"I'm sorry?"- layao Hagrid, turning to look at Dursley, who
leapfrog back in the shadow. "They need to apologize! I knew you didn't get it
your messages but I never thought you didn't even know about Hogwarts,
if
you won't cry out loud! You never thought, where your parents all this
learned?
"What?"asked Harry.
"What?"- Thunderously Hagrid. "Just wait a moment!"
He jumps on his feet. In his anger, he seemed to have filled the entire hut.
Dursley covered against the wall.
"Do you want to tell me-he snarled at Dursley, - that this is
a boy...
this boy! - he knows nothing about ... nothing?"
Harry thought it was a little far. After all, he went to
andshchisoeosl,timates are decent.
"I know something," he said. "I can, you know how to exercise
mathematics and all that."
YouBruwtoHragrid just shook his hand and said, "I think of our world. ld. My world. The world of your parents."
"What is the world?"
Hagrid looked like it-it was going to explode.
"Dursley!"- it's not him.
Uncle Vernon, who is very pale, whispered something, yes
it sounded like " Mimble-Vimble." Hagrid stared wildly at Harry.
"But you should know about your mom and dad," he said.
kno"wInmfeoarn. ,Ytohueyare known."
"What? Mine... my mom and Dad weren't famous, were they?"
"You don't know...you don't know...."Hagrid put his fingers in his
hair, staring at Harry's back-up look.
"You don't know who you are?"he said at the end.
Uncle Vernon suddenly found a voice.
"Stop!"he commanded. "Stop now, Sir! I forbid you to
whaItseavyerBiotyis!"
A more brave man than Vernon Dursley would have stooped under a fierce
the appearance, which she now entrusted to Hagrid; when Hagrid spoke, every syllable
trembling from
anger. "You never told him? He never said he was in a letter.
Dumbledore
left it for him? I was there! I saw how Dumbledore left her
yeah, Dursley! And you were hiding it.
from"Hhi
idminagllfrtohmesemyee?a"srhs?e"impatiently asked Harry.
"Stop it! I FORBID YOU!"- in panic shouted Uncle Vernon.
Aunt Petunia was horrified.
"Ah, go cook your heads, both of you," Hagrid said. "Harry, you are
Wizard."
There was a tyrant in the cabin. Only the sea and the whistling wind could be heard.
.
"I what?"- jacken Harry.
"The Magician, of course ," said Hagrid, sitting down back on the couch, who
I began to whine: and fell even lower: "and damn good, I would say, when you
a little poise. With a mom and dad like you, who else would you
could it be?
"I thFink it's time to read your letter." inally Harry reaches out his hand to take the yellow envelope,
directed emerald-green with Mr. K. Potter "Paul", " Hut-onthe rocks,"
The sea." He took out a letter and read it.:
Hogwarts School of Witchcraft and Wizardry
Director: Albus Dumbledore
(Order of Merlin first degree, great Magic, Chf. Chernoknizhnik,
M Supreme agwamp, the International Confederation. magicians)
Dear Mr. Potter,
we are happy to announce that you will take in Hogwarts
School of Witchcraft and magic. Please read with attached
list of all necessary
booSkesmanedsteeqrusitpamrtsen1t.. September. We wait for our owl no later than 31.July.
Sincerely Yours,
Minerva McGonagall,
deputy director
The question was raised in Harry's head as a fiddler, and he could not
decide which of them to set first. After a few minutes he was,
hesitating, he asked ," what
so "they're waiting for their owl"?"
"Gallop Gorgon, it reminded me," - said Hagrid, the palm of his hand swirling at
his forehead with strength, enough to be knocked down with the feet of a breaking horse, and
more than
one
from the inner pocket of the jacket pulled an owl-real, alive, pretty
looking forward to the look
owl, - a long feather and a roll of parchment. High tongue for teeth
he wrote a message that Harry could read upside down.:
Dear Professor Dumbledore,
he sent Harry his letter.
Tomorrow I'll buy him stuff.
The weather is terrible. I hope you're okay.
Hagrid
Hagrid ended the note, gave her an owl, who regretted it in the beak,
he came to the door and threw an owl in the storm. Then he came back and
SEO, as if it was just normal, as if you were talking on the phone.
Harry realized that his mouth was open, and quickly closed it.
"What did I stand for?"- asked Hagrid, but at this point Uncle Vernon, yet
asha-glwraayy,sbut looking very angry, came out in the light of fire.
"He's not going," he said.
Hagrid grunted.
"I would like to see such a great Maggle as you,
stop him, " he said.
"What?"interested Harry.
"Maggly," said Hagrid, " this is what we call non-magical.
people like them.
And you're not lucky, that you grew up in a family of the greatest magglove I've ever
video
. "We promised, when he picked it up, to put a stop to this vzdoru", -
Unchle Vsaeirdnon, " swore that my instinct would be destroyed by it! Really
Wiz"aDrdid!"you know?"asked Harry. "You knew what I was ... Wizard?"
"They knew!"- suddenly shrieked Aunt Petunia. "They knew! Of course, we are
knew it!
How could you not be such a damn my sister was such a
she was? She got a letter
the same and disappeared in Tom-Tom school-and every
he returned home with his pockets full of caviar.,
turning a tea cup into a rat. I was
he was the only one who saw what he was like — a child! For my mother and
father, Oh, no, it was Lily and Lily, they were proud, that she was in She stopped breathing deeply and then continued to scream.
tshheeIfwtasmaenietlymedwedmaseatowsitacyha."ll this.years.
"Then she met this Potter at school, and they went, and married, and
he was with them
you, and, of course, I knew you'd be the same, the same strange, the same
abnormal — and then, if you want, she went and exploded, and we
Billy with you!"
Harry very pale. As soon as he got his voice, he asked. :
"Exploded? You told me they died in a car accident!"
"Car crash!"- zaurla Hagrid, jumping so angrily, that Dursley
they returned to their corner. "How could a car accident kill you?"
Lily and James Potter for?
It's outrageous! Scandal! Harry Potter doesn't know his own history, when everyone
a child in our world knows his name!"
"But why? What happened?"He asked Harry.
Anger disappeared from Hagrid's face. He is suddenly in trouble.
"I never expected," he said with a low, excited voice. "I am not
whehneDhuamd balnedidoerae told me that with you there could be problems, as much
you didn't know. Oh, Harry, I don't know if that man I'm gonna say ...
But someone has to ... you can't escape Hogwarts without knowing."
He took an ungrateful look at Durslei.
"So it will be better if you have learned as much as I can to you
thatI esvaeyr..y.tIhwinagn,tthtoatw'satrhneyboiug, sIeccarne'tt, sitasyparts..."
He sat down, looked at the fire for a few seconds, and then said, " that
it starts, I guess ... with a man by name-but that's incredible
yes you don't
you know his name, and everyone in our world knows it ..." "Who is it?"
"Well, I don't like to pronounce that name, if I can resist. No one does that
makes".
"Why not?"
Y "Głotaing gargoyle, Harry, people are still afraid. God, that's hard. ou see, there was a wizard who became ... bad. So bad, how much
it's possible at all. Worse.
Up,Huapg. rHidissnharumgegiesd..,
."but could not say a word.
"You can't film this?"suggested Harry.
"No, I can't write this word for word. Okay, Voldemort. "Hagrid
makteremmebldinogi
.t "aNgoain. Anyway, this one ... this wizard, the eye
twenty years,
he started looking for followers. There are too many of them — some are afraid,
some just
they want little of his authority, for he himself sought authority, all is true.
Dark
Dana, Harry. He didn't know who to trust, he didn't dare make a friendship
with strange
witch or witch ... A case of terrible things. He took advantage.
Of course, some
he resisted him-and he killed them. Terrible. One of the only safe places that
the others
it was Hogwarts. I mean, Dumbledore is the only one I-you know - who
Scarecrow
. He didn't dare try to grab the school, at least then.
"So your mom and dad were very good witches and wizards,
whom I ever knew.
In your time an older boy and a girl in Hogwarts! Suppose that
the secret to why I am
You know-who never tried to lure them to their side ... Probably
he knew that they were
too close to Dumbledore to want to have anything in common with The Dark
Country.
"Maybe, he thought he could convince them ... It may be, he is
he just wanted them to
picked up from the road. All that is known, this is what he appeared in the village, where
are all
lived on Halloween ten years ago. It was only a year for you.
old age. He came to yours
home and... and'...
Hagrid suddenly pulled a very dirty, placidly handkerchief and
his вnыosсeмоmрaкdаeлсaяsound similar to a siren.
"I'm sorry," he said. "But it's so sad-he knew your mom and
peodpaled,yaonudstbilelthtearv.en't been able to find ....
"You know who killed them. And then — and that's a real conundrum
all this — he tried to kill himself and make you too. He wanted to
make it clean, I guess.,
or, it could be, at that time he just loved to kill. But he could not
do it. He never thought
where did you get this kidnapping on your forehead? It was no ordinary cut. That's what
what
you've got, when it concerns you with strength, an evil curse-taken care of your
mom and dad
and even about your home, - but for you it didn't work out, and that's why you're famous,
Harry. No one lived after he decided to kill them, no one but
you, and
he killed several of the best witches and Wizards of the time — MacKinnon,
Bones, Pryettov — - and you were only a child, and you survived.
Something very painful is going on in Harry's head. The story of Hagrid
came to an end, he saw again the blinding flash of green
light, more clear than it is
he had ever remembered before, and he remembered something else,
for Hthe first time in his life: a high, cold, cruel laugh. agrid looked at him.
"He took you out of the destroyed house and alone, on the orders of Dumbledore.
He brought you all this..."
"Stupid room," said Uncle Vernon. Harry refused; he almost
forgot that Dursley were there. On Uncle Vernon, it seems,
restored courage. He looked at Hagrid ferociously, and that his fists were
compressed. "And now listen here, boy —" he said snarling, " I will confess, that in
you have something
strange, probably, nothing that wouldn't cure a good vzbuchka — and
as for all that, what about your parents, well, they're freaks, no
he denies it, and
in my opinion, without them the world is better-asked everything they had,
has been contacted with this magical kind-just what I expected, always
I knew it would be an uncomfortable ending ..."
But at this point Hagrid jumped off the bed and pulled out of-under his coat
ragged pink
umbrella. Pointing to this Uncle Vernon, like a sword, he
he sBaid, "I warn you, Dursley-I warn you-one more word ..." e exposed to the danger of being woven at the end of the umbrella
borodata the great,
the courage again ravaged Uncle Vernon; he pressed against the wall and
shut up.
"That's better ," said Hagrid, panting and sitting back on
the sofa, which was driven to the floor this time.
Harry, meanwhile, still wanted to ask questions, hundreds of
them.
"But what happened to the Ox?.., I'm sorry ... I mean, I-you know—who?"
to k"iGlloyoodu.qTuheastimona,kHesaryroyu. Hevee'sngmonoree. Hfaem'soguosn. eIt.'sThtheesbaimggeensitgchotnhuentdrrieudmt,oyou know.
... He is
he b"eScoammeesmayohree adnieddm. Coroedspuoowlleorpf
,ui
ln-wmhyy dopidinhioenle. aI vdeo?not know that
is there enough in him
human to die. Some say he's still out there somewhere, kind of like
it's still alive, but I
I don't believe that. The people who were on his side came back to us.
Some of them
they came out of some kind of trance. I don't think they were able to do that.
do it, if he would
returned.
"Most of us believe he's still out there somewhere, but he's lost his strength.
Too weak to continue. Because something in you stuck it, Harry. That night
something happened that he didn't count on — I don't know what it was,
no one knows - but, something in you put it at a dead end, that's true.
Hagrid looked at Harry with warmth and respect, fiery in his
eyes, but,
Harry, instead of feeling happy and proud, was completely sure that he would
it happened
terrible mistake. Wizard? He did? How could he possibly be? He is
spent his life,
ancestor beatings by Dudley and mistreatment by Aunt Petunia and Uncle Vernon;
if he is
really was a wizard, why did they not turn into warty growths
frogs every time
when did he try to lock it in the closet? If he had won the most
wizard in the world, why Dudley could always kick him
like a football ball?
"Hagrid," he said quietly, - I think, you should be, made
I thminikstIackaen. Ibdeoanw't izard."
To his surprise, Hagrid zakikota.
He's not a wizard, is he? You never made anything happen when you were
angscared or ry?"
Harry looked at the fire. He's thinking about it now ... All strange
the things that ever brought him to anger his aunt and uncle were betrayed, came when
Harry was frustrated or angry ... Chased by The Dudley gang, he somehow
was out of their reach ... afraid to walk to school with this funny
hair, he's unnatural to tear it off again ... and the last time when
Dudley
he hit him, he did not avenge, not even realizing, what is it doing?
Didn't he get married to him? Harry looked at Hagrid, smiling, and saw that Hagrid positively
smislimngiliantghim.
"See?"said Hagrid. "Harry Potter, not the magician — wait, you
you become them
a real person at Hogwarts."
But Uncle Vernon wouldn't give up without a fight.
"Did I not tell you that he would not go?"hissed on. "He will resist
Under well, he'll be grateful for that too. I read these emails, and
that he needs everyone
stup"iIdity-books of spells, magic sticks and ... f he wants to escape, such a big Maggle as you, no
stop it," he snarled.
Hagrid. "Don't let Lily and James Potter's son go to Hogwarts! You're crazy.
His
his name has been known since his birth. He finished that school.
witchcraft and magic in the world. Seven years there, and he did not learn
. He will be with the young men of his kind, for a change, and he will be under
start
the greatest director ever to be at Hogwarts, Albus Dumbledore...
"I'M NOT GONNA PAY SOME CHOKED OLD FOOL REALIZE THAT
I TAIUs GHT HIM FOCUS!"- cried Uncle Vernon.
But in the end, he went too far. Hagrid
umbrella and swung them
above the head: "never, - thunderously he, - never, never —
Albus —
DUMBLEDORE-PRE-ME!"
He lowered the umbrella, with a whistle cutting the air, to point to
Dudley-followed by a flash of purple light, sound, similar to a hlopush,
oštar
the next day, and in the next few seconds, he fell into place.
he grabs the hands for the fat ass, and howls with pain. When he turned to
them,
Harry saw a twisted porous tail, sticking out of a hole in his pants.
- Uncle Vernon yelled. Father-in-law and aunt-in-law
room, he threw his last frightened look at Hagrid and slumped to
the door to them.
Hagrid looked at his umbrella and patted his beard.
"It wasn't worth writing me out of myself," - it's sad, he said, " but
anytwhaayt.dHidenw'tawnoterkd to turn him into a pig, but, I believe, he was
it looks like a pig
therHeewloaoskveedrydloiwttlneaItcHoualrdrydfor.o"m under the bushy eyebrows.
"Be grateful if you didn't mention it to anyone at Hogwarts," - said
"Striischtley.speaking, I-uh— uh-should not engage in magic. Allowed me
is yes
a little follow you and send you your letter and the rest — one of the reasons
why am I so
he wanted to get into this business."
"Why shouldn't he spell?"asked Harry.
"Oh, well ... I studied at Hogwarts, but me ... uh... expelled, yes
yes,I tshaeytruth. On the third course. They broke my wand in half and all that.
But Dumbledore let me stay laser. A great man, Dumbledore.
"Why were you expelled?"
"It's getting late, and we have a lot of work tomorrow," he said loudly.
Hagrid.
"He has to go into town, pick up all his books and all that."
He removed his thick black coat and threw it to Harry.
"You can put it under that," he said. "I think I don't mind if
I stiall
lhitatlveewaigcouple of sex clubs in one of my pockets."
HP 1-Harry Potter
The magic stone
HEAD OF THE FIFTH
KOSI LANE
the next morning Harry woke up early. Although he could say he was
he kdeapytlihght, is eyes tightly closed.
"It was a dream," he said to himself. "I dreamed that a giant by name
Hagrid
he came to tell me that I was going to school for Wizards. When I opened
eyes, I will be
at home, in my closet."
Suddenly I hear the sound.
"And here is Aunt Petunia knocking at the door," thought Harry, and his heart
fell. But he still hasn't opened his eyes. It was such a beautiful dream.
Postukivai. Postukivai. Postukivai.
"Okay," Harry muttered, " I get up."
He sat down, and Hagrid's heavy coat fell off him. The cabin was full.
the sun was shining, the storm was over, Hagrid slept on
sale couch,
and in the window was posted kogtem owl with newspapers in
beaHk.arry jumped on his feet, so happy, it looked like he was inside.
he was blown up by a big balloon.
. He went straight to the window and jerked it open.
Flew an owl and dropped a newspaper on Hagrid, who did not wake up
. Then the owl sprung to the floor and began to attack Hagrid's coat. "Don't do that".
Harry tried to wish the guests from the owl, but she nailed her beak
she took a deep breath and continued her coat.
"Hagrid!"he called Harry. "There's an owl ..."
"Pay him," Hagrid snarled on the couch.
"What?"
"He wants to pay for the delivery of the newspaper. Look in your pockets."
Hagrid's coat, it looked made of a single pocket-ligaments
keys, bullet drobinok, motorcycle ropes, Mya sweets, bags
tea...finally, Harry
take"Gout a handful of money of a strange kind. ive him five knats," Hagrid said.
"Whips?"
"Small bronze."
Harry counts five small bronze coins, and the owl offers him a leg
so
Harry could put the money in a small leather bag, strapped to it.
Then he flew
throHuagghran open window. id loudly yavned, sat down and stretched out.
"Better go, Harry, I got you a lot of work today, it's necessary to take a trip
youirnsLchonoodlosntuafnfd."buy everything
Harry pretended magic coins and thought of them. He's just
thought about something, which caused him to feel like a balloon happiness
inside him
the curse. "Um-Hagrid?"
"Mm?"said Hagrid, who wore his huge boots.
"I have no money — and did you hear about Uncle Vernon last night ... He
they won't pay for it, that I went to study magic."
"Don't worry about it," said Hagrid, getting up and going.
head. "Do you think your parents have nothing left?"
"But if their house is destroyed ..."
"They don't keep their gold in the House, boy! First stop for us.
Gringotts. The Wizard's bank. Eat sausage, they're not so bad in
cold form, and " I would, too,
"I re"TfuhseerdeaarpeiebcaenokfsyionutrhefeWstiivzearcda?k"e."
"Only one. Gringotts. He runs the goblins."
Harry dropped a piece of sausage, which he held in his hand.
"Goblins?"
"Oh, so you'd be crazy, if you tried to rob her, here's what I'll do
tell you. Don't ever cry with the goblins, Harry. Greengotts-the safest place in the world for everything you are
do you want to save in security, except, may be, Hogwarts.
In fact, we still need to visit
Gringotts. To Dumbledore. Jobs at Hogwarts". Hagrid Gordo
. "I'm usually instructed to do important things for him. I give you —
I give things out of Gringotts-I know, that she can trust me to
you understand."
"He gathered everything? Then they left.
Harry followed Hagrid to the stone. The sky is clear now
and the sea in the blazing sun. The ship, hired by Uncle Vernon, is still
there, with plenty of water at the bottom after the storm.
"How did you get here?"- Asked Harry, looking in search of another
ships.
"Fly," said Hagrid.
"Flying?"
"Yeah, but we'll come back to this. It is not recommended to use
magic now that I have
I have you."
They settled in the boat, Harry still looked at Hagrid,
he dtreyliivnegrstoit flying.
"Although, it seems, the shame of the quarrel ," said Hagrid, throwing at Harry is still
one of
his hair stands. "If I am a little ... uh-uh-uh... speed up events, you wouldn't
he could
don't we mention that in Hogwarts?"
"Of course not," said Harry, eager to see more magic. Hagrid
pulled out again
pink umbrella, knock them on the boat twice, and they move
on the shore. "Why are you crazy, trying to rob Gringotts?"Asked Harry.
"Magic-magic," said Hagrid, unrolling the newspaper, while
talked. "They say storage facilities with a high level of security
Dragons guarded. And then you
must find your way-Gringotts is in hundreds of miles under London,
you understand. Deep
underground. You would die of starvation while trying to escape, even if
would you
he managed to get something in his hands.
Harry sat and thought about it, while Hagrid read his newspaper."
The Daily Prophet." Harry learned from Uncle Vernon, that people love when they
leave
in peace, when they do it, but it was very difficult, he never in his life
it was not so much
questions.
"The Ministry of magic, as usual, spoils everything" - mutters Hagrid,
pagseu. rrender
"Is there a Ministry of magic?"Asked Harry, before he managed to
andsStoapm.
"Of course," said Hagrid. "They are,
of course, they wanted the minister to be Dumbledore, but he would never leave
Hogwarts, so old Cornelius Fudge got the job.
A jerk, if that's what he was. So every morning he throws Dumbledore Owls,
looking for advice. "But what makes the Ministry of magic?"
"Well, their main job - to hide from the magglov, that still exists
witches and wizards all over the world.
"Why?"
"Why? Damn it, Harry, everyone would like to have magical solutions of their own
trouble. No, it's better to leave us alone."
At this point the ship gently weaves into the harbor wall. Hagrid
off the newspaper, and they climbed on serious steps onto the street.
Passers-by glanced much at Hagrid, as they walked through a small town on
stations. Harry couldn't blame them. Not only is Hagrid twice
above
all the others, he continued to point out quite ordinary things like
parking meters and
he says loudly, " do you see that, Harry? The things we make up these magglas, huh?
"Hagrid," said Harry, a little breathless he said, when he ran away, that no
in Ghreinsgaoidtt,s"eYthoeurseaaidre dragons?"
"Well, that's what they say," Hagrid said. "God, I want a dragon."
"You wouldn't refuse from one?"
"I wanted to drive like that from childhood."
They reached the station. Through five
the train left for London. Hagrid, who did not understand the " magglove
money, as he called it.,
he gOanvethtehetrbaills to Harry, so he could buy them tickets. in people were glowing more than ever. Hagrid took two places and
SEO strike something similar to canarečno-yellow circus tent.
"I still have your letter, Harry?"he asked, counting the stitches.
Harry took a parchment envelope out of his pocket.
"Well," said Hagrid. "There is a list of everything you
necessary".
Harry rolled up another sheet of paper, which he did not notice last night earlier, and read:
Form
Hogwarts School of Witchcraft and wizardry will require:
1. Three sets of simple workwear (black)
2. One simple pointed hat (black) for everyday wear
3. One pair of protective gloves (made of Dragon skin or similar)
4. One winter cloak (black with silver belt)
Please note, that on the clothes of all students should be
registered tags
On
Textbooks
on course
All students should have a copy of each of the following:
The Standard Book of magic (1st Class) by Miranda Goshawk
History of Magic Batil
Adalbert waffling's theory of magic
Guide for beginners to the transformation of Emery Switch
A thousand magical plants and fungi Fillidi Spor
Magical sketches and potions by Arsenius Jigger, " fantastic
creatures and where to find them " Ньюта Скамандр
Dark Forces: A Guide To Self-Healing Quentin Trimble
THIS EQUIPMENT
1 Magic Wand
1 boiler (tin, standard size 2)
1 set of glass or crystal washing units
1 set of telescopes
1 wind instruments
Students can also bring an owl, cat or frog
PARENTS ARE NOT ALLOWED TO
HE IS ALLOWED TO USE HIS BROOMS
"Can we buy it all in London?"Harry asked aloud.
"If you know where to go," Hagrid said.
Harry had never been to London before. Although Hagrid, it seems, knew
where he was on the road, he obviously wasn't used to coming there on
common
way. He was stuck at the ticket barrier in the metro and
loudly lamented that the places were too small, and the train was too slow. "I don't know how maggly prices without magic," he said, when they
it was started by slomannom escalator, who led on a busy street,
whiHchagstroidrews.as so great that he easily melted the mass; all that Harry
I had to do
is to keep closer to him. They have passed books and music stores,
hamburger restaurants and movie theaters, but there were no such places anywhere,
where it could be sold
you magic wand. It was just an ordinary street full of ordinary people.
Can they really be heaps of magical gold, trapped for many miles under
them? Are they
really shops selling books of magic and brooms? Can't you
all to be some
an ambitious joke, invented by Dursley? If Harry didn't know that
Dursley had no sense of humor, he could think so; and all the same,
in any case, even
despite the fact that everything Hagrid has said to him so far has been
incredibly, Harry could not.
don't trust him.
"That's him, "said Hagrid, stopping, - "a punctured boiler." It
famous place."
It was a small, nerdy-looking pub. If Hagrid had not pointed to
yes, Harry.
I wouldn't have noticed if it was. People, save the past, not even
they were talking about it.
Their eyes glided from the big bookstore on one side to the store
gramplastinox
others, as if they could not see the "pierced boiler"at all. In
the thing is, Harry.
the most strange feeling, that only he and Hagrid could see it. Before
what he could
to mention about it, Hagrid spent it inside.
For a well-known institution here it is very dark and miserable. A few older
woman
sat in the corner sipping small glasses of sherry. One of them smoked.
long pipes. The little man in the cylinder talked to the Old Bar,
completely bald and like a toothless nut. Low buzzing chatter stopped
when they entered. It seemed that they knew all Hagrid; they waved and
Smiley
him, and the bartender reached for the glass, saying, " As usual, Hagrid?"
"I can't, Tom, I'm for Hogwarts ," said Hagrid, clapping
with his great hands
a hand on Harry's shoulder, why Harry's knee is lifted.
"God gracious," said the bartender, peering at Harry, " that is... it can
? be
In the "Dyrya kotl" suddenly there was silence.
"Bless my soul," whispered the old bartender, " Harry Potter...what
honor".
He ran out of-for the river, rushed to Harry and grabbed him for
with tears in his eyes.
"With a return, Mr. Potter, with a return."
Harry didn't know what to say. Everyone was looking at him. Older
the woman with the pipe drank with her, not realizing that she had failed. Hagrid
Siala.
Then there was a loud gnashing of the chairs, and in the next
he ftohuenHdathrrayt mheomweanstputting everyone's hands in the "Dyer's cauldron".
"Doris Crawford, Mr. Potter, I can't believe it's finally
meeting with you."
"I'm so proud of you, Mr. Potter, I'm just so proud of you."
"I always wanted to shake my hand — I'm all trembling."
"Delighted, Mr. Potter, I just can't give you my name.
Diggle, Dedalus
Diggle".
"I've seen you before!"- said Harry, when the cylinder of Dedalus
his Dexigcigtleamlaendt.e"dOwneithdaayh, eyaodu obfow to me in the store."
"He remembers!"- exclaimed Daedalus Diggle, looking around, at everything.
"Did you hear that? He remembers me!"Harry ate his hands again and again —
Doris Crawford continued to return for interwoven.
A pale young man is his way forward, very nervous. One of his
eyes burst.
"Professor Quirrell!"said Hagrid. "Harry, Professor Quirrell will
youtrotebaecohneer oaft Hogwarts."
"N-n-Potter, - stuttering, mutters Professor Quirrell, grabbing Harry for
theyhacnadn-'twNit-he-xpress themselves, like n-glad to meet you".
"What magic do you teach, Professor Quirrell?"
"D-protection from D-D-dark art", - mutters Professor Quirrell,
althaosugh he'd rather not think about it. "N - not that you need that N, A, NN-Potter?"
He laughed nervously. "I guess you're n-getting all your gear?
We
n-you need to N-buy a new N-book about vampires, m-yourself. He looked
funky
the very thought.
But the others wouldn't let Prof. Quirrell leave Harry alone.
It took almost ten minutes to get away from them all. Finally,
Hagrid
to shout down the gungula, to hear it.
"You have to hurry-a lot to buy. Come On, Harry.
Doris Crawford briefly squeezed Harry's hand for the last time, and Hagrid
throhueglhedthtehebmar and went to a small, deserted terrace wall, where there was nothing,
except bin tanks and a few weeds.
Hagrid smirked Harry.
"I told you, didn't I? He told you that you were famous. Even the professor
Quirrell trembled at the meeting with you-notice, usually shaking."
"Is he always so nervous?"
"Oh, yeah. Poor creature. Brilliant mind. Everything was okay with him,
no bwohoikles,hbeust
ttuhdeinedhe took an annual vacation, to get some direct
experience....
They say he met a vampire in Schwartzwald, and he had problems with
since then, he has not been the same. Fear the Cold, Fear the cold
his own
now, where is my umbrella?"
Vampires? Witches? Harry's head is round. Hagrid
conisnidtehreedmbearinctkims ien the wall over garbage cans.
"Three up ... two inside..."- he mumbles. "So, run back, Harry."
He knocked three times on the wall on top of his umbrella.
The bricks, which she touched, quivered-he cuddled — in the middle,
a small opening appeared — it becomes wider and wider — a moment later, they
Su
before the arch, big enough, even for Hagrid, Luke on the moon
Street, which wandered and disappeared from view. "Welcome," said Hagrid,"to the hair of the flax."
He smirked astonishment at Harry. They went through the arch.
Harry quickly looked over his shoulder and saw, as he rounded the passage immediately
the Red Cross
bacTkhteo sthuen pwearsmsahnent wall. ining brightly on the lumps of the boilers near the nearest store.
Boilers - all sizes-copper, brass, - PIB, silver-with
automatic peremeshivanie -
Read the sign, hang over them. "Yes, you need him," said Hagrid, " but first we must take your
". money
Harry expressed regret that he did not have about eight more eyes. He
rotisserie heads at all
parties, as they walked on the street, trying to consider everything at once:
shops, things by them, people who work in shopping. Full woman
near the pharmacy shook his head, as they passed, saying:
"Dragon
liver, seventeen shekels per ounce, they're crazy..."
Low, soft hoots brought from the dark store with sign
"Eeylops
OVL Emporium " — "Eawny"," Screech"," Deca"," Brown "and"Snowy". Several
boy
about the same age, Yes and Harry, put his nose on the window, in
to whom brooms are exposed. "Look," Harry heard one of them say,
"New Nimbus two thousand...
faster everything..."There are stores that sell overcoats, stores that
selling telescopes and
strange silver tools Harry had never seen before, showcases,
ustavlenny
barrels with selezenkami bats and eyes eles, wobbly leg book
with magic, with feathers and
parchment rolls, potion bottles, Moon balloons....
"Gringotts," said Hagrid.
They came to the white building, which stood above the other
small magazines. Near his polished bronze door,
trained in
- go"lДd аu,nтifоoјrеmг,оsбtлaиndнi"n,g- т..и.хо је рекао Хагрид, када су порасли за њега по
белим
каменом корацима. Гоблин је око главу испод Хари. Имао је
тамно, паметан лице, истакао брадицу и, како је приметио Хари, веома
дуге прсте и
стопала. Он се поклони, када су ушли унутра. Сада су стајали пред други
пар
врата, овај пут сребра, угравиран на њих речима:
Дај, чужеземец, али будите пажљиви
да очекује грех похлепе,
јер они који узима, али не зарађује,
заузврат, треба да плати скупље од свега.
Дакле,
Лопов, ако ви тражите под нашим полова
благо које никада није био твој, вас упозоравали, чувајте се
тамо наћи нешто више него само благо.
"Као што сам већ рекао, ти би био луд ако бих покушао да је опљачка", -
рекао је Хагрид.
Пар гоблина са луком, пропустила их кроз сребрна врата, и они су се
нашли у
огромном мермерним сали. Још око стотину гоблини су седели на високим
табуретках
за дугом пулта, записује нешто у велике гроссбухи, мерење предлог новца
на бакарне равнотежи,
с обзиром драгуље кроз наочаре. Било је превише врата, да
рачунају, што је довело из собе, и све више гоблини показали људима да
уђу и изађу
из њих. Хагрид и Хари кренули на фронт.
"Добро јутро", - рекао је Хагрид слободном гоблину. "Дошли смо да
новпаоцкиузпибензебшедтное господин Хари Потер".
"Имате га кључ, господине?"
"Негде овде узео", - рекао је Хагрид и почео да вытряхивать садржај
џепсоввоајинха шалтеру, рассыпав шаку заплесневелых пас галет у
књизи бројева гоблин. Гоблин сморщил нос. Харри је гледао, као
гоблин десно од њих взвешивал брдо рубинима величине жар.
"Схватио", - коначно је рекао Хагрид, проширујући мали златни кључ.
Гоблин је пажљиво погледао у њу.
"Мислим да је то у реду ствари".
"И још имам овде писмо од професора Дамблдора", -
важно је рекао Хагрид, выпячивая груди. "То је због Себе-Знам-Чега у
спремиште
седГам стотина и тринаест". облин пажљиво прочитао писмо.
"Врло добро", - рекао је он, враћајући га Хагриду, "Ја ћу питати некога
узмите вас у оба спремишта. Крюкохват!" Грипхук је био још један гоблином. Чим Хагрид распихал све дог
галеты назад у џеповима, они са Хари је уследио Грипхуком на једна од
врата водећих из публике.
"Шта је Сами Знате-Да је у спремишту седам стотина и тринаест?"
- Упита Хари.
"Не могу да вам кажем", - рекао је мистериозно Хагрид. "Веома
бизпноивсе.рДљаимвбол.дХооргјвеарветсровао у мене. Више него што је мој посао, вреди да
вамГкраижпхеумктпор"и.держал за њих отворена врата. Хари, који је очекивао да
види више од
мермера, био је изненађен. Они су се нашли у ужем каменог пролаза,
осветљеном сјајне
бакље. Она је кул довела доле, и на
поду су мале пруге. Грипхук досудио, и на шинама на
њега подкатила мала колица. Они забрались унутра — Хагрид са неким
тешкоћама — и отчалили.
Прво, они само возио кроз лавиринт кривудавим пролаза. Хари је
покушао
да се сетим: лева, десна, десна, лева, средња развилка, десна, лева, али је
то било немогуће.
Дребезжащая колица, изгледало је знала свој пут, јер Грипхук није
управљао.
Очи Хари защипало, када се хладан ваздух пожурили поред њих, али он
је задржао их
широко отворене. Једном му се чинило, да је он видео блиц ватре на крају
пролаза и
окренуо да види, не змај ли то, али прекасно — они потонуо још
дубље, након доношења подземно језеро, где са плафона и пода су расле
огромне сталактита и сталагмита
.
"Ја никада не знам", " повика Хари Хагриду кроз буку колица, "шта
разлика између сталагмитом и сталактитом?"
"У сталагмите је слово "м"", - рекао је Хагрид. "И не задавай ми питања
управо сада, ја мислим да ме сада стошнит".
Он је заиста изгледао веома зелено, и када колица коначно зауставио у
малом
врата у зиду ходника, Хагрид је изашао, и морао је да наслоните се на зид,
да ублажи
дрхти у коленима.
Крюкохват отвори врата. Одатле повалило много зелене дима,
и када је очишћено, Хари уздахну. Унутра су биле планине златника.
Колоне од
сребра. Гомиле малих бронзаних кнатов. "Цео твој", - насмешио Хагрид.
Све што је припадало Хари — било је невероватно. Дурсли нису могли
да знају
о томе, у супротном, они би добили од њега брже него моргнули. Колико
често
су се жалили, у колико им обходилось садржај Хари? И све ово време
дубоко испод Лондона
је у власништву му мало богатство.
Хагрид помогао Хари је искључен део новца у торби.
"Златне - то је галија", - објаснио је он. "Седамнаест сикала сребра за
Галлеон и двадесет девет кнатов за сикль, то је довољно једноставно.
Истина, то би требало
да буде довољно за неколико услова, остало ми прибережем за вас. Он је
окренуо
Крюкохвату. "Сада, молим вас, спремиште седам стотина и тринаест, и не
би ми се креће
помедленнее?"
"Само једна стопа", - рекао је Крюкохват.
Сада су опадајуће још дубље и добили брзину. Ваздух је постао
све хладније и хладније као што су проносились на стрмим поворотам. Они
потресен летели над
подземним ущельем, и Хари перегнулся преко палубе, покушавајући да
види шта се налази на дну,
на тамном дну, али Хагрид и почела да кукам: оттащил га назад иза
наопако.
У спремиште седам стотина и тринаест није било кључаоницу.
"Одлази", - важно је рекао Крюкохват. Он је нежно потапшао врата
један од његових дугих прстију, и она једноставно истопио.
"Ако неко, осим гринготтского гоблин, покушао да то уради, његова би
враутвауичеонн дјеолбеиокрдоазтамо заробљени", - рекао је Крюкохват.
"Колико често си проверяешь, да ли је неко унутра?" Упита Хари.
"Отприлике једном у десет година", - рекао је Крюкохват са прилично
непријатној осмехом.
Нешто заиста необично је морало бити унутар овог посебно заштићених
спремишта,
Хари је био сигуран, и он је нестрпљиво нагнуо напред, очекујући да види,
барем, феноменалне драгуље — али прво, он је мислио да је она празна. Затим, он је приметио на поду
прљави
мали свежањ умотан у браон папир. Хагрид подигао га
и заглавио мало дубље у џеп свог капута. Хари страсно желео да сазна шта
је то било, али је знао да
је боље да не питам.
"Хајде, врати се у овај паклени колима, и не разговара са мном на путу
назад, да ће бити боље ако ја ћу држати уста затворена", - рекао је Хагрид.
Кроз једну луду вожњу караван су стајали, скуинтинг од сунчеве
Харсивентилјеосзтниа,оугбдлеидзаинсеи пГорбиенггноеттнсаа.првом месту сада, када је имао торба
пуна новца. Му
није било потребно да знате колико галеонов у фунте, да схвате да је код
њега
било више новца, него за цео његов живот — више него што је
икада била чак и код Дадли.
"Са истим успехом си могао да се униформой", - рекао је Хагрид,
климајући главом на Плашт мадам
Малкин за све прилике. "Слушај, Хари, ти нећеш сметати ако сам
ускользну
да покупи ме у "Дырявом котлу"? Мрзим ове колица од Гринготтса". Он је
тако и урадио
и даље је изгледао мало болестан, тако да је Хари отишао у продавницу
мадам Малкин један,
нерМвнаидчаамяМ. алкин је приземистой, улыбающейся вештице, одевени у све
лиловое.
"Хогвартс, драги?" - питала је, када је Хари је почео да говори. "Добио
много
то је — још један млади човек, који као пут сада подгоняют".
У задњем делу продавнице дечак са бледо, шиљаст лице је стајао на
скамеечке за ноге, док је други вештица закалывала његове дуге црне
хаљине. Мадам Малкин
је ставио Хари на столицу поред њега, стави му кроз главу дугу плашт и
почетка
подколачивать га до жељене дужине.
"Здраво", - рекао је дечак. "Ти си превише од Хогвартса?"
"Да", рече Хари.
"Мој отац је у суседству купује ми књиге, а мама је и даље на улици
разматра чаробне штапиће", - рекао је дечак. Имао је досадно, нацртана
глас. "Онда ја
ћу оттащить их уче на трке метле. Ја не разумем зашто бруцоша не може
да буде своје. Мислим, ја ћу отац ми купи такву ствар и
као нешто пронесу њен кријумчарења". Хари је снажно подсетио Дадли.
"Имаш своју метла?" - наставио је дечак.
"Не", - рекао је Хари.
"Уопште играте квиддич?"
"Не", - поново рече Хари, задаваясь питате како је дођавола може бити
квиддич.
"Ја верујем — отац каже да је то злочин, ако ме не изаберу да играју за
мој дом
и морам да кажем, ја се слажем. Ви већ знате, у ком кући ћеш живети?
"Не", - рекао је Хари, осећајући се све више глупо са сваког минута.
"Па, нико заправо не зна, док се не доберутся тамо, зар не, али ја знам
да
без обзира да ли смо у Слизерине, цела наша породица је била тамо —
замислите, да ли сам у Хаффлпаффе, ја мислим,
ја б"иМх мотми"ш, -арое,каатоијесиХ?а"ри, желећи да могао да кажем нешто мало више
питам.
"Слушај, погледајте овог човека!" - изненада рече дечак, климајући
главом у правцу предњег
прозора. Тамо је стајао Хагрид, кези Хари и показујући на два велика
прах, да покаже да он не може да уђе. "То је Хагрид", - рекао је Хари, задовољан чињеницом да зна нешто што
"ОннреаздниаудХечогавка.ртсе".
"О," рекао је дечак, "чуо сам о њему. Он је нешто попут слуге, зар не?"
"Он је ловац", - рекао је Хари. Дечак волео да му све мање и мање
са сваким секунде.
"Да, управо тако. Ја сам чуо, он је нешто попут дивљака - живи у колиби
и с нваретмеерниатонраивјирешмкеослее опијају, покушава да дочара и цумс оним што
поджигаю његов кревет".
"Ја мислим, он је фантастичан", - хладно, рекао је Хари.
"А ти?" - питао је дечак са лаким осмехом на лицу. "Зашто је са вама?
твојГидреодитељи?"
"Они су мртви", - кратко рекао је Хари. Он није желео да улазим у
шта је било са овим дечаком.
"О, жао ми је", - рекао је други, у глас који није био жаљења. "Али они
врсстуе,нзаашрене?"
"Они су вештице и чаробњак, ако ти то имаш на уму".
"Ја заиста не мислим да би требало да пустим неког другог, зар не? Они
не ксауосдаамоих никада није имао, да су знали наше обичаје. Замислите, неки
од њих
никада нису ни чули о Хогвартсе, док не добију писмо. Ја мислим да они
треба да га чувате у старим магичних породицама. Узгред, како ти је
презиме?
Али пре него што је Хари имао времена да одговори, мадам Малкин је
рекла: "ти Си завршио,
мој драги", и Хари, не пожалев о предлоге прекине разговор са дечаком,
скочио
са клупа за ноге.
"Па, ја претпостављам, видимо се у Хогвартсе", - рекао је дечак,
истезање речи.
Хари је био прилично миран, док је јео сладолед, који је купио му
Хагрид
(чоколада малина са сецканим орасима).
"Шта се десило?" - питао Хагрид.
"Ништа", - лагао Хари. Они су престали да купите пергамент и перје.
малХоапррииободрился, када је пронашао боцу мастила, који су променили
боју у зависности од тога како си ти написао.
Кад"аБсоужиез, аХшарлии,ијаз сптраолднаовнзиабцоер, аовнљјеампиктааоом: "аХлаогтриидз,ншашта—јенкевзиндадшич?"
о квиддиче!"
"Не терај ме да се осећају још горе," - рекао је Хари. Он је рекао
дечХаакгуроиддумаодбалмедМоајлкин.
"... и он је рекао да људи из маггловских породице чак и не би требало
у ...д"а пусти
"Ти си не од маггловской породице. Ако је знао ко си ти такав — он је
одрастао, знајући твоје име, ако га родитељи - чаробњаци. Да ли си видео,
на шта
су слични све у "Дырявом котлу", када су видели те. У сваком случају, шта
он зна о томе, неке од најбољих које сам икада видео, били једини који
поседује
магију у дугом низу магглов — погледајте своју маму! Види, да је имала
од сестре!"
"Дакле, шта је квиддич?"
"Ово је наш спорт. Магиц спорт. То је као ... као фудбал у свету магглов
— све прате квиддичем — играју у ваздуху на метле, и
тамо четири лопте — прилично тешко објаснити правила ".
"А шта је Слизерин и Хаффлпафф?"
"Школске зграде. Њих четири. Сви кажу да је у Хаффлпаффе пун
придурков, али...
"Кладим се, ја сам у Хаффлпаффе", - суморно рече Хари.
"Боље Хаффлпафф, него Слизерин", - рекао је смркнуто Хагрид. "Не
ни једне вештице или чаробњака који су лошим, који не би били у
Слизерине. Сам-Знаш-Који
је б"иВоојлеадан од њих". -, жао ми је —сами знате-ко је био у Хогвартсе?"
"Пре Много година", - рекао је Хагрид.
Они су купили Хари школски уџбеници у продавници под називом
где"пФоллоирциешдои пБллаофттосн"а су се књиге величине брусчатку
, переплетенными у кожу; књиге величине поштанске марке у свиле
корицама; књиге,
пуне чудних знакова, и неколико књига у којима ништа није било. Чак
Дадли, који никада ништа није читао, био би ми драго да се дочепа
неке од њих. Хагриду скоро морао да оттаскивать Хари од "Псовке и
контрзаклятий" (Околдуй своје пријатеље и одурми непријатеља
Најсавременије начине освете: губитак косе, Желеобразные ноге,
заплетающийся језик и још много, много тога)
проф Виндиктуса Виридиана.
"Покушавао сам да схватим како да псујем Дадли".
"Ја не кажем да је то лоша идеја, али ти не би требало да користе магију
Свеуту магглов, осим веома посебне околности", - рекао је Хагрид. "И у
сваком случају,
ти си све док се није могао применити ни једну од ових псовке, потребно је
да ће бити још пуно тога да науче, пре него што
дођете до тог нивоа".
Хагрид и није дозволио да се Хари купити бојлер од чистог злата ("На
листи је написано
"лимена""), али они су добили добар сет ваге за мерење тежине
састојака за напитака и склапање дувачки телескоп. Затим су посетили
Апотеку,
која је била довољно шармантан, да би ужасан мирис, мешавина трулих
јаја и труо купуса. На поду је стајао бурад са склизкой дрянью; дуж зидова
су стајали банке са биљем,
сушене корене и светлим прах; са плафона сноповима висиле перја,
лигамената
очњака и загнутых канџи. Док Хагрид тражио човека
иза пулта обезбеде Хари неким основним састојцима за напитака, Хари
сам прегледао сребрне трубе једнорога на двадесет један галлеон по
комаду и
ситне бриљантно-црне очи буба (по пет кнат по кашика).
Изађоше из Апотеке, Хагрид поново проверио листу Хари.
"Остао је само твоја штапић — А да, и ја још увек није припремио вам
". поклон за рођендан
Хари осетио да руменила.
"Не мора да..."
, "Ја знам, да не мора. То је оно што ја ћу вам рећи, ја ћу узети твоје
животиња. Не жаба,
жаба је изашао из моде пре много година, над вама би се насмејао и "ја не
волим мачке,
од њих сам чихаю. Ја подарю ти сову. Сва деца желе да сове, они су веома
корДисни, ширење твоју поруку и све то ". вадесет минута касније, они су напустили тржни центар Eeylops Овл
Emporium, који је био
мрак и пун шорохов и треперава, светле, како да драгуље око. Сада Хари је
носио
велику ћелију, у којој је седео лепа снег-бела сова, чврсто спавање,
скривали главу под
крило. Он није могао да престанем да мумбле речи захвалности, муцање,
баш као професор
Квиррелл.
"Не помињу о томе", - промукло је рекао Хагрид. "Не очекујемо да си
добио много
поклона од ових Дурслей. Сада су остали само Олливандеры — једино
место за штапића,
Олливандеры, и вас би требало да буде најбоља штапић ".
Чаробни штапић ... То је оно што Хари заиста са нестрпљењем чекао.
Последњи продавница је уска и обшарпанным. Облупившиеся златна
просчлиотваао:иОзнлалдивварнадтаеры: Произвођачи дивних магичних штапова са 382.
године пре нове ере На
избКлеаддеалсаупуушрлпиурним јастук у пыльного прозора лежала је једина штапић.
унутра, негде у дубини продавнице звона звоно. То је мали градић, празан,
ако се не рачунају јединог шаткого столице, на којој Хагрид
је седео и чекао. Хари доживела чудан осећај, као да је ушао у веома
строгу библиотеку;
он је прогутао мноштво нових питања, који је управо дошао му је у главу, а
уместо тога погледао
на хиљаде уским кутије, уредно наслагане до самог плафона. Из
неког разлога он покалывало потиљак. Сама прашина и тишина овде
, изгледало је реализовао неку тајну магију.
“Good afternoon,” said a soft voice. Harry jumped. Hagrid must have
jumped, too, because there was a loud crunching noise and he got quickly off
the
spinAdnlyochair. ld man was standing before them, his wide, pale eyes shining like
moons through the gloom of the shop.
“Hello,” said Harry awkwardly.
“Ah yes,” said the man. “Yes, yes. I thought I’d be seeing you soon.
Harry Potter.” It wasn’t a question. “You have your mother’s eyes. It seems
only
yesterday she was in here herself, buying her first wand. Ten and a quarter
inchMesr.lOonllgiv,asnwdieshrym, omvaeddecolofsweir
lltoowH. aNr
ircye. wHaanrrdyfworischheadrmhewwoorukl
.d” blink.
Those silvery eyes were a bit creepy.
“Your father, on the other hand, favored a mahogany wand. Eleven
inches. Pliable. A little more power and excellent for transfiguration. Well, I
say
your father favored it — it’s really the wand that chooses the wizard, of
course.”
Mr. Ollivander had come so close that he and Harry were almost nose to
nose. Harry could see himself reflected in those misty eyes.
“And that’s where…” Mr. Ollivander touched the lightning scar on Harry’s forehead with a
long, white finger.
“I’m sorry to say I sold the wand that did it,” he said softly. “Thirteenand-a-half inches. Yew. Powerful wand, very powerful, and in the wrong
hands…well, if I’d known what that wand was going out into the world to do. …” He shook his head and then, to Harry’s relief, spotted Hagrid.
“Rubeus! Rubeus Hagrid! How nice to see you again.…Oak, sixteen
inches, rather bendy, wasn’t it?”
“It was, sir, yes,” said Hagrid.
“Good wand, that one. But I suppose they snapped it in half when you
got expelled?” said Mr. Ollivander, suddenly stern.
“Er — yes, they did, yes,” said Hagrid, shuffling his feet. “I’ve still got
the pieces, though,” he added brightly.
“But you don’t use them?” said Mr. Ollivander sharply.
“Oh, no, sir,” said Hagrid quickly. Harry noticed he gripped his pink
umbrella very tightly as he spoke.
“Hmmm,” said Mr. Ollivander, giving Hagrid a piercing look. “Well,
now — Mr. Potter. Let me see.” He pulled a long tape measure with silver
markings out of his pocket. “Which is your wand arm?”
“Er — well, I’m right-handed,” said Harry.
“Hold out your arm. That’s it.” He measured Harry from shoulder to
finger, then wrist to elbow, shoulder to floor, knee to armpit and round his
head.
As he measured, he said, “Every Ollivander wand has a core of a powerful
magical substance, Mr. Potter. We use unicorn hairs, phoenix tail feathers, and
the heartstrings of dragons. No two Ollivander wands are the same, just as no
two unicorns, dragons, or phoenixes are quite the same. And of course, you will
never get such good results with another wizard’s wand.” Harry suddenly realized that the tape measure, which was measuring
between his nostrils, was doing this on its own. Mr. Ollivander was flitting
around the shelves, taking down boxes.
“That will do,” he said, and the tape measure crumpled into a heap on the
floor. “Right then, Mr. Potter. Try this one. Beechwood and dragon heartstring.
Nine inches. Nice and flexible. just take it and give it a wave.”
Harry took the wand and (feeling foolish) waved it around a bit, but Mr.
Ollivander snatched it out of his hand almost at once.
“Maple and phoenix feather. Seven inches. Quite whippy. Try —”
Harry tried — but he had hardly raised the wand when it, too, was
snatched back by Mr. Ollivander.
“No, no — here, ebony and unicorn hair, eight and a half inches, springy.
Go on, go on, try it out.”
Harry tried. And tried. He had no idea what Mr. Ollivander was waiting
for. The pile of tried wands was mounting higher and higher on the spindly
chair,
but the more wands Mr. Ollivander pulled from the shelves, the happier he
seemed to become. “Tricky customer, eh? Not to worry, we’ll find the perfect match here
somewhere — I wonder, now — yes, why not — unusual combination — holly
and phoenix feather, eleven inches, nice and supple.”
Harry took the wand. He felt a sudden warmth in his fingers. He raised
the wand above his head, brought it swishing down through the dusty air and a
stream of red and gold sparks shot from the end like a firework, throwing
dancing spots of light on to the walls. Hagrid whooped and clapped and Mr.
Ollivander cried, “Oh, bravo! Yes, indeed, oh, very good. Well, well, well…how
curious…how very curious…”
He put Harry’s wand back into its box and wrapped it in brown paper,
still muttering, “Curious…curious…
“Sorry,” said Harry, “but what’s curious?” Mr. Ollivander fixed Harry with his pale stare.
“I remember every wand I’ve ever sold, Mr. Potter. Every single wand. It
so happens that the phoenix whose tail feather is in your wand, gave another
feather — just one other. It is very curious indeed that you should be destined
for
thisHwand when its brother — why, its brother gave you that scar.” arry swallowed.
“Yes, thirteen-and-a-half inches. Yew. Curious indeed how these things
happen. The wand chooses the wizard, remember…I think we must expect
great
things from you, Mr. Potter….After all, He-Who-Must-Not-Be-Named did great
thinHgs — terrible, yes, but great.” arry shivered. He wasn’t sure he liked Mr. Ollivander too much. He
paid seven gold Galleons for his wand, and Mr. Ollivander bowed them from
his
shop.
The late afternoon sun hung low in the sky as Harry and Hagrid made their
way back down Diagon Alley, back through the wall, back through the Leaky
Cauldron, now empty. Harry didn’t speak at all as they walked down the road;
he
didn’t even notice how much people were gawking at them on the
Underground,
laden as they were with all their funny-shaped packages, with the snowy owl
asleep in its cage on Harry’s lap. Up another escalator, out into Paddington
station; Harry only realized where they were when Hagrid tapped him on the
shoulder.
“Got time fer a bite to eat before yer train leaves,” he said.
He bought Harry a hamburger and they sat down on plastic seats to eat
them. Harry kept looking around. Everything looked so strange, somehow.
“You all right, Harry? Yer very quiet,” said Hagrid.
Harry wasn’t sure he could explain. He’d just had the best birthday of his
life — and yet — he chewed his hamburger, trying to find the words.
“Everyone thinks I’m special,” he said at last. “All those people in the
Leaky Cauldron, Professor Quirrell, Mr. Ollivander…but I don’t know anything
about magic at all. How can they expect great things? I’m famous and I can’t
even remember what I’m famous for. I don’t know what happened when Vol-,
sorry — I mean, the night my parents died.”
Hagrid leaned across the table. Behind the wild beard and eyebrows he
wore a very kind smile.
“Don’ you worry, Harry. You’ll learn fast enough. Everyone starts at the
beginning at Hogwarts, you’ll be just fine. Just be yerself. I know it’s hard.
Yeh’ve been singled out, an’ that’s always hard. But yeh’ll have a great time at
Hogwarts — I did — still do, ’smatter of fact.”
Hagrid helped Harry on to the train that would take him back to the
Dursleys, then handed him an envelope.
“Yer ticket fer Hogwarts, “ he said. “First o’ September — King’s Cross — it’s all on yer ticket. Any problems with the Dursleys, send me a letter with
yer owl, she’ll know where to find me….See yeh soon, Harry.”
The train pulled out of the station. Harry wanted to watch Hagrid until he
was out of sight; he rose in his seat and pressed his nose against the window,
but
he blinked and Hagrid had gone.
HP 1 - Harry Potter and the
Sorcerer's Stone
CHAPTER SIX
THE JOURNEY FROM PLATFORM NINE AND THREE-QUARTERS
H arry’s last month with the Dursleys wasn’t fun. True, Dudley was now so
scared of Harry he wouldn’t stay in the same room, while Aunt Petunia and
Uncle Vernon didn’t shut Harry in his cupboard, force him to do anything, or
shout at him — in fact, they didn’t speak to him at all. Half terrified, half
furious, they acted as though any chair with Harry in it were empty. Although
this was an improvement in many ways, it did become a bit depressing after a
while.
Harry kept to his room, with his new owl for company. He had decided to
call her Hedwig, a name he had found in A History of Magic. His school books
were very interesting. He lay on his bed reading late into the night, Hedwig
swooping in and out of the open window as she pleased. It was lucky that Aunt
Petunia didn’t come in to vacuum anymore, because Hedwig kept bringing
back
dead mice. Every night before he went to sleep, Harry ticked off another day
on
the piece of paper he had pinned to the wall, counting down to September the
first.On the last day of August he thought he’d better speak to his aunt and
uncle about getting to King’s Cross station the next day, so he went down to
the
living room where they were watching a quiz show on television. He cleared
his
throat to let them know he was there, and Dudley screamed and ran from the
room.
“Er — Uncle Vernon?”
Uncle Vernon grunted to show he was listening.
“Er — I need to be at King’s Cross tomorrow to — to go to Hogwarts.”
Uncle Vernon grunted again.
“Would it be all right if you gave me a lift?”
Grunt. Harry supposed that meant yes.
“Thank you.”
He was about to go back upstairs when Uncle Vernon actually spoke.
“Funny way to get to a wizards’ school, the train. Magic carpets all got
punctures, have they?”
Harry didn’t say anything.
“Where is this school, anyway?”
“I don’t know,” said Harry, realizing this for the first time. He pulled the
ticket Hagrid had given him out of his pocket.
“I just take the train from platform nine and three-quarters at eleven
o’clock,” he read.
His aunt and uncle stared.
“Platform what?”
“Nine and three-quarters.”
“Don’t talk rubbish,” said Uncle Vernon. “There is no platform nine and
three-quarters.”
“It’s on my ticket.”
“Barking,” said Uncle Vernon, “howling mad, the lot of them. You’ll see.
You just wait. All right, we’ll take you to King’s Cross. We’re going up to
London tomorrow anyway, or I wouldn’t bother.”
“Why are you going to London?” Harry asked, trying to keep things
friendly.
“Taking Dudley to the hospital,” growled Uncle Vernon. “Got to have
that ruddy tail removed before he goes to Smeltings.”
Harry woke at five o’clock the next morning and was too excited and
nervous to go back to sleep. He got up and pulled on his jeans because he
didn’t
want to walk into the station in his wizard’s robes — he’d change on the train.
He checked his Hogwarts list yet again to make sure he had everything he
needed, saw that Hedwig was shut safely in her cage, and then paced the
room,
waiting for the Dursleys to get up. Two hours later, Harry’s huge, heavy trunk
had been loaded into the Dursleys’ car, Aunt Petunia had talked Dudley into
sitting next to Harry, and they had set off. They reached King’s Cross at half past ten. Uncle Vernon dumped
Harry’s trunk onto a cart and wheeled it into the station for him. Harry thought
this was strangely kind until Uncle Vernon stopped dead, facing the platforms
with a nasty grin on his face.
“Well, there you are, boy. Platform nine — platform ten. Your platform
should be somewhere in the middle, but they don’t seem to have built it yet, do
they?”
He was quite right, of course. There was a big plastic number nine over
one platform and a big plastic number ten over the one next to it, and in the
middle, nothing at all.
“Have a good term,” said Uncle Vernon with an even nastier smile. He
left without another word. Harry turned and saw the Dursleys drive away. All
three of them were laughing. Harry’s mouth went rather dry. What on earth
was
he going to do? He was starting to attract a lot of funny looks, because of
Hedwig. He’d have to ask someone.
He stopped a passing guard, but didn’t dare mention platform nine and
three-quarters. The guard had never heard of Hogwarts and when Harry
couldn’t
even tell him what part of the country it was in, he started to get annoyed, as
though Harry was being stupid on purpose. Getting desperate, Harry asked for
the train that left at eleven o’clock, but the guard said there wasn’t one. In the
end the guard strode away, muttering about time wasters. Harry was now
trying
hard not to panic. According to the large clock over the arrivals board, he had
ten
minutes left to get on the train to Hogwarts and he had no idea how to do it; he
was stranded in the middle of a station with a trunk he could hardly lift, a
pocket
full of wizard money, and a large owl.
Hagrid must have forgotten to tell him something you had to do, like
tapping the third brick on the left to get into Diagon Alley. He wondered if he
should get out his wand and start tapping the ticket inspector’s stand between
platforms nine and ten.
At that moment a group of people passed just behind him and he caught a
few words of what they were saying.
“— packed with Muggles, of course —”
Harry swung round. The speaker was a plump woman who was talking to
four boys, all with flaming red hair. Each of them was pushing a trunk like
Harry’s in front of him — and they had an owl.
Heart hammering, Harry pushed his cart after them. They stopped and so
did he, just near enough to hear what they were saying.
“Now, what’s the platform number?” said the boys’ mother.
“Nine and three-quarters!” piped a small girl, also red-headed, who was
holding her hand, “Mom, can’t I go…”
“You’re not old enough, Ginny, now be quiet. All right, Percy, you go
first.”What looked like the oldest boy marched toward platforms nine and ten.
Harry watched, careful not to blink in case he missed it — but just as the boy
reached the dividing barrier between the two platforms, a large crowd of
tourists
came swarming in front of him and by the time the last backpack had cleared
awa“yF,rtehde, byoyu hnaedxtv,”anthisehpeldu.mp woman said.
“I’m not Fred, I’m George,” said the boy. “Honestly, woman, you call
yourself our mother? Can’t you tell I’m George?”
“Sorry, George, dear.”
“Only joking, I am Fred,” said the boy, and off he went. His twin called
after him to hurry up, and he must have done so, because a second later, he
had
gonNeo—wbtuhtehthowirdhbadrohtheedrownaesitw?alking briskly toward the barrier he was
almost there — and then, quite suddenly, he wasn’t anywhere.
There was nothing else for it.
“Excuse me,” Harry said to the plump woman.
“Hello, dear,” she said. “First time at Hogwarts? Ron’s new, too.”
She pointed at the last and youngest of her sons. He was tall, thin, and
gangling, with freckles, big hands and feet, and a long nose.
“Yes,” said Harry. “The thing is — the thing is, I don’t know how to —”
“How to get onto the platform?” she said kindly, and Harry nodded.
“Not to worry,” she said. “All you have to do is walk straight at the
barrier between platforms nine and ten. Don’t stop and don’t be scared you’ll
crash into it, that’s very important. Best do it at a bit of a run if you’re nervous.
Go on, go now before Ron.”
“Er — okay,” said Harry.
He pushed his trolley around and stared at the barrier. It looked very
solid.
He started to walk toward it. People jostled him on their way to platforms
nine and ten. Harry walked more quickly. He was going to smash right into
that
barrier and then he’d be in trouble — leaning forward on his cart, he broke
into a
heavy run — the barrier was coming nearer and nearer — he wouldn’t be able
to
stop — the cart was out of control — he was a foot away — he closed his eyes
ready for the crash —
It didn’t come…he kept on running…he opened his eyes. A scarlet steam
engine was waiting next to a platform packed with people. A sign overhead
said
Hogwarts’ Express, eleven o’clock. Harry looked behind him and saw a
wrought-iron archway where the barrier had been, with the words Platform
Nine
and Three-Quarters on it, He had done it.
Smoke from the engine drifted over the heads of the chattering crowd,
while cats of every color wound here and there between their legs. Owls
hooted
to one another in a disgruntled sort of way over the babble and the scraping of
heaTvyh trunks. e first few carriages were already packed with students, some hanging
out of the window to talk to their families, some fighting over seats. Harry
pushed his cart off down the platform in search of an empty seat. He passed a
round-faced boy who was saying, “Gran, I’ve lost my toad again.”
“Oh, Neville,” he heard the old woman sigh.
A boy with dreadlocks was surrounded by a small crowd.
“Give us a look, Lee, go on.”
The boy lifted the lid of a box in his arms, and the people around him
shrieked and yelled as something inside poked out a long, hairy leg.
Harry pressed on through the crowd until he found an empty
compartment near the end of the train. He put Hedwig inside first and then
started to shove and heave his trunk toward the train door. He tried to lift it up
the steps but could hardly raise one end and twice he dropped it painfully on
his
foot.“Want a hand?” It was one of the red-haired twins he’d followed through
the barrier.
“Yes, please,” Harry panted.
“Oy, Fred! C’mere and help!” With the twins’ help, Harry’s trunk was at last tucked away in a corner of
the compartment.
“Thanks,” said Harry, pushing his sweaty hair out of his eyes.
“What’s that?” said one of the twins suddenly, pointing at Harry’s
lightning scar.
“Blimey,” said the other twin. “Are you —?”
“He is,” said the first twin. “Aren’t you?” he added to Harry.
“What?” said Harry.
“Harry Potter.” chorused the twins.
“Oh, him,” said Harry. “I mean, yes, I am.”
The two boys gawked at him, and Harry felt himself turning red. Then, to
his relief, a voice came floating in through the train’s open door.
“Fred? George? Are you there?”
“Coming, Mom.” With a last look at Harry, the twins hopped off the train.
Harry sat down next to the window where, half hidden, he could watch
the red-haired family on the platform and hear what they were saying. Their
mother had just taken out her handkerchief.
“Ron, you’ve got something on your nose.”
The youngest boy tried to jerk out of the way, but she grabbed him and
began rubbing the end of his nose.
“Mom — geroff” He wriggled free.
“Aaah, has ickle Ronnie got somefink on his nosie?” said one of the
twins.
“Shut up,” said Ron.
“Where’s Percy?” said their mother.
“He’s coming now.”
The oldest boy came striding into sight. He had already changed into his
billowing black Hogwarts robes, and Harry noticed a shiny silver badge on his
chest with the letter P on it.
“Can’t stay long, Mother,” he said. “I’m up front, the prefects have got
two compartments to themselves —”
“Oh, are you a prefect, Percy?” said one of the twins, with an air of great
surprise. “You should have said something, we had no idea.”
“Hang on, I think I remember him saying something about it,” said the
other twin. “Once —”
“Or twice —”
“A minute —”
“All summer —”
“Oh, shut up,” said Percy the Prefect.
“How come Percy gets new robes, anyway?” said one of the twins.
“Because he’s a prefect,” said their mother fondly. “All right, dear, well,
have a good term — send me an owl when you get there.”
She kissed Percy on the cheek and he left. Then she turned to the twins.
“Now, you two — this year, you behave yourselves. If I get one more owl telling me you’ve — you’ve blown up a toilet or —”
“Blown up a toilet? We’ve never blown up a toilet.”
“Great idea though, thanks, Mom.”
“It’s not funny. And look after Ron.”
“Don’t worry, ickle Ronniekins is safe with us.”
“Shut up,” said Ron again. He was almost as tall as the twins already and
his nose was still pink where his mother had rubbed it.
“Hey, Mom, guess what? Guess who we just met on the train?”
Harry leaned back quickly so they couldn’t see him looking.
“You know that black-haired boy who was near us in the station? Know
who he is?”
“Who?”
“Harry Potter!”
Harry heard the little girl’s voice.
“Oh, Mom, can I go on the train and see him, Mom, eh please....”
“You’ve already seen him, Ginny, and the poor boy isn’t something you
goggle at in a zoo. Is he really, Fred? How do you know?”
“Asked him. Saw his scar. It’s really there — like lightning.”
“Poor dear — no wonder he was alone, I wondered. He was ever so
polite when he asked how to get onto the platform.”
“Never mind that, do you think he remembers what You-Know-Who
looks like?”
Their mother suddenly became very stern.
“I forbid you to ask him, Fred. No, don’t you dare. As though he needs
reminding of that on his first day at school.”
“All right, keep your hair on.”
A whistle sounded.
“Hurry up!” their mother said, and the three boys clambered onto the
train. They leaned out of the window for her to kiss them good-bye, and their
younger sister began to cry.
“Don’t, Ginny, we’ll send you loads of owls.”
“We’ll send you a Hogwarts’ toilet seat.”
“George!”
“Only joking, Mom.”
The train began to move. Harry saw the boys’ mother waving and their
sister, half laughing, half crying, running to keep up with the train until it
gathered too much speed, then she fell back and waved.
Harry watched the girl and her mother disappear as the train rounded the
corner. Houses flashed past the window. Harry felt a great leap of excitement.
He
didn’t know what he was going to — but it had to be better than what he was
leavTinhg behind. e door of the compartment slid open and the youngest redheaded boy
came in.
“Anyone sitting there?” he asked, pointing at the seat opposite Harry.
“Everywhere else is full.”
Harry shook his head and the boy sat down. He glanced at Harry and
then looked quickly out of the window, pretending he hadn’t looked. Harry saw
he still had a black mark on his nose.
“Hey, Ron.”
The twins were back.
“Listen, we’re going down the middle of the train — Lee Jordan’s got a
giant tarantula down there.”
“Right,” mumbled Ron.
“Harry,” said the other twin, “did we introduce ourselves? Fred and
George Weasley. And this is Ron, our brother. See you later, then.”
“Bye,” said Harry and Ron. The twins slid the compartment door shut
behind them.
“Are you really Harry Potter?” Ron blurted out.
Harry nodded.
“Oh — well, I thought it might be one of Fred and George’s jokes,” said
Ron. “And have you really got — you know…”
He pointed at Harry’s forehead.
Harry pulled back his bangs to show the lightning scar. Ron stared.
“So that’s where You-Know-Who —?”
“Yes,” said Harry, “but I can’t remember it.”
“Nothing?” said Ron eagerly.
“Well — I remember a lot of green light, but nothing else.”
“Wow,” said Ron. He sat and stared at Harry for a few moments, then, as
though he had suddenly realized what he was doing, he looked quickly out of
the
win“dAorwe aagain. ll your family wizards?” asked Harry, who found Ron just as
interesting as Ron found him.
“Er — Yes, I think so,” said Ron. “I think Mom’s got a second cousin
who’s an accountant, but we never talk about him.”
“So you must know loads of magic already.”
The Weasleys were clearly one of those old wizarding families the pale
boy in Diagon Alley had talked about.
“I heard you went to live with Muggles,” said Ron. “What are they like?”
“Horrible — well, not all of them. My aunt and uncle and cousin are,
though. Wish I’d had three wizard brothers.”
“Five,” said Ron. For some reason, he was looking gloomy. “I’m the
sixth in our family to go to Hogwarts. You could say I’ve got a lot to live up to.
Bill and Charlie have already left — Bill was head boy and Charlie was captain
of Quidditch. Now Percy’s a prefect. Fred and George mess around a lot, but
they still get really good marks and everyone thinks they’re really funny.
Everyone expects me to do as well as the others, but if I do, it’s no big deal,
because they did it first. You never get anything new, either, with five
brothers.
I’ve got Bill’s old robes, Charlie’s old wand, and Percy’s old rat.” Ron reached inside his jacket and pulled out a fat gray rat, which was
asleep.
“His name’s Scabbers and he’s useless, he hardly ever wakes up. Percy
got an owl from my dad for being made a prefect, but they couldn’t aff — I
mean, I got Scabbers instead.”
Ron’s ears went pink. He seemed to think he’d said too much, because he
went back to staring out of the window.
Harry didn’t think there was anything wrong with not being able to
afford an owl. After all, he’d never had any money in his life until a month ago,
and he told Ron so, all about having to wear Dudley’s old clothes and never
getting proper birthday presents. This seemed to cheer Ron up.
“…and until Hagrid told me, I didn’t know anything about being a
wizard or about my parents or Voldemort —”
Ron gasped.
“What?” said Harry.
“You said You-Know-Who’s name!” said Ron, sounding both shocked
and impressed. “I’d have thought you, of all people —”
“I’m not trying to be brave or anything, saying the name,” said Harry, “I
just never knew you shouldn’t. See what I mean? I’ve got loads to learn.…I
bet,”
he added, voicing for the first time something that had been worrying him a lot
lately, “I bet I’m the worst in the class.” “You won’t be. There’s loads of people who come from Muggle families
and they learn quick enough.”
While they had been talking, the train had carried them out of London.
Now they were speeding past fields full of cows and sheep. They were quiet for
a time, watching the fields and lanes flick past.
Around half past twelve there was a great clattering outside in the
corridor and a smiling, dimpled woman slid back their door and said, “Anything
off the cart, dears?”
Harry, who hadn’t had any breakfast, leapt to his feet, but Ron’s ears
went pink again and he muttered that he’d brought sandwiches. Harry went
out
intoHtehehacdornriedvoerr. had any money for candy with the Dursleys, and now that
he had pockets rattling with gold and silver he was ready to buy as many Mars
Bars as he could carry — but the woman didn’t have Mars Bars. What she did
have were Bettie Bott’s Every Flavor Beans, Drooble’s Best Blowing Gum,
Chocolate Frogs. Pumpkin Pasties, Cauldron Cakes, Licorice Wands, and a
number of other strange things Harry had never seen in his life. Not wanting
to
miss anything, he got some of everything and paid the woman eleven silver
Sickles and seven bronze Knuts. Ron stared as Harry brought it all back in to the compartment and tipped
it onto an empty seat.
“Hungry, are you?”
“Starving,” said Harry, taking a large bite out of a pumpkin pasty.
Ron had taken out a lumpy package and unwrapped it. There were four
sandwiches inside. He pulled one of them apart and said, “She always forgets I
don’t like corned beef..”
“Swap you for one of these,” said Harry, holding up a pasty. “Go on —”
“You don’t want this, it’s all dry,” said Ron. “She hasn’t got much time,”
he added quickly, “you know, with five of us.”
“Go on, have a pasty,” said Harry, who had never had anything to share
before or, indeed, anyone to share it with. It was a nice feeling, sitting there
with
Ron, eating their way through all Harry’s pasties, cakes, and candies (the
sandwiches lay forgotten). “What are these?” Harry asked Ron, holding up a pack of Chocolate
Frogs. “They’re not really frogs, are they?” He was starting to feel that nothing
would surprise him.
“No,” said Ron. “But see what the card is. I’m missing Agrippa.”
“What?”
“Oh, of course, you wouldn’t know — Chocolate Frogs have cards,
inside them, you know, to collect — famous witches and wizards. I’ve got about
five hundred, but I haven’t got Agrippa or Ptolemy.”
Harry unwrapped his Chocolate Frog and picked up the card. It showed a
man’s face. He wore half-moon glasses, had a long, crooked nose, and flowing
silver hair, beard, and mustache. Underneath the picture was the name Albus
Dumbledore.
“So this is Dumbledore!” said Harry.
“Don’t tell me you’d never heard of Dumbledore!” said Ron. “Can I have
a frog? I might get Agrippa — thanks —”
Harry turned over his card and read:
ALBUS DUMBLEDORE
CURRENTLY HEADMASTER OF HOGWARTS
C onsidered by many the greatest wizard of modern times, Dumbledore is
particularly famous for his defeat of the dark wizard Grindelwald in 1945, for
the discovery of the twelve uses of dragon’s blood, and his work on alchemy
with his partner, Nicolas Flamel. Professor Dumbledore enjoys chamber music
and tenpin bowling.
Harry turned the card back over and saw, to his astonishment, that
Dumbledore’s face had disappeared.
“He’s gone!”
“Well, you can’t expect him to hang around all day,” said Ron. “He’ll be
back. No, I’ve got Morgana again and I’ve got about six of her…do you want it?
You can start collecting.”
Ron’s eyes strayed to the pile of Chocolate Frogs waiting to be
unwrapped.
“Help yourself,” said Harry. “But in, you know, the Muggle world,
people just stay put in photos.”
“Do they? What, they don’t move at all?” Ron sounded amazed.
“Weird!”
Harry stared as Dumbledore sidled back into the picture on his card and
gave him a small smile. Ron was more interested in eating the frogs than
looking
at the Famous Witches and Wizards cards, but Harry couldn’t keep his eyes off
them. Soon he had not only Dumbledore and Morgana, but Hengist of
Woodcroft, Alberic Grunnion, Circe, Paracelsus, and Merlin. He finally tore his
eyes away from the Druidess Cliodna, who was scratching her nose, to open a
bag of Bertie Bott’s Every Flavor Beans.
“You want to be careful with those,” Ron warned Harry. “When they say
every flavor, they mean every flavor — you know, you get all the ordinary ones
like chocolate and peppermint and marmalade, but then you can get spinach
and
liveRr and tripe. George reckons he had a booger-flavored one once.” on picked up a green bean, looked at it carefully, and bit into a corner.
“Bleaaargh — see? Sprouts.”
They had a good time eating the Every Flavor Beans. Harry got toast,
coconut, baked bean, strawberry, curry, grass, coffee, sardine, and was even
brave enough to nibble the end off a funny gray one Ron wouldn’t touch, which
turned out to be pepper.
The countryside now flying past the window was becoming wilder. The
neat fields had gone. Now there were woods, twisting rivers, and dark green
hills.
There was a knock on the door of their compartment and the round-faced
boy Harry had passed on platform nine and three-quarters came in. He looked
tear“fSuol.rry,” he said, “but have you seen a toad at all?” When they shook their heads, he wailed, “I’ve lost him! He keeps getting
away from me!”
“He’ll turn up,” said Harry.
“Yes,” said the boy miserably. “Well, if you see him…”
He left.
“Don’t know why he’s so bothered,” said Ron. “If I’d brought a toad I’d
lose it as quick as I could. Mind you, I brought Scabbers, so I can’t talk.”
The rat was still snoozing on Ron’s lap.
“He might have died and you wouldn’t know the difference,” said Ron in
disgust. “I tried to turn him yellow yesterday to make him more interesting,
but
theHspeerlul mdimdna’gt ewdoarkro. uI’nlldsihnohwisyotruu,nlokoakn…d”pulled out a very battered-looking
wand. It was chipped in places and something white was glinting at the end.
“Unicorn hair’s nearly poking out. Anyway —”
He had just raised his wand when the compartment door slid open again.
The toadless boy was back, but this time he had a girl with him. She was
already
wea“rHinags haenryonneewsHeeongwaatrotasdr?oNbeesv.ille’s lost one,” she said. She had a bossy
sort of voice, lots of bushy brown hair, and rather large front teeth.
“We’ve already told him we haven’t seen it,” said Ron, but the girl
wasn’t listening, she was looking at the wand in his hand.
“Oh, are you doing magic? Let’s see it, then.”
She sat down. Ron looked taken aback.
“Er — all right.”
He cleared his throat.
“Sunshine, daisies, butter mellow,
Turn this stupid, fat rat yellow.”
He waved his wand, but nothing happened. Scabbers stayed gray and fast
asleep.
“Are you sure that’s a real spell?” said the girl. “Well, it’s not very good,
is it? I’ve tried a few simple spells just for practice and it’s all worked for me.
Nobody in my family’s magic at all, it was ever such a surprise when I got my
letter, but I was ever so pleased, of course, I mean, it’s the very best school of
witchcraft there is, I’ve heard — I’ve learned all our course books by heart, of
course, I just hope it will be enough — I’m Hermione Granger, by the way, who
are you?”
She said all this very fast.
Harry looked at Ron, and was relieved to see by his stunned face that he
hadn’t learned all the course books by heart either.
“I’m Ron Weasley,” Ron muttered.
“Harry Potter,” said Harry.
“Are you really?” said Hermione. “I know all about you, of course — I
got a few extra books, for background reading, and you’re in Modern Magical
History and The Rise and Fall of the Dark Arts and Great Wizarding Events of
the Twentieth Century.”
“Am I?” said Harry, feeling dazed.
“Goodness, didn’t you know, I’d have found out everything I could if it
was me,” said Hermione. “Do either of you know what house you’ll be in? I’ve
been asking around, and I hope I’m in Gryffindor, it sounds by far the best; I
hear Dumbledore himself was in it, but I suppose Ravenclaw wouldn’t be too
bad....Anyway, we’d better go and look for Neville’s toad. You two had better
change, you know, I expect we’ll be there soon.”
And she left, taking the toadless boy with her.
“Whatever house I’m in, I hope she’s not in it,” said Ron. He threw his
wand back into his trunk. “Stupid spell — George gave it to me, bet he knew it
was a dud.”
“What house are your brothers in?” asked Harry.
“Gryffindor,” said Ron. Gloom seemed to be settling on him again.
“Mom and Dad were in it, too. I don’t know what they’ll say if I’m not. I don’t
suppose Ravenclaw would be too bad, but imagine if they put me in Slytherin.”
“That’s the house Vol-, I mean, You-Know-Who was in?”
“Yeah,” said Ron. He flopped back into his seat, looking depressed.
“You know, I think the ends of Scabbers’ whiskers are a bit lighter,” said
Harry, trying to take Ron’s mind off houses. “So what do your oldest brothers
do
nowHtahrartytwheays’vweolnedfte,rainngywwahya?t”a wizard did once he’d finished school.
“Charlie’s in Romania studying dragons, and Bill’s in Africa doing
something for Gringotts,” said Ron. “Did you hear about Gringotts? It’s been all
over the Daily Prophet, but I don’t suppose you get that with the Muggles —
someone tried to rob a high security vault.”
Harry stared.
“Really? What happened to them?”
“Nothing, that’s why it’s such big news. They haven’t been caught. My
dad says it must’ve been a powerful Dark wizard to get round Gringotts, but
they
don’t think they took anything, that’s what’s odd. ’Course, everyone gets
scared
when something like this happens in case You-Know-Who’s behind it.”
Harry turned this news over in his mind. He was starting to get a prickle
of fear every time You-Know-Who was mentioned. He supposed this was all
part of entering the magical world, but it had been a lot more comfortable
saying
“Voldemort” without worrying. “What’s your Quidditch team?” Ron asked.
“Er — I don’t know any.” Harry confessed.
“What!” Ron looked dumbfounded. “Oh, you wait, it’s the best game in
the world —” And he was off, explaining all about the four balls and the
positions of the seven players, describing famous games he’d been to with his
brothers and the broomstick he’d like to get if he had the money. He was just
taking Harry through the finer points of the game when the compartment door
slid open yet again, but it wasn’t Neville the toadless boy, or Hermione
Granger
this time.
Three boys entered, and Harry recognized the middle one at once: it was
the pale boy from Madam Malkin’s robe shop. He was looking at Harry with a
lot more interest than he’d shown back in Diagon Alley.
“Is it true?” he said. “They’re saying all down the train that Harry
Potter’s in this compartment. So it’s you, is it?”
“Yes,” said Harry. He was looking at the other boys. Both of them were
thickset and looked extremely mean. Standing on either side of the pale boy,
they
look“eOdhlike bodyguards.
, this is Crabbe and this is Goyle,” said the pale boy carelessly,
noticing where Harry was looking. “And my name’s Malfoy, Draco Malfoy.”
Ron gave a slight cough, which might have been hiding a snigger. Draco
Malfoy looked at him.
“Think my name’s funny, do you? No need to ask who you are. My
father told me all the Weasleys have red hair, freckles, and more children than
they can afford.”
He turned back to Harry. “You’ll soon find out some wizarding families
are much better than others, Potter. You don’t want to go making friends with
the
wroHnge hsoerldt. oIuctahnishehlapnydotuotshhearkee.”Harry’s, but Harry didn’t take it.
“I think I can tell who the wrong sort are for myself, thanks,” he said
coolly.
Draco Malfoy didn’t go red, but a pink tinge appeared in his pale cheeks.
“I’d be careful if I were you, Potter,” he said slowly. “Unless you’re a bit politer you’ll go the same way as your parents. They didn’t know what was
good
for them, either. You hang around with riffraff like the Weasleys and that
Hagrid,
and it’ll rub off on you.”
Both Harry and Ron stood up.
“Say that again,” Ron said, his face as red as his hair.
“Oh, you’re going to fight us, are you?” Malfoy sneered.
“Unless you get out now,” said Harry, more bravely than he felt, because
Crabbe and Goyle were a lot bigger than him or Ron.
“But we don’t feet like leaving, do we, boys? We’ve eaten all our food
and you still seem to have some.”
Goyle reached toward the Chocolate Frogs next to Ron — Ron leapt
forward, but before he’d so much as touched Goyle, Goyle let out a horrible
yell.Scabbers the rat was hanging off his finger, sharp little teeth sunk deep
into Goyle’s knuckle — Crabbe and Malfoy backed away as Goyle swung
Scabbers round and round, howling, and when Scabbers finally flew off and hit
the window, all three of them disappeared at once. Perhaps they thought there
were more rats lurking among the sweets, or perhaps they’d heard footsteps,
because a second later, Hermione Granger had come in.
“What has been going on?” she said, looking at the sweets all over the
floor and Ron picking up Scabbers by his tail.
S “I think he’s been knocked out,” Ron said to Harry. He looked closer at cabbers. “No — I don’t believe it — he’s gone back to sleep.”
And so he had.
“You’ve met Malfoy before?”
Harry explained about their meeting in Diagon Alley.
“I’ve heard of his family,” said Ron darkly. “They were some of the first
to come back to our side after You-Know-Who disappeared. Said they’d been
bewitched. My dad doesn’t believe it. He says Malfoy’s father didn’t need an
excuse to go over to the Dark Side.” He turned to Hermione. “Can we help you
with something?”
“You’d better hurry up and put your robes on, I’ve just been up to the
front to ask the conductor, and he says we’re nearly there. You haven’t been
fighting, have you? You’ll be in trouble before we even get there!”
“Scabbers has been fighting, not us,” said Ron, scowling at her. “Would
you mind leaving while we change?”
“All right — I only came in here because people outside are behaving
very childishly, racing up and down the corridors,” said Hermione in a sniffy
voice. “And you’ve got dirt on your nose, by the way, did you know?”
Ron glared at her as she left. Harry peered out of the window. It was
getting dark. He could see mountains and forests under a deep purple sky. The
train did seem to be slowing down.
He and Ron took off their jackets and pulled on their long black robes.
Ron’s were a bit short for him, you could see his sneakers underneath them.
A voice echoed through the train: “We will be reaching Hogwarts in five
minutes’ time. Please leave your luggage on the train, it will be taken to the
school separately.”
Harry’s stomach lurched with nerves and Ron, he saw, looked pale under
his freckles. They crammed their pockets with the last of the sweets and joined
the crowd thronging the corridor.
The train slowed right down and finally stopped. People pushed their
way toward the door and out on to a tiny, dark platform. Harry shivered in the
cold night air. Then a lamp came bobbing over the heads of the students, and
Harry heard a familiar voice: “Firs’ years! Firs’ years over here! All right there,
Harry?”
Hagrid’s big hairy face beamed over the sea of heads.
“C’mon, follow me — any more firs’ years? Mind yer step, now! Firs’
years follow me!”
Slipping and stumbling, they followed Hagrid down what seemed to be a
steep, narrow path. It was so dark on either side of them that Harry thought
there
must be thick trees there. Nobody spoke much. Neville, the boy who kept
losing
his toad, sniffed once or twice.
“Yeh’ll get yer firs’ sight o’ Hogwarts in a sec,” Hagrid called over his
shoulder, “jus’ round this bend here.”
There was a loud “Oooooh!”
The narrow path had opened suddenly onto the edge of a great black
lake. Perched atop a high mountain on the other side, its windows sparkling in
the starry sky, was a vast castle with many turrets and towers.
“No more’n four to a boat!” Hagrid called, pointing to a fleet of little
boats sitting in the water by the shore. Harry and Ron were followed into their
boat by Neville and Hermione.
“Everyone in?” shouted Hagrid, who had a boat to himself. “Right then
— FORWARD!”
And the fleet of little boats moved off all at once, gliding across the lake,
which was as smooth as glass. Everyone was silent, staring up at the great
castle
overhead. It towered over them as they sailed nearer and nearer to the cliff on
which it stood. “Heads down!” yelled Hagrid as the first boats reached the cliff; they all
bent their heads and the little boats carried them through a curtain of ivy that
hid
a wide opening in the cliff face. They were carried along a dark tunnel, which
seemed to be taking them right underneath the castle, until they reached a
kind
of underground harbor, where they clambered out onto rocks and pebbles.
“Oy, you there! Is this your toad?” said Hagrid, who was checking the
boats as people climbed out of them.
“Trevor!” cried Neville blissfully, holding out his hands. Then they
clambered up a passageway in the rock after Hagrid’s lamp, coming out at last
onto smooth, damp grass right in the shadow of the castle.
They walked up a flight of stone steps and crowded around the huge, oak
front door.
“Everyone here? You there, still got yer toad?”
Hagrid raised a gigantic fist and knocked three times on the castle door.
HP 1 - Harry Potter and the
Sorcerer's Stone
CHAPTER SEVEN
THE SORTING HAT
T he door swung open at once. A tall, black-haired witch in emerald-green
robes stood there. She had a very stern face and Harry’s first thought was that
this was not someone to cross.
“The firs’ years, Professor McGonagall,” said Hagrid.
“Thank you, Hagrid. I will take them from here.”
She pulled the door wide. The entrance hall was so big you could have fit
the whole of the Dursleys’ house in it. The stone walls were lit with flaming
torches like the ones at Gringotts, the ceiling was too high to make out, and a
magnificent marble staircase facing them led to the upper floors.
They followed Professor McGonagall across the flagged stone floor.
Harry could hear the drone of hundreds of voices from a doorway to the right —
the rest of the school must already be here — but Professor McGonagall
showed
the first years into a small, empty chamber off the hall. They crowded in,
standing rather closer together than they would usually have done, peering
about
nervously.
“Welcome to Hogwarts,” said Professor McGonagall. “The start-of-term
banquet will begin shortly, but before you take your seats in the Great Hall,
you
will be sorted into your houses. The Sorting is a very important ceremony
because, while you are here, your house will be something like your family
within Hogwarts. You will have classes with the rest of your house, sleep in
your
house dormitory, and spend free time in your house common room.
“The four houses are called Gryffindor, Hufflepuff, Ravenclaw, and
Slytherin. Each house has its own noble history and each has produced
outstanding witches and wizards. While you are at Hogwarts, your triumphs
will
earn your house points, while any rulebreaking will lose house points. At the
end
of the year, the house with the most points is awarded the house cup, a great “The Sorting Ceremony will take place in a few minutes in front of the
hreosntoorf. tIhheospceheoaocl.hIosfuygogueswtiyllobueaallcsrmedairtteton wyohuicrhseelvveershuopuases mbeuccohmaessyyoouurcsa.n
while you are waiting.”
Her eyes lingered for a moment on Neville’s cloak, which was fastened
under his left ear, and on Ron’s smudged nose. Harry nervously tried to flatten
his hair.
“I shall return when we are ready for you,” said Professor McGonagall.
“Please wait quietly.”
She left the chamber. Harry swallowed.
“How exactly do they sort us into houses?” he asked Ron.
“Some sort of test, I think. Fred said it hurts a lot, but I think he was
joking.”
Harry’s heart gave a horrible jolt. A test? In front of the whole school?
But he didn’t know any magic yet —what on earth would he have to do? He
hadn’t expected something like this the moment they arrived. He looked
around
anxiously and saw that everyone else looked terrified, too. No one was talking
much except Hermione Granger, who was whispering very fast about all the
spells she’d learned and wondering which one she’d need. Harry tried hard not
to listen to her. He’d never been more nervous, never, not even when he’d had
to
take a school report home to the Dursleys saying that he’d somehow turned his
teacher’s wig blue. He kept his eyes fixed on the door. Any second now,
ProTfehssor McGonagall would come back and lead him to his doom. en something happened that made him jump about a foot in the air —
several people behind him screamed.
“What the —?”
He gasped. So did the people around him. About twenty ghosts had just
streamed through the back wall. Pearly-white and slightly transparent, they
glided across the room talking to one another and hardly glancing at the first
years. They seemed to be arguing. What looked like a fat little monk was
saying:
“Forgive and forget, I say, we ought to give him a second chance —” “My dear Friar, haven’t we given Peeves all the chances he deserves? He
gives us all a bad name and you know, he’s not really even a ghost — I say,
what
areAyoguhall doing here?” ost wearing a ruff and tights had suddenly noticed the first years.
Nobody answered.
“New students!” said the Fat Friar, smiling around at them. “About to be
Sorted, I suppose?”
A few people nodded mutely.
“Hope to see you in Hufflepuff!” said the Friar. “My old house, you
know.”
“Move along now,” said a sharp voice. “The Sorting Ceremony’s about
to start.”
Professor McGonagall had returned. One by one, the ghosts floated away
through the opposite wall.
“Now, form a line,” Professor McGonagall told the first years, “and
follow me.”
Feeling oddly as though his legs had turned to lead, Harry got into line
behind a boy with sandy hair, with Ron behind him, and they walked out of the
chamber, back across the hall, and through a pair of double doors into the
Great
HalHl. arry had never even imagined such a strange and splendid place. It was
lit by thousands and thousands of candles that were floating in midair over
four
long tables, where the rest of the students were sitting. These tables were laid
with glittering golden plates and goblets. At the top of the hall was another
long
table where the teachers were sitting. Professor McGonagall led the first years
up here, so that they came to a halt in a line facing the other students, with the
teachers behind them. The hundreds of faces staring at them looked like pale
lanterns in the flickering candlelight. Dotted here and there among the
students,
the ghosts shone misty silver. Mainly to avoid all the staring eyes, Harry looked
upward and saw a velvety black ceiling dotted with stars. He heard Hermione
whisper, “Its bewitched to look like the sky outside. I read about it in
Hogwarts,
A History.”
It was hard to believe there was a ceiling there at all, and that the Great
Hall didn’t simply open on to the heavens.
Harry quickly looked down again as Professor McGonagall silently
placed a four-legged stool in front of the first years. On top of the stool she put
a
pointed wizard’s hat. This hat was patched and frayed and extremely dirty.
Aunt
Petunia wouldn’t have let it in the house. Maybe they had to try and get a rabbit out of it, Harry thought wildly,
that seemed the sort of thing — noticing that everyone in the hall was now
staring at the hat, he stared at it, too. For a few seconds, there was complete
silence. Then the hat twitched. A rip near the brim opened wide like a mouth —
and the hat began to sing:
“Oh, you may not think I’m pretty,
But don’t judge on what you see,
I’ll eat myself if you can find
A smarter hat than me.
You can keep your bowlers black,
Your top hats sleek and tall,
For I’m the Hogwarts Sorting Hat
And I can cap them all.
There’s nothing hidden in your head
The Sorting Hat can’t see,
So try me on and I will tell you
Where you ought to be.
You might belong in Gryffindor, Where dwell the brave at heart,
Their daring, nerve, and chivalry
Set Gryffindors apart;
You might belong in Hufflepuff, Where they are just and loyal,
Those patient Hufflepuffs are true
And unafraid of toil;
Or yet in wise old Ravenclaw,
if you’ve a ready mind,
Where those of wit and learning, Will always find their kind;
Or perhaps in Slytherin
You’ll make your real friends,
Those cunning folk use any means
To achieve their ends.
So put me on! Don’t be afraid!
And don’t get in a flap!
You’re in safe hands (though I have none)
For I’m a Thinking Cap!”
The whole hall burst into applause as the hat finished its song. It bowed to
each of the four tables and then became quite still again.
“So we’ve just got to try on the hat!” Ron whispered to Harry. “I’ll kill
Fred, he was going on about wrestling a troll.”
Harry. smiled weakly. Yes, trying on the hat was a lot better than having
to do a spell, but he did wish they could have tried it on without everyone
watching. The hat seemed to be asking rather a lot; Harry didn’t feel brave or
quick-witted or any of it at the moment. If only the hat had mentioned a house
for people who felt a bit queasy, that would have been the one for him.
Professor McGonagall now stepped forward holding a long roll of
parchment.
“When I call your name, you will put on the hat and sit on the stool to be
sorted,” she said. “Abbott, Hannah!”
A pink-faced girl with blonde pigtails stumbled out of line, put on the
hat, which fell right down over her eyes, and sat down. A moments pause —
“HUFFLEPUFF!” shouted the hat.
The table on the right cheered and clapped as Hannah went to sit down at
the Hufflepuff table. Harry saw the ghost of the Fat Friar waving merrily at
her.“Bones, Susan!”
“HUFFLEPUFF!” shouted the hat again, and Susan scuttled off to sit
next to Hannah.
“Boot, Terry!”
“RAVENCLAW!”
The table second from the left clapped this time; several Ravenclaws
stood up to shake hands with Terry as he joined them.
“Brocklehurst, Mandy” went to Ravenclaw too, but “Brown, Lavender”
became the first new Gryffindor, and the table on the far left exploded with
cheers; Harry could see Ron’s twin brothers catcalling.
“Bulstrode, Millicent” then became a Slytherin. Perhaps it was Harry’s
imagination, after all he’d heard about Slytherin, but he thought they looked
like
an unpleasant lot. He was starting to feel definitely sick now. He remembered being picked
for teams during gym at his old school. He had always been last to be chosen,
not because he was no good, but because no one wanted Dudley to think they
liked him.
“Finch-Fletchley, Justin!”
“HUFFLEPUFF!”
Sometimes, Harry noticed, the hat shouted out the house at once, but at
others it took a little while to decide. “Finnigan, Seamus,” the sandy-haired boy
next to Harry in the line, sat on the stool for almost a whole minute before the
hat declared him a Gryffindor.
“Granger, Hermione!”
Her mione almost ran to the stool and jammed the hat eagerly on her
head.
“GRYFFINDOR!” shouted the hat. Ron groaned.
A horrible thought struck Harry, as horrible thoughts always do when
you’re very nervous. What if he wasn’t chosen at all? What if he just sat there
with the hat over his eyes for ages, until Professor McGonagall jerked it off his
head and said there had obviously been a mistake and he’d better get back on
the
traiWn?hen Neville Longbottom, the boy who kept losing his toad, was called,
he fell over on his way to the stool. The hat took a long time to decide with
Neville. When it finally shouted, “GRYFFINDOR,” Neville ran off still wearing
it, and had to jog back amid gales of laughter to give it to “MacDougal, Morag.”
Malfoy swaggered forward when his name was called and got his wish at
once: the hat had barely touched his head when it screamed, “SLYTHERIN!” Malfoy went to join his friends Crabbe and Goyle, looking pleased with
himself.
There weren’t many people left now. “Moon”…, “Nott”…,
“Parkinson”…, then a pair of twin girls, “Patil” and “Patil”…, then “Perks,
Sally-Anne”…, and then, at last —
“Potter, Harry!”
As Harry stepped forward, whispers suddenly broke out like little hissing
fires all over the hall.
“Potter, did she say?”
“The Harry Potter?”
The last thing Harry saw before the hat dropped over his eyes was the
hall full of people craning to get a good look at him. Next second he was
looking
at th“He mblmack inside of the hat. He waited. ,” said a small voice in his ear. “Difficult. Very difficult. Plenty of
courage, I see. Not a bad mind either. There’s talent, A my goodness, yes —
and
a nice thirst to prove yourself, now that’s interesting….So where shall I put
youH?”arry gripped the edges of the stool and thought, Not Slytherin, not
Slytherin.
“Not Slytherin, eh?” said the small voice. “Are you sure? You could be
great, you know, it’s all here in your head, and Slytherin will help you on the
way to greatness, no doubt about that — no? Well, if you’re sure — better be
GRYFFINDOR!”
Harry heard the hat shout the last word to the whole hall. He took off the
hat and walked shakily toward the Gryffindor table. He was so relieved to have
been chosen and not put in Slytherin, he hardly noticed that he was getting the
loudest cheer yet. Percy the Prefect got up and shook his hand vigorously,
while
the Weasley twins yelled, “We got Potter! We got Potter!” Harry sat down
opposite the ghost in the ruff he’d seen earlier. The ghost patted his arm,
giving
Harry the sudden, horrible feeling he’d just plunged it into a bucket of ice-cold
water. He could see the High Table properly now. At the end nearest him sat
Hagrid, who caught his eye and gave him the thumbs up. Harry grinned back.
And there, in the center of the High Table, in a large gold chair, sat Albus
Dumbledore. Harry recognized him at once from the card he’d gotten out of
the
Chocolate Frog on the train. Dumbledore’s silver hair was the only thing in the
whole hall that shone as brightly as the ghosts. Harry spotted Professor
Quirrell,
too, the nervous young man from the Leaky Cauldron. He was looking very
peculiar in a large purple turban.
And now there were only three people left to be sorted. “Thomas, Dean,”
a Black boy even taller than Ron, joined Harry at the Gryffindor table. “Turpin,
Lisa,” became a Ravenclaw and then it was Ron’s turn. He was pale green by
now. Harry crossed his fingers under the table and a second later the hat had
shouted, “GRYFFINDOR!”
Harry clapped loudly with the rest as Ron collapsed into the chair next to
him.
“Well done, Ron, excellent,” said Percy Weasley pompously across Harry
as “Zabini, Blaise,” was made a Slytherin. Professor McGonagall rolled up her
scroll and took the Sorting Hat away.
Harry looked down at his empty gold plate. He had only just realized
how hungry he was. The pumpkin pasties seemed ages ago.
Albus Dumbledore had gotten to his feet. He was beaming at the
students, his arms opened wide, as if nothing could have pleased him more
than
to see them all there. “Welcome,” he said. “Welcome to a new year at Hogwarts! Before we
begin our banquet, I would like to say a few words. And here they are: Nitwit!
Blubber! Oddment! Tweak!
“Thank you!”
He sat back down. Everybody clapped and cheered. Harry didn’t know
whether to laugh or not.
“Is he — a bit mad?” he asked Percy uncertainly.
“Mad?” said Percy airily. “He’s a genius! Best wizard in the world! But
he is a bit mad, yes. Potatoes, Harry?”
Harry’s mouth fell open. The dishes in front of him were now piled with
food. He had never seen so many things he liked to eat on one table: roast
beef,
roast chicken, pork chops and lamb chops, sausages, bacon and steak, boiled
potatoes, roast potatoes, fries, Yorkshire pudding, peas, carrots, gravy,
ketchup,
and, for some strange reason, peppermint humbugs.
The Dursleys had never exactly starved Harry, but he’d never been
allowed to eat as much as he liked. Dudley had always taken anything that
Harry
really wanted, even if It made him sick. Harry piled his plate with a bit of
everything except the peppermints and began to eat. It was all delicious.
“That does look good,” said the ghost in the ruff sadly, watching Harry
cut up his steak.
“Can’t you —?”
“I haven’t eaten for nearly five hundred years,” said the ghost. “I don’t
need to, of course, but one does miss it. I don’t think I’ve introduced myself?
Sir
Nicholas de Mimsy-Porpington at your service. Resident ghost of Gryffindor
Tow“eIrk.”now who you are!” said Ron suddenly. “My brothers told me about
you — you’re Nearly Headless Nick!”
“I would prefer you to call me Sir Nicholas de Mimsy —” the ghost
began stiffly, but sandy-haired Seamus Finnigan interrupted.
“Nearly Headless? How can you be nearly headless?”
Sir Nicholas looked extremely miffed, as if their little chat wasn’t going
at all the way he wanted.
“Like this,” he said irritably. He seized his left ear and pulled. His whole
head swung off his neck and fell onto his shoulder as if it was on a hinge.
Someone had obviously tried to behead him, but not done it properly. Looking
pleased at the stunned looks on their faces, Nearly Headless Nick flipped his
head back onto his neck, coughed, and said, “So — new Gryffindors! I hope
you’re going to help us win the house championship this year? Gryffindors
have
never gone so long without winning. Slytherins have got the cup six years in a
row! The Bloody Baron’s becoming almost unbearable — he’s the Slytherin
ghoHsta.”rry looked over at the Slytherin table and saw a horrible ghost sitting
there, with blank staring eyes, a gaunt face, and robes stained with silver
blood.
He was right next to Malfoy who, Harry was pleased to see, didn’t look too
pleased with the seating arrangements. “How did he get covered in blood?” asked Seamus with great interest.
“I’ve never asked,” said Nearly Headless Nick delicately. When everyone had eaten as much as they could, the remains of the food
faded from the plates, leaving them sparkling clean as before. A moment later
the desserts appeared. Blocks of ice cream in every flavor you could think of,
apple pies, treacle tarts, chocolate eclairs and jam doughnuts, trifle,
strawberries,
Jell-AOs
, Hria
crerpyuh
dedlp
inegd…himself to a treacle tart, the talk turned to their families.
“I’m half-and-half,” said Seamus. “Me dad’s a Muggle. Mom didn’t tell
him she was a witch ’til after they were married. Bit of a nasty shock for him.”
The others laughed.
“What about you, Neville?” said Ron.
“Well, my gran brought me up and she’s a witch,” said Neville, “but the
family thought I was all-Muggle for ages. My Great Uncle Algie kept trying to
catch me off my guard and force some magic out of me — he pushed me off the
end of Blackpool pier once, I nearly drowned — but nothing happened until I
was eight. Great Uncle Algie came round for dinner, and he was hanging me
out
of an upstairs window by the ankles when my Great Auntie Enid offered him a
meringue and he accidentally let go. But I bounced — all the way down the
garden and into the road. They were all really pleased, Gran was crying, she
was
so happy. And you should have seen their faces when I got in here — they
thought I might not be magic enough to come, you see. Great Uncle Algie was
so pleased he bought me my toad.” On Harry’s other side, Percy Weasley and Hermione were talking about
lessons (“I do hope they start right away, there’s so much to learn, I’m
particularly interested in Transfiguration, you know, turning something into
something else, of course, it’s supposed to be very difficult —”; “You’ll be
starting small, just matches into needles and that sort of thing — ”).
Harry, who was starting to feel warm and sleepy, looked up at the High
Table again. Hagrid was drinking deeply from his goblet. Professor
McGonagall
was talking to Professor Dumbledore. Professor Quirrell, in his absurd turban,
was talking to a teacher with greasy black hair, a hooked nose, and sallow skin. It happened very suddenly. The hook-nosed teacher looked past
Quirrell’s turban straight into Harry’s eyes — and a sharp, hot pain shot across
the scar on Harry’s forehead.
“Ouch!” Harry clapped a hand to his head.
“What is it?” asked Percy.
“N-nothing.”
The pain had gone as quickly as it had come. Harder to shake off was the
feeling Harry had gotten from the teacher’s look — a feeling that he didn’t like
Harry at all.
“Who’s that teacher talking to Professor Quirrell?” he asked Percy.
“Oh, you know Quirrell already, do you? No wonder he’s looking so
nervous, that’s Professor Snape. He teaches Potions, but he doesn’t want to —
everyone knows he’s after Quirrell’s job. Knows an awful lot about the Dark
Arts, Snape.”
Harry watched Snape for a while, but Snape didn’t look at him again.
At last, the desserts too disappeared, and Professor Dumbledore got to
his feet again. The hall fell silent.
“Ahem — just a few more words now that we are all fed and watered. I
have a few start-of-term notices to give you.
“First years should note that the forest on the grounds is forbidden to all
pupils. And a few of our older students would do well to remember that as
welDl.”umbledore’s twinkling eyes flashed in the direction of the Weasley
twins.
“I have also been asked by Mr. Filch, the caretaker, to remind you all that
no magic should be used between classes in the corridors.
“Quidditch trials will be held in the second week of the term. Anyone
interested in playing for their house teams should contact Madam Hooch.
“And finally, I must tell you that this year, the third-floor corridor on the
right-hand side is out of bounds to everyone who does not wish to die a very
painful death.”
Harry laughed, but he was one of the few who did.
“He’s not serious?” he muttered to Percy.
“Must be,” said Percy, frowning at Dumbledore. “It’s odd, because he
usually gives us a reason why we’re not allowed to go somewhere — the
forest’s
full of dangerous beasts, everyone knows that. I do think he might have told us
pref“eAcntds,naotwle,abset.f”ore we go to bed, let us sing the school song!” cried
Dumbledore. Harry noticed that the other teachers’ smiles had become rather
fixed.
Dumbledore gave his wand a little flick, as if he was trying to get a fly
off the end, and a long golden ribbon flew out of it, which rose high above the
tables and twisted itself, snakelike, into words.
“Everyone pick their favorite tune,” said Dumbledore, “and off we go!”
And the school bellowed:
“Hogwarts, Hogwarts, Hoggy Warty Hogwarts,
Teach us something please, Whether we be old and bald
Or young with scabby knees,
Our heads could do with filling
With some interesting stuff,
For now they’re bare and full of air,
Dead flies and bits of fluff,
So teach us things worth knowing,
Bring back what we’ve forgot,
just do your best, we’ll do the rest,
And learn until our brains all rot.”
Everybody finished the song at different times. At last, only the Weasley
twins were left singing along to a very slow funeral march. Dumbledore
conducted their last few lines with his wand and when they had finished, he
was
one“oAfhthose who clapped loudest.
, music,” he said, wiping his eyes. “A magic beyond all we do here!
And now, bedtime. Off you trot!”
The Gryffindor first years followed Percy through the chattering crowds,
out of the Great Hall, and up the marble staircase. Harry’s legs were like lead
again, but only because he was so tired and full of food. He was too sleepy
even
to be surprised that the people in the portraits along the corridors whispered
and
pointed as they passed, or that twice Percy led them through doorways hidden
behind sliding panels and hanging tapestries. They climbed more staircases,
yawning and dragging their feet, and Harry was just wondering how much
farther they had to go when they came to a sudden halt.
A bundle of walking sticks was floating in midair ahead of them, and as
Percy took a step toward them they started throwing themselves at him.
“Peeves,” Percy whispered to the first years. “A poltergeist.” He raised
his voice, “Peeves — show yourself.”
A loud, rude sound, like the air being let out of a balloon, answered.
“Do you want me to go to the Bloody Baron?”
There was a pop, and a little man with wicked, dark eyes and a wide
mouth appeared, floating cross-legged in the air, clutching the walking sticks.
“Oooooooh!” he said, with an evil cackle. “Ickle Firsties! What fun!”
He swooped suddenly at them. They all ducked.
“Go away, Peeves, or the Baron’ll hear about this, I mean it!” barked
Percy.
Peeves stuck out his tongue and vanished, dropping the walking sticks on
Neville’s head. They heard him zooming away, rattling coats of armor as he
passed.
“You want to watch out for Peeves,” said Percy, as they set off again.
“The Bloody Baron’s the only one who can control him, he won’t even listen to
us prefects. Here we are.”
At the very end of the corridor hung a portrait of a very fat woman in a
pink silk dress.
“Password?” she said.
“Caput Draconis,” said Percy, and the portrait swung forward to reveal a
round hole in the wall. They all scrambled through it — Neville needed a leg up — and found themselves in the Gryffindor common room, a cozy, round room
full of squashy armchairs.
Percy directed the girls through one door to their dormitory and the boys
through another. At the top of a spiral staircase — they were obviously in one
of
the towers — they found their beds at last: five four-posters hung with deep
red,
velvet curtains. Their trunks had already been brought up. Too tired to talk
much, they pulled on their pajamas and fell into bed.
“Great food, isn’t it?” Ron muttered to Harry through the hangings. “Get
off, Scabbers! He’s chewing my sheets.”
Harry was going to ask Ron if he’d had any of the treacle tart, but he fell
asleep almost at once.
Perhaps Harry had eaten a bit too much, because he had a very strange
dream. He was wearing Professor Quirrell’s turban, which kept talking to him,
telling him he must transfer to Slytherin at once, because it was his destiny.
Harry told the turban he didn’t want to be in Slytherin; it got heavier and
heavier; he tried to pull it off but it tightened painfully — and there was
Malfoy,
laughing at him as he struggled with it — then Malfoy turned into the hooknosed teacher, Snape, whose laugh became high and cold — there was a burst
of
green light and Harry woke, sweating and shaking. He rolled over and fell asleep again, and when he woke next day, he
didn’t remember the dream at all.
HP 1 - Harry Potter and the
Sorcerer's Stone
CHAPTER EIGHT
THE POTIONS MASTER
T here, look.”
“Where?”
“Next to the tall kid with the red hair.”
“Wearing the glasses?”
“Did you see his face?”
“Did you see his scar?” Whispers followed Harry from the moment he left his dormitory the next
day. People lining up outside classrooms stood on tiptoe to get a look at him, or
doubled back to pass him in the corridors again, staring. Harry wished they
wouldn’t, because he was trying to concentrate on finding his way to classes.
There were a hundred and forty-two staircases at Hogwarts: wide,
sweeping ones; narrow, rickety ones; some that led somewhere different on a
Friday; some with a vanishing step halfway up that you had to remember to
jump. Then there were doors that wouldn’t open unless you asked politely, or
tickled them in exactly the right place, and doors that weren’t really doors at
all,
but solid walls just pretending. It was also very hard to remember where
anything was, because it all seemed to move around a lot. The people in the
portraits kept going to visit each other, and Harry was sure the coats of armor
could walk. The ghosts didn’t help, either. It was always a nasty shock when one of
them glided suddenly through a door you were trying to open. Nearly Headless
Nick was always happy to point new Gryffindors in the right direction, but
Peeves the Poltergeist was worth two locked doors and a trick staircase if you
met him when you were late for class. He would drop wastepaper baskets on
your head, pull rugs from under your feet, pelt you with bits of chalk, or sneak
up behind you, invisible, grab your nose, and screech, “GOT YOUR CONK!”
Even worse than Peeves, if that was possible, was the caretaker, Argus
Filch. Harry and Ron managed to get on the wrong side of him on their very
first
morning. Filch found them trying to force their way through a door that
unluckily turned out to be the entrance to the out-of-bounds corridor on the
third
floor. He wouldn’t believe they were lost, was sure they were trying to break
into
it on purpose, and was threatening to lock them in the dungeons when they
were
rescued by Professor Quirrell, who was passing.
Filch owned a cat called Mrs. Norris, a scrawny, dust-colored creature
with bulging, lamp like eyes just like Filch’s. She patrolled the corridors alone.
Break a rule in front of her, put just one toe out of line, and she’d whisk off for
Filch, who’d appear, wheezing, two seconds later. Filch knew the secret
passageways of the school better than anyone (except perhaps the Weasley
twins) and could pop up as suddenly as any of the ghosts. The students all
hated
himA, nadnd it was the dearest ambition of many to give Mrs. Norris a good kick. then, once you had managed to find them, there were the classes
themselves. There was a lot more to magic, as Harry quickly found out, than
waving your wand and saying a few funny words.
They had to study the night skies through their telescopes every
Wednesday at midnight and learn the names of different stars and the
movements
of the planets. Three times a week they went out to the greenhouses behind
the
castle to study Herbology, with a dumpy little witch called Professor Sprout,
where they learned how to take care of all the strange plants and fungi, and
found out what they were used for. Easily the most boring class was History of
Magic, which was the only one taught by a ghost. Professor Binns had been
very
old indeed when he had fallen asleep in front of the staff room fire and got up
next morning to teach, leaving his body behind him. Binns droned on and on
while they scribbled down names and dates, and got Emetic the Evil and Uric
the Oddball mixed up.
Professor Flitwick, the Charms teacher, was a tiny little wizard who had
to stand on a pile of books to see over his desk. At the start of their first class
he
took the roll call, and when he reached Harry’s name he gave an excited
squeak
and toppled out of sight.
Professor McGonagall was again different. Harry had been quite right to
think she wasn’t a teacher to cross. Strict and clever, she gave them a talkingto
the moment they sat down in her first class. “Transfiguration is some of the most complex and dangerous magic you
will learn at Hogwarts,” she said. “Anyone messing around in my class will
leave and not come back. You have been warned.”
Then she changed her desk into a pig and back again. They were all very
impressed and couldn’t wait to get started, but soon realized they weren’t
going
to be changing the furniture into animals for a long time. After taking a lot of
complicated notes, they were each given a match and started trying to turn it
into
a needle. By the end of the lesson, only Hermione Granger had made any
difference to her match; Professor McGonagall showed the class how it had
gone
all silver and pointy and gave Hermione a rare smile.
The class everyone had really been looking forward to was Defense
Against the Dark Arts, but Quirrell’s lessons turned out to be a bit of a joke.
His
classroom smelled strongly of garlic, which everyone said was to ward off a
vampire he’d met in Romania and was afraid would be coming back to get him
one of these days. His turban, he told them, had been given to him by an
African
prince as a thank-you for getting rid of a troublesome zombie, but they weren’t
sure they believed this story. For one thing, when Seamus Finnigan asked
eagerly to hear how Quirrell had fought off the zombie, Quirrell went pink and
started talking about the weather; for another, they had noticed that a funny
smell
hung around the turban, and the Weasley twins insisted that it was stuffed full
of
garlic as well, so that Quirrell was protected wherever he went.
Harry was very relieved to find out that he wasn’t miles behind everyone
else. Lots of people had come from Muggle families and, like him, hadn’t had
any idea that they were witches and wizards. There was so much to learn that
even people like Ron didn’t have much of a head start.
Friday was an important day for Harry and Ron. They finally managed to
find their way down to the Great Hall for breakfast without getting lost once.
“What have we got today?” Harry asked Ron as he poured sugar on his
porridge.
“Double Potions with the Slytherins,” said Ron. “Snape’s Head of
Slytherin House. They say he always favors them — we’ll be able to see if it’s
true.”
“Wish McGonagall favored us,” said Harry. Professor McGonagall was
head of Gryffindor House, but it hadn’t stopped her from giving them a huge
pile
of hJoumstetwhoernk, the dmaayilbaerfroirvee.d. Harry had gotten used to this by now, but it
had given him a bit of a shock on the first morning, when about a hundred owls
had suddenly streamed into the Great Hall during breakfast, circling the tables
until they saw their owners, and dropping letters and packages onto their laps.
Hedwig hadn’t brought Harry anything so far. She sometimes flew in to
nibble his ear and have a bit of toast before going off to sleep in the owlery
with
the other school owls. This morning, however, she fluttered down between the
marmalade and the sugar bowl and dropped a note onto Harry’s plate. Harry
tore
it open at once. It said, in a very untidy scrawl: Dear Harry,
I know you get Friday afternoons off, so would you like to come and have a
cup of tea with me around three?
I want to hear all about your first week. Send us an answer back with
Hedwig.
Hagrid
Harry borrowed Ron’s quill, scribbled Yes, please, see you later on the back
of the note, and sent Hedwig off again.
It was lucky that Harry had tea with Hagrid to look forward to, because
the Potions lesson turned out to be the worst thing that had happened to him
so
far.At the start-of-term banquet, Harry had gotten the idea that Professor
Snape disliked him. By the end of the first Potions lesson, he knew he’d been
wrong. Snape didn’t dislike Harry — he hated him.
Potions lessons took place down in one of the dungeons. It was colder
here than up in the main castle, and would have been quite creepy enough
without the pickled animals floating in glass jars all around the walls.
Snape, like Flitwick, started the class by taking the roll call, and like
Flitwick, he paused at Harry’s name. “Ah, Yes,” he said softly, “Harry Potter. Our new — celebrity.”
Draco Malfoy and his friends Crabbe and Goyle sniggered behind their
hands. Snape finished calling the names and looked up at the class. His eyes
were black like Hagrid’s, but they had none of Hagrid’s warmth. They were
cold
and“eYmouptay and made you think of dark tunnels. re here to learn the subtle science and exact art of potionmaking,”
he began. He spoke in barely more than a whisper, but they caught every word — like Professor McGonagall, Snape had the gift of keeping a class silent
without effort. “As there is little foolish wand-waving here, many of you will
hardly believe this is magic. I don’t expect you will really understand the
beauty
of the softly simmering cauldron with its shimmering fumes, the delicate power
of liquids that creep through human veins, bewitching the mind, ensnaring the
senses.…I can teach you how to bottle fame, brew glory, even stopper death —
if you aren’t as big a bunch of dunderheads as I usually have to teach.” More silence followed this little speech. Harry and Ron exchanged looks
with raised eyebrows. Hermione Granger was on the edge of her seat and
looked
desp“Peorate to start proving that she wasn’t a dunderhead. tter!” said Snape suddenly. “What would I get if I added powdered
root of asphodel to an infusion of wormwood?”
Powdered root of what to an infusion of what? Harry glanced at Ron,
who looked as stumped as he was; Hermione’s hand had shot into the air.
“I don’t know, sir,” said Harry.
Snape’s lips curled into a sneer.
“Tut, tut — fame clearly isn’t everything.”
He ignored Hermione’s hand.
“Let’s try again. Potter, where would you look if I told you to find me a
bezoar?”
Hermione stretched her hand as high into the air as it would go without
her leaving her seat, but Harry didn’t have the faintest idea what a bezoar was.
He tried not to look at Malfoy, Crabbe, and Goyle, who were shaking with
laughter.
“I don’t know, sir.”
“Thought you wouldn’t open a book before coming, eh, Potter?” Harry
forced himself to keep looking straight into those cold eyes. He had looked
through his books at the Dursleys’, but did Snape expect him to remember
everything in One Thousand Magical Herbs and Fungi?
Snape was still ignoring Hermione’s quivering hand.
“What is the difference, Potter, between monkshood and wolfsbane?”
At this, Hermione stood up, her hand stretching toward the dungeon
ceiling.
“I don’t know,” said Harry quietly. “I think Hermione does, though, why
don’t you try her?”
A few people laughed; Harry caught Seamus’s eye, and Seamus winked.
Snape, however, was not pleased.
“Sit down,” he snapped at Hermione. “For your information, Potter,
asphodel and wormwood make a sleeping potion so powerful it is known as the
Draught of Living Death. A bezoar is a stone taken from the stomach of a goat
and it will save you from most poisons. As for monkshood and wolfsbane, they
are the same plant, which also goes by the name of aconite. Well? Why aren’t
you all copying that down?”
There was a sudden rummaging for quills and parchment. Over the noise,
Snape said, “And a point will be taken from Gryffindor House for your cheek,
Potter.”
Things didn’t improve for the Gryffindors as the Potions lesson
continued. Snape put them all into pairs and set them to mixing up a simple
potion to cure boils. He swept around in his long black cloak, watching them
weigh dried nettles and crush snake fangs, criticizing almost everyone except
Malfoy, whom he seemed to like. He was just telling everyone to look at the
perfect way Malfoy had stewed his horned slugs when clouds of acid green
smoke and a loud hissing filled the dungeon. Neville had somehow managed to
melt Seamus’s cauldron into a twisted blob, and their potion was seeping
across
the stone floor, burning holes in people’s shoes. Within seconds, the whole
class
was standing on their stools while Neville, who had been drenched in the
potion
when the cauldron collapsed, moaned in pain as angry red boils sprang up all
over his arms and legs. “Idiot boy!” snarled Snape, clearing the spilled potion away with one
wave of his wand. “I suppose you added the porcupine quills before taking the
cauldron off the fire?”
Neville whimpered as boils started to pop up all over his nose.
“Take him up to the hospital wing,” Snape spat at Seamus. Then he
rounded on Harry and Ron, who had been working next to Neville. “You — Potter — why didn’t you tell him not to add the quills? Thought
he’d make you look good if he got it wrong, did you? That’s another point
you’ve lost for Gryffindor.”
This was so unfair that Harry opened his mouth to argue, but Ron kicked
him behind their cauldron.
“Don’t push it,” he muttered, “I’ve heard Snape can turn very nasty.”
As they climbed the steps out of the dungeon an hour later, Harry’s mind
was racing and his spirits were low. He’d lost two points for Gryffindor in his
very first week — why did Snape hate him so much?
“Cheer up,” said Ron, “Snape’s always taking points off Fred and
George. Can I come and meet Hagrid with you?”
At five to three they left the castle and made their way across the
grounds. Hagrid lived in a small wooden house on the edge of the forbidden
forest. A crossbow and a pair of galoshes were outside the front door.
When Harry knocked they heard a frantic scrabbling from inside and
several booming barks. Then Hagrid’s voice rang out, saying, “Back, Fang —
back.”
Hagrid’s big, hairy face appeared in the crack as he pulled the door open.
“Hang on,” he said. “Back, Fang.”
He let them in, struggling to keep a hold on the collar of an enormous
black boarhound.
There was only one room inside. Hams and pheasants were hanging from
the ceiling, a copper kettle was boiling on the open fire, and in the corner
stood a
mas“sMivaekbeeydewith a patchwork quilt over it. rselves at home,” said Hagrid, letting go of Fang, who bounded
straight at Ron and started licking his ears. Like Hagrid, Fang was clearly not
as
fierce as he looked.
“This is Ron,” Harry told Hagrid, who was pouring boiling water into a
large teapot and putting rock cakes onto a plate.
“Another Weasley, eh?” said Hagrid, glancing at Ron’s freckles. I spent
half me life chasin’ yer twin brothers away from the forest.”
The rock cakes were shapeless lumps with raisins that almost broke their
teeth, but Harry and Ron pretended to be enjoying them as they told Hagrid all
about their first lessons. Fang rested his head on Harry’s knee and drooled all
over his robes.
Harry and Ron were delighted to hear Hagrid call Filch “that old git.”
“An’ as fer that cat, Mrs. Norris, I’d like ter introduce her to Fang
sometime. D’yeh know, every time I go up ter the school, she follows me
everywhere? Can’t get rid of her — Filch puts her up to it.”
Harry told Hagrid about Snape’s lesson. Hagrid, like Ron, told Harry not
to worry about it, that Snape liked hardly any of the students.
“But he seemed to really hate me.”
“Rubbish!” said Hagrid. “Why should he?”
Yet Harry couldn’t help thinking that Hagrid didn’t quite meet his eyes
when he said that.
“How’s yer brother Charlie?” Hagrid asked Ron. “I liked him a lot —
great with animals.”
Harry wondered if Hagrid had changed the subject on purpose. While
Ron told Hagrid all about Charlie’s work with dragons, Harry picked up a piece
of paper that was lying on the table under the tea cozy. It was a cutting from
the
Daily Prophet:
GRINGOTTS BREAK-IN LATEST
Investigations continue into the break-in at Gringotts on 31 July, widely
believed to be the work of Dark wizards or witches unknown.
wasGsreinagotts goblins today insisted that nothing had been taken. The vault that rched had in fact been emptied the same day.
“But we’re not telling you what was in there, so keep your noses out if you
know what’s good for you,” said a Gringotts spokesgoblin this afternoon.
Harry remembered Ron telling him on the train that someone had tried to
Grinrogbotts, but Ron hadn’t mentioned the date.
“Hagrid!” said Harry, “that Gringotts break-in happened on my birthday!
It might’ve been happening while we were there!”
There was no doubt about it, Hagrid definitely didn’t meet Harry’s eyes
this time. He grunted and offered him another rock cake. Harry read the story
again. The vault that was searched had in fact been emptied earlier that same
day. Hagrid had emptied vault seven hundred and thirteen, if you could call it
emptying, taking out that grubby little package. Had that been what the
thieves
were looking for?
As Harry and Ron walked back to the castle for dinner, their pockets
weighed down with rock cakes they’d been too polite to refuse, Harry thought
that none of the lessons he’d had so far had given him as much to think about
as
tea with Hagrid. Had Hagrid collected that package just in time? Where was it
now? And did Hagrid know something about Snape that he didn’t want to tell
Harry?
HP 1 - Harry Potter and the
Sorcerer's Stone
CHAPTER NINE
THE MIDNIGHT DUEL
H arry had never believed he would meet a boy he hated more than Dudley,
but that was before he met Draco Malfoy. Still, first-year Gryffindors only had
Potions with the Slytherins, so they didn’t have to put up with Malfoy much. Or
at least, they didn’t until they spotted a notice pinned up in the Gryffindor
common room that made them all groan. Flying lessons would be starting on
Thursday — and Gryffindor and Slytherin would be learning together.
“Typical,” said Harry darkly. “Just what I always wanted. To make a fool
of myself on a broomstick in front of Malfoy.”
He had been looking forward to learning to fly more than anything else.
“You don’t know that you’ll make a fool of yourself,” said Ron
reasonably. “Anyway, I know Malfoy’s always going on about how good he is at
Quidditch, but I bet that’s all talk.”
Malfoy certainly did talk about flying a lot. He complained loudly about
first years never getting on the house Quidditch teams and told long, boastful
stories that always seemed to end with him narrowly escaping Muggles in
helicopters. He wasn’t the only one, though: the way Seamus Finnigan told it,
he’d spent most of his childhood zooming around the countryside on his
broomstick. Even Ron would tell anyone who’d listen about the time he’d
almost hit a hang glider on Charlie’s old broom. Everyone from wizarding
families talked about Quidditch constantly. Ron had already had a big
argument
with Dean Thomas, who shared their dormitory, about soccer. Ron couldn’t see
what was exciting about a game with only one ball where no one was allowed
to
fly. Harry had caught Ron prodding Dean’s poster of West Ham soccer team,
tryiNngevtoillme ahkaed tnheeveprlabyeeerns monovaeb. roomstick in his life, because his
grandmother had never let him near one. Privately, Harry felt she’d had good
reason, because Neville managed to have an extraordinary number of
accidents
evenHwith both feet on the ground. ermione Granger was almost as nervous about flying as Neville was.
This was something you couldn’t learn by heart out of a book — not that she
hadn’t tried. At breakfast on Thursday she bored them all stupid with flying
tips
she’d gotten out of a library book called Quidditch Through the Ages. Neville
was hanging on to her every word, desperate for anything that might help him
hang on to his broomstick later, but everybody else was very pleased when
Hermione’s lecture was interrupted by the arrival of the mail.
Harry hadn’t had a single letter since Hagrid’s note, something that
Malfoy had been quick to notice, of course. Malfoy’s eagle owl was always
bringing him packages of sweets from home, which he opened gloatingly at the
Slytherin table.
A barn owl brought Neville a small package from his grandmother. He
opened it excitedly and showed them a glass ball the size of a large marble,
which seemed to be full of white smoke.
“It’s a Remembrall!” he explained. “Gran knows I forget things — this
tells you if there’s something you’ve forgotten to do. Look, you hold it tight like
this and if it turns red — oh…” His face fell, because the Remembrall had
suddenly glowed scarlet, “…you’ve forgotten something….”
Neville was trying to remember what he’d forgotten when Draco Malfoy,
who was passing the Gryffindor table, snatched the Remembrall out of his
hanHd.arry and Ron jumped to their feet. They were half hoping for a reason
to fight Malfoy, but Professor McGonagall, who could spot trouble quicker than
any teacher in the school, was there in a flash.
“What’s going on?”
“Malfoy’s got my Remembrall, Professor.”
Scowling, Malfoy quickly dropped the Remembrall back on the table.
“Just looking,” he said, and he sloped away with Crabbe and Goyle
behind him.
At three-thirty that afternoon, Harry, Ron, and the other Gryffindors hurried
down the front steps onto the grounds for their first flying lesson. It was a
clear,
breezy day, and the grass rippled under their feet as they marched down the
sloping lawns toward a smooth, flat lawn on the opposite side of the grounds to
theTfohrebSidlydtehnerfoinrseswt,ewrehaolsreeatrdeyesthwereer,easnwdasyoinwgedraertkwlyeinntythberodoismtasnticcek.s lying
in neat lines on the ground. Harry had heard Fred and George Weasley
complain
about the school brooms, saying that some of them started to vibrate if you
flew
too high, or always flew slightly to the left.
Their teacher, Madam Hooch, arrived. She had short, gray hair, and
yellow eyes like a hawk.
“Well, what are you all waiting for?” she barked. “Everyone stand by a
broomstick. Come on, hurry up.”
Harry glanced down at his broom. It was old and some of the twigs stuck
out at odd angles.
“Stick out your right hand over your broom,” called Madam Hooch at the
front, “and say ‘Up!’”
“UP” everyone shouted.
Harry’s broom jumped into his hand at once, but it was one of the few
that did. Hermione Granger’s had simply rolled over on the ground, and
Neville’s hadn’t moved at all. Perhaps brooms, like horses, could tell when you
were afraid, thought Harry; there was a quaver in Neville’s voice that said only
too clearly that he wanted to keep his feet on the ground.
Madam Hooch then showed them how to mount their brooms without
sliding off the end, and walked up and down the rows correcting their grips.
Harry and Ron were delighted when she told Malfoy he’d been doing it wrong
for years.
“Now, when I blow my whistle, you kick off from the ground, hard,” said
Madam Hooch. “Keep your brooms steady, rise a few feet, and then come
straight back down by leaning forward slightly. On my whistle — three — two —”
But Neville, nervous and jumpy and frightened of being left on the
ground, pushed off hard before the whistle had touched Madam Hooch’s lips.
“Come back, boy!” she shouted, but Neville was rising straight up like a
cork shot out of a bottle — twelve feet — twenty feet. Harry saw his scared
white face look down at the ground falling away, saw him gasp, slip sideways
off the broom and —
WHAM — a thud and a nasty crack and Neville lay facedown on the
grass in a heap. His broomstick was still rising higher and higher, and started
to
drifMt laadzialmy tHowooarcdh twhaesfobrebniddden forest and out of sight. ing over Neville, her face as white as his.
“Broken wrist,” Harry heard her mutter. “Come on, boy — it’s all right,
up you get.”
She turned to the rest of the class.
“None of you is to move while I take this boy to the hospital wing! You
leave those brooms where they are or you’ll be out of Hogwarts before you can
say ‘Quidditch.’ Come on, dear.”
Neville, his face tear-streaked, clutching his wrist, hobbled off with
MadNaomsoHoonoecrhw, werheothhaedy ohuert oarm around him. f earshot than Malfoy burst into laughter.
“Did you see his face, the great lump?”
The other Slytherins joined in.
“Shut up, Malfoy,” snapped Parvati Patil.
“Ooh, sticking up for Longbottom?” said Pansy Parkinson, a hard-faced
Slytherin girl. “Never thought you’d like fat little crybabies, Parvati.”
“Look!” said Malfoy, darting forward and snatching something out of the
grass. “It’s that stupid thing Longbottom’s gran sent him.”
The Remembrall glittered in the sun as he held it up.
“Give that here, Malfoy,” said Harry quietly. Everyone stopped talking to
watch. Malfoy smiled nastily.
“I think I’ll leave it somewhere for Longbottom to find — how about —
up a tree?”
“Give it here!” Harry yelled, but Malfoy had leapt onto his broomstick
and taken off. He hadn’t been lying, he could fly well. Hovering level with the
topmost branches of an oak he called, “Come and get it, Potter!”
Harry grabbed his broom.
“No!” shouted Hermione Granger. “Madam Hooch told us not to move
— you’ll get us all into trouble.”
Harry ignored her. Blood was pounding in his ears. He mounted the
broom and kicked hard against the ground and up, up he soared; air rushed
through his hair, and his robes whipped out behind him — and in a rush of
fierce
joy he realized he’d found something he could do without being taught — this
was easy, this was wonderful. He pulled his broomstick up a little to take it
even
higher, and heard screams and gasps of girls back on the ground and an
admiring
whoop from Ron.
He turned his broomstick sharply to face Malfoy in midair. Malfoy
looked stunned.
“Give it here,” Harry called, “or I’ll knock you off that broom!”
“Oh, yeah?” said Malfoy, trying to sneer, but looking worried.
Harry knew, somehow, what to do. He leaned forward and grasped the
broom tightly in both hands, and it shot toward Malfoy like a javelin. Malfoy
only just got out of the way in time; Harry made a sharp about-face and held
the
broom steady. A few people below were clapping. “No Crabbe and Goyle up here to save your neck, Malfoy,” Harry called.
The same thought seemed to have struck Malfoy.
“Catch it if you can, then!” he shouted, and he threw the glass ball high
into the air and streaked back toward the ground.
Harry saw, as though in slow motion, the ball rise up in the air and then
start to fall. He leaned forward and pointed his broom handle down — next
second he was gathering speed in a steep dive, racing the ball — wind whistled
in his ears, mingled with the screams of people watching — he stretched out
his
hand — a foot from the ground he caught it, just in time to pull his broom
straight, and he toppled gently onto the grass with the Remembrall clutched
safely in his fist.
“HARRY POTTER!”
His heart sank faster than he’d just dived. Professor McGonagall was
running toward them. He got to his feet, trembling.
“Never — in all my time at Hogwarts —”
Professor McGonagall was almost speechless with shock, and her glasses
flashed furiously, “— how dare you — might have broken your neck —”
“It wasn’t his fault, Professor —”
“Be quiet, Miss Patil —”
“But Malfoy —”
“That’s enough, Mr. Weasley. Potter, follow me, now.”
Harry caught sight of Malfoy, Crabbe, and Goyle’s triumphant faces as
he left, walking numbly in Professor McGonagall’s wake as she strode toward
the castle. He was going to be expelled, he just knew it. He wanted to say
something to defend himself, but there seemed to be something wrong with his
voice. Professor McGonagall was sweeping along without even looking at him;
he had to jog to keep up. Now he’d done it. He hadn’t even lasted two weeks.
He’d be packing his bags in ten minutes. What would the Dursleys say when he
turned up on the doorstep?
Up the front steps, up the marble staircase inside, and still Professor
McGonagall didn’t say a word to him. She wrenched open doors and marched
along corridors with Harry trotting miserably behind her. Maybe she was
taking
him to Dumbledore. He thought of Hagrid, expelled but allowed to stay on as
gamekeeper. Perhaps he could be Hagrid’s assistant. His stomach twisted as
he
imagined it, watching Ron and the others becoming wizards, while he stumped
around the grounds carrying Hagrid’s bag.
Professor McGonagall stopped outside a classroom. She opened the door
and poked her head inside.
“Excuse me, Professor Flitwick, could I borrow Wood for a moment?” Wood? thought Harry, bewildered; was Wood a cane she was going to
use on him?
But Wood turned out to be a person, a burly fifth-year boy who came out
of Flitwick’s class looking confused.
“Follow me, you two,” said Professor McGonagall, and they marched on
up the corridor, Wood looking curiously at Harry.
“In here.”
Professor McGonagall pointed them into a classroom that was empty
except for Peeves, who was busy writing rude words on the blackboard.
“Out, Peeves!” she barked. Peeves threw the chalk into a bin, which
clanged loudly, and he swooped out cursing. Professor McGonagall slammed
the
door behind him and turned to face the two boys. “Potter, this is Oliver Wood. Wood — I’ve found you a Seeker.” Wood’s expression changed from puzzlement to delight.
“Are you serious, Professor?”
“Absolutely,” said Professor McGonagall crisply. “The boy’s a natural.
I’ve never seen anything like it. Was that your first time on a broomstick,
Potter?”
Harry nodded silently. He didn’t have a clue what was going on, but he
didn’t seem to be being expelled, and some of the feeling started coming back
to
his “leHges.caught that thing in his hand after a fifty-foot dive,” Professor
McGonagall told Wood. “Didn’t even scratch himself. Charlie Weasley couldn’t
have done it.”
Wood was now looking as though all his dreams had come true at once.
“Ever seen a game of Quidditch, Potter?” he asked excitedly.
“Wood’s captain of the Gryffindor team,” Professor McGonagall
explained.
“He’s just the build for a Seeker, too,” said Wood, now walking around
Harry and staring at him. “Light —speedy — we’ll have to get him a decent
broom, Professor — a Nimbus Two Thousand or a Cleansweep Seven, I’d say.”
“I shall speak to Professor Dumbledore and see if we can’t bend the firstyear rule. Heaven knows, we need a better team than last year. Flattened in
that
lastPmroaftecshsobryMSlcyGthoenraigna, lIl cpoeuelrdend’tsltoeorknlSyeovveerruhseSrngalpaessiensthateHfaacreryf.or weeks.…”
“I want to hear you’re training hard, Potter, or I may change my mind
about punishing you.”
Then she suddenly smiled.
“Your father would have been proud,” she said. “He was an excellent
Quidditch player himself.”
“You’re joking.”
It was dinnertime. Harry had just finished telling Ron what had happened
when he’d left the grounds with Professor McGonagall. Ron had a piece of
steak
and“kSiedenkeeyr?p”iehheaslafway to his mouth, but he’d forgotten all about it. id. “But first years never — you must be the youngest
house player in about —”
“ — a century,” said Harry, shoveling pie into his mouth. He felt
particularly hungry after the excitement of the afternoon. “Wood told me.”
Ron was so amazed, so impressed, he just sat and gaped at Harry.
“I start training next week,” said Harry. “Only don’t tell anyone, Wood
wants to keep it a secret.”
Fred and George Weasley now came into the hall, spotted Harry, and
hurried over.
“Well done,” said George in a low voice. “Wood told us. We’re on the
team too — Beaters.”
“I tell you, we’re going to win that Quidditch cup for sure this year,” said
Fred. “We haven’t won since Charlie left, but this year’s team is going to be
brilliant. You must be good, Harry, Wood was almost skipping when he told
us.”“Anyway, we’ve got to go, Lee Jordan reckons he’s found a new secret
passageway out of the school.”
“Bet it’s that one behind the statue of Gregory the Smarmy that we found
in oFur first week. See you.” red and George had hardly disappeared when someone far less welcome
turned up: Malfoy, flanked by Crabbe and Goyle.
“Having a last meal, Potter? When are you getting the train back to the
Muggles?”
“You’re a lot braver now that you’re back on the ground and you’ve got
your little friends with you,” said Harry coolly. There was of course nothing at
all little about Crabbe and Goyle, but as the High Table was full of teachers,
neither of them could do more than crack their knuckles and scowl.
“I’d take you on anytime on my own,” said Malfoy. “Tonight, if you
want. Wizard’s duel. Wands only — no contact. What’s the matter? Never
heard
of a“wOifzcaorudr
’sseduheelhbaesf,o”rsea, iIdsRuponp,osweh?e”eling around. “I’m his second, who’s
yours?” Malfoy looked at Crabbe and Goyle, sizing them up.
“Crabbe,” he said. “Midnight all right? We’ll meet you in the trophy
room; that’s always unlocked.” When Malfoy had gone, Ron and Harry looked at each other.
“What is a wizard’s duel?” said Harry. “And what do you mean, you’re
my second?”
“Well, a second’s there to take over if you die,” said Ron casually, getting
started at last on his cold pie. Catching the look on Harry’s face, he added
quickly, “But people only die in proper duels, you know, with real wizards. The
most you and Malfoy’ll be able to do is send sparks at each other. Neither of
you
knows enough magic to do any real damage. I bet he expected you to refuse,
anyway.”
“And what if I wave my wand and nothing happens?”
“Throw it away and punch him on the nose,” Ron suggested.
“Excuse me.”
They both looked up. It was Hermione Granger.
“Can’t a person eat in peace in this place?” said Ron.
Hermione ignored him and spoke to Harry.
“I couldn’t help overhearing what you and Malfoy were saying —”
“Bet you could,” Ron muttered.
“— and you mustn’t go wandering around the school at night, think of
the points you’ll lose Gryffindor if you’re caught, and you’re bound to be. It’s
really very selfish of you.”
“And it’s really none of your business,” said Harry.
“Good-bye,” said Ron.
All the same, it wasn’t what you’d call the perfect end to the day, Harry
thought, as he lay awake much later listening to Dean and Seamus falling
asleep
(Neville wasn’t back from the hospital wing). Ron had spent all evening giving
him advice such as “If he tries to curse you, you’d better dodge it, because I
can’t remember how to block them.” There was a very good chance they were
going to get caught by Filch or Mrs. Norris, and Harry felt he was pushing his
luck, breaking another school rule today. On the other hand, Malfoy’s sneering
face kept looming up out of the darkness — this was his big chance to beat
Mal“fHoyalffa-pcea-sttoe-flaecvee.nH,”eRcoonulmdnu’tttemreisdsaitt.last, “we’d better go.”
They pulled on their bathrobes, picked up their wands, and crept across
the tower room, down the spiral staircase, and into the Gryffindor common
room. A few embers were still glowing in the fireplace, turning all the
armchairs
into hunched black shadows. They had almost reached the portrait hole when a
voice spoke from the chair nearest them, “I can’t believe you’re going to do
this,
Harry.”
A lamp flickered on. It was Hermione Granger, wearing a pink bathrobe
and a frown.
“You!” said Ron furiously. “Go back to bed!”
“I almost told your brother,” Hermione snapped, “Percy — he’s a prefect,
he’d put a stop to this.”
Harry couldn’t believe anyone could be so interfering.
“Come on,” he said to Ron. He pushed open the portrait of the Fat Lady
and climbed through the hole.
Hermione wasn’t going to give up that easily. She followed Ron through
the portrait hole, hissing at them like an angry goose.
“Don’t you care about Gryffindor, do you only care about yourselves, I
don’t want Slytherin to win the house cup, and you’ll lose all the points I got
from Professor McGonagall for knowing about Switching Spells.”
“Go away.”
“All right, but I warned you, you just remember what I said when you’re
on the train home tomorrow, you’re so —”
But what they were, they didn’t find out. Hermione had turned to the
portrait of the Fat Lady to get back inside and found herself facing an empty
painting. The Fat Lady had gone on a nighttime visit and Hermione was locked
out of Gryffindor tower.
“Now what am I going to do?” she asked shrilly.
“That’s your problem,” said Ron. “We’ve got to go, we’re going to be
late.”
They hadn’t even reached the end of the corridor when Hermione caught
up with them.
“I’m coming with you,” she said.
“You are not.”
“D’you think I’m going to stand out here and wait for Filch to catch me?
If he finds all three of us I’ll tell him the truth, that I was trying to stop you,
and
you“cYaonu’bvaecgkomt esoumpe.”nerve —” said Ron loudly.
“Shut up, both of you!” said Harry sharply. I heard something.”
It was a sort of snuffling.
“Mrs. Norris?” breathed Ron, squinting through the dark.
It wasn’t Mrs. Norris. It was Neville. He was curled up on the floor, fast
asleep, but jerked suddenly awake as they crept nearer.
“Thank goodness you found me! I’ve been out here for hours, I couldn’t
remember the new password to get in to bed.”
“Keep your voice down, Neville. The password’s ‘Pig snout’ but it won’t
help you now, the Fat Lady’s gone off somewhere.”
“How’s your arm?” said Harry.
“Fine,” said Neville, showing them. “Madam Pomfrey mended it in
about a minute.”
“Good — well, look, Neville, we’ve got to be somewhere, we’ll see you
later —”
“Don’t leave me!” said Neville, scrambling to his feet, “I don’t want to
stay here alone, the Bloody Baron’s been past twice already.”
Ron looked at his watch and then glared furiously at Hermione and
Neville.
“If either of you get us caught, I’ll never rest until I’ve learned that Curse
of the Bogies Quirrell told us about, and used it on you.”
Hermione opened her mouth, perhaps to tell Ron exactly how to use the
Curse of the Bogies, but Harry hissed at her to be quiet and beckoned them all
forward.
They flitted along corridors striped with bars of moonlight from the high
windows. At every turn Harry expected to run into Filch or Mrs. Norris, but
they
were lucky. They sped up a staircase to the third floor and tiptoed toward the
tropMhy room. alfoy and Crabbe weren’t there yet. The crystal trophy cases
glimmered where the moonlight caught them. Cups, shields, plates, and
statues
winked silver and gold in the darkness. They edged along the walls, keeping
their eyes on the doors at either end of the room. Harry took out his wand in
case
Malfoy leapt in and started at once. The minutes crept by.
“He’s late, maybe he’s chickened out,” Ron whispered.
Then a noise in the next room made them jump. Harry had only just
raised his wand when they heard someone speak — and it wasn’t Malfoy.
“Sniff around, my sweet, they might be lurking in a corner.”
It was Filch speaking to Mrs. Norris. Horror-struck, Harry waved madly
at the other three to follow him as quickly as possible; they scurried silently
toward the door, away from Filch’s voice. Neville’s robes had barely whipped
round the corner when they heard Filch enter the trophy room.
“They’re in here somewhere,” they heard him mutter, “probably hiding.”
“This way!” Harry mouthed to the others and, petrified, they began to
creep down a long gallery full of suits of armor. They could hear Filch getting
nearer. Neville suddenly let out a frightened squeak and broke into a run he
tripped, grabbed Ron around the waist, and the pair of them toppled right into
a
suit of armor. The clanging and crashing were enough to wake the whole castle.
“RUN!” Harry yelled, and the four of them sprinted down the gallery, not
looking back to see whether Filch was following — they swung around the
doorpost and galloped down one corridor then another, Harry in the lead,
without
any idea where they were or where they were going — they ripped through a
tapestry and found themselves in a hidden passageway, hurtled along it and
came
out near their Charms classroom, which they knew was miles from the trophy
room.
“I think we’ve lost him,” Harry panted, leaning against the cold wall and
wiping his forehead. Neville was bent double, wheezing and spluttering.
I — told — you,” Hermione gasped, clutching at the stitch in her chest,
“I — told — you.”
“We’ve got to get back to Gryffindor tower,” said Ron, “quickly as
possible.”
“Malfoy tricked you,” Hermione said to Harry. “You realize that, don’t
you? He was never going to meet you — Filch knew someone was going to be
in
theHtraorprhyythroooumgh,tMshalefowyams upsr
tobhaabvelytr
ipigphetd, bhuimt hoeffw.”asn’t going to tell her that.
“Let’s go.”
It wasn’t going to be that simple. They hadn’t gone more than a dozen
paces when a doorknob rattled and something came shooting out of a
classroom
in frIot nwtaosfPtheeevme.s. He caught sight of them and gave a squeal of delight.
“Shut up, Peeves — please — you’ll get us thrown out.”
Peeves cackled.
“Wandering around at midnight, Ickle Firsties? Tut, tut, tut. Naughty,
naughty, you’ll get caughty.”
“Not if you don’t give us away, Peeves, please.”
“Should tell Filch, I should,” said Peeves in a saintly voice, but his eyes
glittered wickedly. “It’s for your own good, you know.”
“Get out of the way,” snapped Ron, taking a swipe at Peeves this was a
big mistake.
“STUDENTS OUT OF BED!” Peeves bellowed, “STUDENTS OUT OF
BED DOWN THE CHARMS CORRIDOR!”
Ducking under Peeves, they ran for their lives, right to the end of the
corridor where they slammed into a door — and it was locked.
“This is it!” Ron moaned, as they pushed helplessly at the door, “We’re
done for! This is the end!”
They could hear footsteps, Filch running as fast as he could toward
Peeves’s shouts.
“Oh, move over,” Hermione snarled. She grabbed Harry’s wand, tapped
the lock, and whispered, “Alohomora!”
The lock clicked and the door swung open — they piled through it, shut
it quickly, and pressed their ears against it, listening.
“Which way did they go, Peeves?” Filch was saying. “Quick, tell me.”
“Say ‘please.’”
“Don’t mess with me, Peeves, now where did they go?”
“Shan’t say nothing if you don’t say please,” said Peeves in his annoying
singsong voice.
“All right — please.”
“NOTHING! Ha haaa! Told you I wouldn’t say nothing if you didn’t say
please! Ha ha! Haaaaaa!” And they heard the sound of Peeves whooshing away
and Filch cursing in rage.
“He thinks this door is locked,” Harry whispered. “I think we’ll be okay — get off, Neville!” For Neville had been tugging on the sleeve of Harry’s
bathrobe for the last minute. “What?”
Harry turned around — and saw, quite clearly, what. For a moment, he
was sure he’d walked into a nightmare — this was too much, on top of
everything that had happened so far.
They weren’t in a room, as he had supposed. They were in a corridor.
The forbidden corridor on the third floor. And now they knew why it was
forbidden.
They were looking straight into the eyes of a monstrous dog, a dog that
filled the whole space between ceiling and floor. It had three heads. Three
pairs
of rolling, mad eyes; three noses, twitching and quivering in their direction;
three
drooling mouths, saliva hanging in slippery ropes from yellowish fangs.
It was standing quite still, all six eyes staring at them, and Harry knew
that the only reason they weren’t already dead was that their sudden
appearance
had taken it by surprise, but it was quickly getting over that, there was no
mistaking what those thunderous growls meant. Harry groped for the doorknob — between Filch and death, he’d take
Filch.
They fell backward — Harry slammed the door shut, and they ran, they
almost flew, back down the corridor. Filch must have hurried off to look for
them somewhere else, because they didn’t see him anywhere, but they hardly
cared — all they wanted to do was put as much space as possible between
them
and that monster. They didn’t stop running until they reached the portrait of
the
Fat Lady on the seventh floor.
“Where on earth have you all been?” she asked, looking at their
bathrobes hanging off their shoulders and their flushed, sweaty faces.
“Never mind that — pig snout, pig snout,” panted Harry, and the portrait
swung forward. They scrambled into the common room and collapsed,
trembling, into armchairs.
It was a while before any of them said anything. Neville, indeed, looked
as if he’d never speak again.
“What do they think they’re doing, keeping a thing like that locked up in
a school?” said Ron finally. “If any dog needs exercise, that one does.”
Hermione had got both her breath and her bad temper back again. “You
don’t use your eyes, any of you, do you?” she snapped. “Didn’t you see what it
was standing on.
“The floor?” Harry suggested. “I wasn’t looking at its feet, I was too
busy with its heads.”
“No, not the floor. It was standing on a trapdoor. It’s obviously guarding
something.”
She stood up, glaring at them.
“I hope you’re pleased with yourselves. We could all have been killed —
or worse, expelled. Now, if you don’t mind, I’m going to bed.”
Ron stared after her, his mouth open.
“No, we don’t mind,” he said. “You’d think we dragged her along,
wouldn’t you.
But Hermione had given Harry something else to think about as he
climbed back into bed. The dog was guarding something…What had Hagrid
said? Gringotts was the safest place in the world for something you wanted to
hide — except perhaps Hogwarts. It looked as though Harry had found out where the grubby little package
from vault seven hundred and thirteen was.
HP 1 - Harry Potter and the
Sorcerer's Stone
CHAPTER TEN
HALLOWEEN
M alfoy couldn’t believe his eyes when he saw that Harry and Ron were still
at Hogwarts the next day, looking tired but perfectly cheerful. Indeed, by the
next morning Harry and Ron thought that meeting the three-headed dog had
been an excellent adventure, and they were quite keen to have another one. In
the meantime, Harry filled Ron in about the package that seemed to have been
moved from Gringotts to Hogwarts, and they spent a lot of time wondering
what
could possibly need such heavy protection.
“It’s either really valuable or really dangerous,” said Ron.
“Or both,” said Harry.
But as all they knew for sure about the mysterious object was that it was
about two inches long, they didn’t have much chance of guessing what it was
without further clues.
Neither Neville nor Hermione showed the slightest interest in what lay
underneath the dog and the trapdoor. All Neville cared about was never going
near the dog again.
Hermione was now refusing to speak to Harry and Ron, but she was such
a bossy know-it-all that they saw this as an added bonus. All they really wanted
now was a way of getting back at Malfoy, and to their great delight, just such a
thing arrived in the mail about a week later.
As the owls flooded into the Great Hall as usual, everyone’s attention
was caught at once by a long, thin package carried by six large screech owls.
Harry was just as interested as everyone else to see what was in this large
parcel,
and was amazed when the owls soared down and dropped it right in front of
him,
knocking his bacon to the floor. They had hardly fluttered out of the way when
another owl dropped a letter on top of the parcel. Harry ripped open the letter first, which was lucky, because it said:
DO NOT OPEN THE PARCEL AT THE TABLE.
It contains your new Nimbus Two Thousand, but I don’t want
everybody knowing you’ve got a broomstick or they’ll all want one. Oliver
Wood will meet you tonight on the Quidditch field at seven o’clock for your
first
training session.
Professor McGonagall
Harry had difficulty hiding his glee as he handed the note to Ron to read.
“A Nimbus Two Thousand!” Ron moaned enviously. “I’ve never even
touched one.”
They left the hall quickly, wanting to unwrap the broomstick in private
before their first class, but halfway across the entrance hall they found the way
upstairs barred by Crabbe and Goyle. Malfoy seized the package from Harry
and
felt“iTt.hat’s a broomstick,” he said, throwing it back to Harry with a mixture
of jealousy and spite on his face. “You’ll be in for it this time, Potter, first years
aren’t allowed them.”
Ron couldn’t resist it.
“It’s not any old broomstick,” he said, “it’s a Nimbus Two Thousand.
What did you say you’ve got at home, Malfoy, a Comet Two Sixty?” Ron
grinned at Harry. “Comets look flashy, but they’re not in the same league as
the
Nimbus.” “What would you know about it, Weasley, you couldn’t afford half the
handle,” Malfoy snapped back. “I suppose you and your brothers have to save
up
twigBebfyor
twe iRgo.”n could answer, Professor Flitwick appeared at Malfoy’s
elbow.
“Not arguing, I hope, boys?” he squeaked.
“Potter’s been sent a broomstick, Professor,” said Malfoy quickly.
“Yes, yes, that’s right,” said Professor Flitwick, beaming at Harry.
“Professor McGonagall told me all about the special circumstances, Potter.
And
wha“tAmNoidmebl uiss iTt?w”o Thousand, it is,” said Harry, fighting not to laugh at the
look of horror on Malfoy’s face. “And it’s really thanks to Malfoy here that I’ve
got it,” he added.
Harry and Ron headed upstairs, smothering their laughter at Malfoy’s
obvious rage and confusion.
“Well, it’s true,” Harry chortled as they reached the top of the marble
staircase, “If he hadn’t stolen Neville’s Remembrall I wouldn’t be on the team. …”
“So I suppose you think that’s a reward for breaking rules?” came an
angry voice from just behind them. Hermione was stomping up the stairs,
looking disapprovingly at the package in Harry’s hand.
“I thought you weren’t speaking to us?” said Harry.
“Yes, don’t stop now,” said Ron, “it’s doing us so much good.”
Hermione marched away with her nose in the air.
Harry had a lot of trouble keeping his mind on his lessons that day. It
kept wandering up to the dormitory where his new broomstick was lying under
his bed, or straying off to the Quidditch field where he’d be learning to play
that
night. He bolted his dinner that evening without noticing what he was eating,
and then rushed upstairs with Ron to unwrap the Nimbus Two Thousand at
last.
“Wow,” Ron sighed, as the broomstick rolled onto Harry’s bedspread.
Even Harry, who knew nothing about the different brooms, thought it
looked wonderful. Sleek and shiny, with a mahogany handle, it had a long tail
of
neaAt,ssstreaviegnhtotwigs and Nimbus Two Thousand written in gold near the top.
’clock drew nearer, Harry left the castle and set off in the dusk
toward the Quidditch field. Held never been inside the stadium before.
Hundreds
of seats were raised in stands around the field so that the spectators were high
enough to see what was going on. At either end of the field were three golden
poles with hoops on the end. They reminded Harry of the little plastic sticks
Muggle children blew bubbles through, except that they were fifty feet high. Too eager to fly again to wait for Wood, Harry mounted his broomstick
and kicked off from the ground. What a feeling — he swooped in and out of the
goal posts and then sped up and down the field. The Nimbus Two Thousand
turned wherever he wanted at his lightest touch.
“Hey, Potter, come down!”
Oliver Wood had arrived. He was carrying a large wooden crate under his
arm. Harry landed next to him.
“Very nice,” said Wood, his eyes glinting. “I see what McGonagall
meant…you really are a natural. I’m just going to teach you the rules this
evening, then you’ll be joining team practice three times a week.”
He opened the crate. Inside were four different-sized balls.
“Right,” said Wood. “Now, Quidditch is easy enough to understand, even
if it’s not too easy to play. There are seven players on each side. Three of them
are called Chasers.”
“Three Chasers,” Harry repeated, as Wood took out a bright red ball
about the size of a soccer ball.
“This ball’s called the Quaffle,” said Wood. “The Chasers throw the
Quaffle to each other and try and get it through one of the hoops to score a
goal.
Ten“pTohientCsheavseerrys tt
ihmroewthteheQuQaufaflfeflegoaensdtphurotuitghthoronuegohf t
thhee hhooooppss.tFooslcloowrem,”e?”
Harry recited. “So — that’s sort of like basketball on broomsticks with six
hoops, isn’t it?”
“What’s basketball?” said Wood curiously.
“Never mind,” said Harry quickly.
“Now, there’s another player on each side who’s called the Keeper — I’m
Keeper for Gryffindor. I have to fly around our hoops and stop the other team
from scoring.”
“Three Chasers, one Keeper,” said Harry, who was determined to
remember it all. “And they play with the Quaffle. Okay, got that. So what are
they for?” He pointed at the three balls left inside the box.
“I’ll show you now,” said Wood. “Take this.”
He handed Harry a small club, a bit like a short baseball bat.
“I’m going to show you what the Bludgers do,” Wood said. “These two
are the Bludgers.”
He showed Harry two identical balls, jet black and slightly smaller than
the red Quaffle. Harry noticed that they seemed to be straining to escape the
straps holding them inside the box.
“Stand back,” Wood warned Harry. He bent down and freed one of the
Bludgers.
At once, the black ball rose high in the air and then pelted straight at
Harry’s face. Harry swung at it with the bat to stop it from breaking his nose,
and
sent it zigzagging away into the air — it zoomed around their heads and then
shot at Wood, who dived on top of it and managed to pin it to the ground. “See?” Wood panted, forcing the struggling Bludger back into the crate
and strapping it down safely. “The Bludgers rocket around, trying to knock
players off their brooms. That’s why you have two Beaters on each team — the
Weasley twins are ours — it’s their job to protect their side from the Bludgers
and try and knock them toward the other team. So — think you’ve got all that?”
“Three Chasers try and score with the Quaffle; the Keeper guards the
goal posts; the Beaters keep the Bludgers away from their team,” Harry reeled
off.
“Very good,” said Wood.
“Er — have the Bludgers ever killed anyone?” Harry asked, hoping he
sounded offhand.
“Never at Hogwarts. We’ve had a couple of broken jaws but nothing
worse than that. Now, the last member of the team is the Seeker. That’s you.
And
you don’t have to worry about the Quaffle or the Bludgers —” “— unless they crack my head open.”
“Don’t worry, the Weasleys are more than a match for the Bludgers — I
mean, they’re like a pair of human Bludgers themselves.”
Wood reached into the crate and took out the fourth and last ball.
Compared with the Quaffle and the Bludgers, it was tiny, about the size of a
large walnut. It was bright gold and had little fluttering silver wings.
“This,” said Wood, “is the Golden Snitch, and it’s the most important ball
of the lot. It’s very hard to catch because it’s so fast and difficult to see. It’s the
Seeker’s job to catch it. You’ve got to weave in and out of the Chasers, Beaters,
Bludgers, and Quaffle to get it before the other team’s Seeker, because
whichever Seeker catches the Snitch wins his team an extra hundred and fifty
points, so they nearly always win. That’s why Seekers get fouled so much. A
game of Quidditch only ends when the Snitch is caught, so it can go on for ages — I think the record is three months, they had to keep bringing on substitutes
so
the players could get some sleep.
“Well, that’s it any questions?”
Harry shook his head. He understood what he had to do all right, it was
doing it that was going to be the problem.
“We won’t practice with the Snitch yet,” said Wood, carefully shutting it
back inside the crate, “it’s too dark, we might lose it. Let’s try you out with a
few
of these.”
He pulled a bag of ordinary golf balls out of his pocket and a few
minutes later, he and Harry were up in the air, Wood throwing the golf balls as
hard as he could in every direction for Harry to catch.
Harry didn’t miss a single one, and Wood was delighted. After half an
hour, night had really fallen and they couldn’t carry on.
“That Quidditch Cup’ll have our name on it this year,” said Wood
happily as they trudged back up to the castle. “I wouldn’t be surprised if you
turn
out better than Charlie Weasley, and he could have played for England if he
hadn’t gone off chasing dragons.”
Perhaps it was because he was now so busy, what with Quidditch practice
three evenings a week on top of all his homework, but Harry could hardly
believe it when he realized that he’d already been at Hogwarts two months.
The
castle felt more like home than Privet Drive ever had. His lessons, too, were
becoming more and more interesting now that they had mastered the basics. On Halloween morning they woke to the delicious smell of baking
pumpkin wafting through the corridors. Even better, Professor Flitwick
announced in Charms that he thought they were ready to start making objects
fly,
something they had all been dying to try since they’d seen him make Neville’s
toad zoom around the classroom. Professor Flitwick put the class into pairs to
practice. Harry’s partner was Seamus Finnigan (which was a relief, because
Neville had been trying to catch his eye). Ron, however, was to be working
with
Hermione Granger. It was hard to tell whether Ron or Hermione was angrier
about this. She hadn’t spoken to either of them since the day Harry’s
broomstick
had arrived.
“Now, don’t forget that nice wrist movement we’ve been practicing!”
squeaked Professor Flitwick, perched on top of his pile of books as usual.
“Swish and flick, remember, swish and flick. And saying the magic words
properly is very important, too — never forget Wizard Baruffio, who said ‘s’
instead of ‘f’ and found himself on the floor with a buffalo on his chest.”
It was very difficult. Harry and Seamus swished and flicked, but the
feather they were supposed to be sending skyward just lay on the desktop.
Seamus got so impatient that he prodded it with his wand and set fire to it —
Harry had to put it out with his hat. Ron, at the next table, wasn’t having much more luck.
“Wingardium Leviosa!” he shouted, waving his long arms like a
windmill.
“You’re saying it wrong,” Harry heard Hermione snap. “It’s Wing-gardium Levi-o-sa, make the ‘gar’ nice and long.”
“You do it, then, if you’re so clever,” Ron snarled.
Hermione rolled up the sleeves of her gown, flicked her wand, and said,
“Wingardium Leviosa!”
Their feather rose off the desk and hovered about four feet above their
heads.
“Oh, well done!” cried Professor Flitwick, clapping. “Everyone see here,
Miss Granger’s done it!”
Ron was in a very bad mood by the end of the class.
“It’s no wonder no one can stand her,” he said to Harry as they pushed
their way into the crowded corridor, “she’s a nightmare, honestly.”
Someone knocked into Harry as they hurried past him. It was Hermione.
Harry caught a glimpse of her face — and was startled to see that she was in
tears.
“I think she heard you.”
“So?” said Ron, but he looked a bit uncomfortable. “She must’ve noticed
she’s got no friends.”
Hermione didn’t turn up for the next class and wasn’t seen all afternoon.
On their way down to the Great Hall for the Halloween feast, Harry and Ron
overheard Parvati Patil telling her friend Lavender that Hermione was crying
in
the girls’ bathroom and wanted to be left alone. Ron looked still more awkward
at this, but a moment later they had entered the Great Hall, where the
Halloween
decorations put Hermione out of their minds.
A thousand live bats fluttered from the walls and ceiling while a thousand
more swooped over the tables in low black clouds, making the candles in the
pumpkins stutter. The feast appeared suddenly on the golden plates, as it had
at
theHstart-of-term banquet. arry was just helping himself to a baked potato when Professor Quirrell
came sprinting into the hall, his turban askew and terror on his face. Everyone
stared as he reached Professor Dumbledore’s chair, slumped against the table,
and gasped, “Troll — in the dungeons — thought you ought to know.”
He then sank to the floor in a dead faint.
There was an uproar. It took several purple firecrackers exploding from
the end of Professor Dumbledore’s wand to bring silence.
“Prefects,” he rumbled, “lead your Houses back to the dormitories
immediately!”
Percy was in his element.
“Follow me! Stick together, first years! No need to fear the troll if you
follow my orders! Stay close behind me, now. Make way, first years coming
through! Excuse me, I’m a prefect!”
“How could a troll get in?” Harry asked as they climbed the stairs.
“Don’t ask me, they’re supposed to be really stupid,” said Ron. “Maybe
Peeves let it in for a Halloween joke.”
They passed different groups of people hurrying in different directions.
As they jostled their way through a crowd of confused Hufflepuffs, Harry
suddenly grabbed Ron’s arm.
“I’ve just thought — Hermione.”
“What about her?”
“She doesn’t know about the troll.”
Ron bit his lip.
“Oh, all right,” he snapped. “But Percy’d better not see us.”
Ducking down, they joined the Hufflepuffs going the other way, slipped
down a deserted side corridor, and hurried off toward the girls’ bathroom.
They
had“jPuesrtctyu!r”nheidsstehde Rcoornn,epruwllihnegnHthaerryyhbeeahridndquaiclakrfgoeotssttoenpesgbreihffiinnd. them.
Peering around it, however, they saw not Percy but Snape. He crossed the
corridor and disappeared from view.
“What’s he doing?” Harry whispered. “Why isn’t he down in the
dungeons with the rest of the teachers?”
“Search me.”
Quietly as possible, they crept along the next corridor after Snape’s
fading footsteps.
“He’s heading for the third floor,” Harry said, but Ron held up his hand.
“Can you smell something?”
Harry sniffed and a foul stench reached his nostrils, a mixture of old
socks and the kind of public toilet no one seems to clean.
And then they heard it — a low grunting, and the shuffling footfalls of
gigantic feet. Ron pointed — at the end of a passage to the left, something
huge
was moving toward them. They shrank into the shadows and watched as it
emerged into a patch of moonlight. It was a horrible sight. Twelve feet tall, its skin was a dull, granite gray,
its great lumpy body like a boulder with its small bald head perched on top like
a
coconut. It had short legs thick as tree trunks with flat, horny feet. The smell
coming from it was incredible. It was holding a huge wooden club, which
dragged along the floor because its arms were so long. The troll stopped next to a doorway and peered inside. It waggled its long
ears, making up its tiny mind, then slouched slowly into the room.
“The keys in the lock,” Harry muttered. “We could lock it in.”
“Good idea,” said Ron nervously.
They edged toward the open door, mouths dry, praying the troll wasn’t
about to come out of it. With one great leap, Harry managed to grab the key,
slam the door, and lock it.
“Yes!”
Flushed with their victory, they started to run back up the passage, but as
they reached the corner they heard something that made their hearts stop — a
high, petrified scream — and it was coming from the chamber they’d just
chained up.
“Oh, no,” said Ron, pale as the Bloody Baron.
“It’s the girls’ bathroom!” Harry gasped.
“Hermione!” they said together.
It was the last thing they wanted to do, but what choice did they have?
Wheeling around, they sprinted back to the door and turned the key, fumbling
in
theiHr epramniico.nHe aGrrraynpguelrlewdatshsehdroinokrinogpeangaainndstththeey rwaanllinospipdoes.ite, looking as if
she was about to faint. The troll was advancing on her, knocking the sinks off
the
walls as it went. “Confuse it!” Harry said desperately to Ron, and, seizing a tap, he threw
it as hard as he could against the wall.
The troll stopped a few feet from Hermione. It lumbered around, blinking
stupidly, to see what had made the noise. Its mean little eyes saw Harry. It
hesitated, then made for him instead, lifting its club as it went.
“Oy, pea-brain!” yelled Ron from the other side of the chamber, and he
threw a metal pipe at it. The troll didn’t even seem to notice the pipe hitting its
shoulder, but it heard the yell and paused again, turning its ugly snout toward
Ron instead, giving Harry time to run around it.
“Come on, run, run!” Harry yelled at Hermione, trying to pull her toward
the door, but she couldn’t move, she was still flat against the wall, her mouth
open with terror.
The shouting and the echoes seemed to be driving the troll berserk. It
roared again and started toward Ron, who was nearest and had no way to
escaHpae.rry then did something that was both very brave and very stupid: He
took a great running jump and managed to fasten his arms around the troll’s
neck
from behind. The troll couldn’t feel Harry hanging there, but even a troll will
notice if you stick a long bit of wood up its nose, and Harry’s wand had still
been
in his hand when he’d jumped – it had gone straight up one of the troll’s
nostrils.
Howling with pain, the troll twisted and flailed its club, with Harry
clinging on for dear life; any second, the troll was going to rip him off or catch
him a terrible blow with the club.
Hermione had sunk to the floor in fright; Ron pulled out his own wand — not knowing what he was going to do he heard himself cry the first spell that
came into his head: “Wingardium Leviosa!”
The club flew suddenly out of the troll’s hand, rose high, high up into the
air, turned slowly over — and dropped, with a sickening crack, onto its owner’s
head. The troll swayed on the spot and then fell flat on its face, with a thud
that
madHe the whole room tremble. arry got to his feet. He was shaking and out of breath. Ron was
standing there with his wand still raised, staring at what he had done.
It was Hermione who spoke first.
“Is it — dead?”
“I don’t think so,” said Harry, I think it’s just been knocked out.”
He bent down and pulled his wand out of the troll’s nose. It was covered
in what looked like lumpy gray glue.
“Urgh — troll boogers.”
He wiped it on the troll’s trousers.
A sudden slamming and loud footsteps made the three of them look up.
They hadn’t realized what a racket they had been making, but of course,
someone downstairs must have heard the crashes and the troll’s roars. A
moment
later, Professor McGonagall had come bursting into the room, closely followed
by Snape, with Quirrell bringing up the rear. Quirrell took one look at the troll,
let out a faint whimper, and sat quickly down on a toilet, clutching his heart.
Snape bent over the troll. Professor McGonagall was looking at Ron and
Harry. Harry had never seen her look so angry. Her lips were white. Hopes of
winning fifty points for Gryffindor faded quickly from Harry’s mind.
“What on earth were you thinking of?” said Professor McGonagall, with
cold fury in her voice. Harry looked at Ron, who was still standing with his
wand in the air. “You’re lucky you weren’t killed. Why aren’t you in your
dormitory?” Snape gave Harry a swift, piercing look. Harry looked at the floor. He
wished Ron would put his wand down.
Then a small voice came out of the shadows.
“Please, Professor McGonagall — they were looking for me.”
“Miss Granger!”
Hermione had managed to get to her feet at last.
“I went looking for the troll because I — I thought I could deal with it on
my own — you know, because I’ve read all about them.”
Ron dropped his wand. Hermione Granger, telling a downright lie to a
teacher?
“If they hadn’t found me, I’d be dead now. Harry stuck his wand up its
nose and Ron knocked it out with its own club. They didn’t have time to come
and fetch anyone. It was about to finish me off when they arrived.”
Harry and Ron tried to look as though this story wasn’t new to them.
“Well — in that case ...” said Professor McGonagall, staring at the three
of them, “Miss Granger, you foolish girl, how could you think of tackling a
mountain troll on your own?”
Hermione hung her head. Harry was speechless. Hermione was the last
person to do anything against the rules, and here she was, pretending she had,
to
get“tMhem out of trouble. It was as if Snape had started handing out sweets. iss Granger, five points will be taken from Gryffindor for this,” said
Professor McGonagall. “I’m very disappointed in you. If you’re not hurt at all,
you’d better get off to Gryffindor tower. Students are finishing the feast in
their
houHses.” ermione left.
Professor McGonagall turned to Harry and Ron.
“Well, I still say you were lucky, but not many first years could have
taken on a full-grown mountain troll. You each win Gryffindor five points.
Professor Dumbledore will be informed of this. You may go.”
They hurried out of the chamber and didn’t speak at all until they had
climbed two floors up. It was a relief to be away from the smell of the troll,
quite
apart from anything else.
“We should have gotten more than ten points,” Ron grumbled.
“Five, you mean, once she’s taken off Hermione’s.”
“Good of her to get us out of trouble like that,” Ron admitted. “Mind
you, we did save her.”
“She might not have needed saving if we hadn’t locked the thing in with
her,” Harry reminded him.
They had reached the portrait of the Fat Lady.
“Pig snout,” they said and entered.
The common room was packed and noisy. Everyone was eating the food
that had been sent up. Hermione, however, stood alone by the door, waiting for
them. There was a very embarrassed pause. Then, none of them looking at
each
otheBru, they all said “Thanks,” and hurried off to get plates. t from that moment on, Hermione Granger became their friend. There
are some things you can’t share without ending up liking each other, and
knocking out a twelve-foot mountain troll is one of them.
HP 1 - Harry Potter and the
Sorcerer's Stone
CHAPTER ELEVEN
QUIDDITCH
A s they entered November, the weather turned very cold. The mountains
around the school became icy gray and the lake like chilled steel. Every
morning
the ground was covered in frost. Hagrid could be seen from the upstairs
windows
defrosting broomsticks on the Quidditch field, bundled up in a long moleskin
overcoat, rabbit fur gloves, and enormous beaverskin boots.
The Quidditch season had begun. On Saturday, Harry would be playing
in his first match after weeks of training: Gryffindor versus Slytherin. If
Gryffindor won, they would move up into second place in the house
championship.
Hardly anyone had seen Harry play because Wood had decided that, as
their secret weapon, Harry should be kept, well, secret. But the news that he
was
playing Seeker had leaked out somehow, and Harry didn’t know which was
worse — people telling him he’d be brilliant or people telling him they’d be
running around underneath him holding a mattress. It was really lucky that Harry now had Hermione as a friend. He didn’t
know how he’d have gotten through all his homework without her, what with
all
the last-minute Quidditch practice Wood was making them do. She had also
lent
him Quidditch Through the Ages, which turned out to be a very interesting
read.
Harry learned that there were seven hundred ways of committing a
Quidditch foul and that all of them had happened during a World Cup match in
1473; that Seekers were usually the smallest and fastest players, and that most
serious Quidditch accidents seemed to happen to them; that although people
rarely died playing Quidditch, referees had been known to vanish and turn up
months later in the Sahara Desert.
Hermione had become a bit more relaxed about breaking rules since
Harry and Ron had saved her from the mountain troll, and she was much nicer
for it. The day before Harry’s first Quidditch match the three of them were out
in
the freezing courtyard during break, and she had conjured them up a bright
blue
fire that could be carried around in a jam jar. They were standing with their
backs to it, getting warm, when Snape crossed the yard. Harry noticed at once
that Snape was limping. Harry, Ron, and Hermione moved closer together to
block the fire from view; they were sure it wouldn’t be allowed. Unfortunately,
something about their guilty faces caught Snape’s eye. He limped over. He
hadn’t seen the fire, but he seemed to be looking for a reason to tell them off
anyway.
“What’s that you’ve got there, Potter?”
It was Quidditch Through the Ages. Harry showed him.
“Library books are not to be taken outside the school,” said Snape. “Give
it to me. Five points from Gryffindor.”
“He’s just made that rule up,” Harry muttered angrily as Snape limped
away. “Wonder what’s wrong with his leg?”
“Dunno, but I hope it’s really hurting him,” said Ron bitterly.
The Gryffindor common room was very noisy that evening. Harry, Ron, and
Hermione sat together next to a window. Hermione was checking Harry and
Ron’s Charms homework for them. She would never let them copy (“How will
you learn?”), but by asking her to read it through, they got the right answers
anyway.
Harry felt restless. He wanted Quidditch Through the Ages back, to take
his mind off his nerves about tomorrow. Why should he be afraid of Snape?
Getting up, he told Ron and Hermione he was going to ask Snape if he could
have it. “Better you than me,” they said together, but Harry had an idea that
Snape wouldn’t refuse if there were other teachers listening.
He made his way down to the staffroom and knocked. There was no
answer. He knocked again. Nothing.
Perhaps Snape had left the book in there? It was worth a try. He pushed
the door ajar and peered inside – and a horrible scene met his eyes.
Snape and Filch were inside, alone. Snape was holding his robes above
his knees. One of his legs was bloody and mangled. Filch was handing Snape
bandages.
“Blasted thing,” Snape was saying. “How are you supposed to keep your
eyes on all three heads at once?”
Harry tried to shut the door quietly, but —
“POTTER!”
Snape’s face was twisted with fury as he dropped his robes quickly to
hide his leg. Harry gulped.
“I just wondered if I could have my book back.”
“GET OUT! OUT!”
Harry left, before Snape could take any more points from Gryffindor. He
sprinted back upstairs.
“Did you get it?” Ron asked as Harry joined them. “What’s the matter?”
In a low whisper, Harry told them what he’d seen.
“You know what this means?” he finished breathlessly. “He tried to get
past that three-headed dog at Halloween! That’s where he was going when we
saw him — he’s after whatever it’s guarding! And I’d bet my broomstick he let
that troll in, to make a diversion!”
Hermione’s eyes were wide.
“No — he wouldn’t, she said. “I know he’s not very nice, but he
wouldn’t try and steal something Dumbledore was keeping safe.”
“Honestly, Hermione, you think all teachers are saints or something,”
snapped Ron. “I’m with Harry. I wouldn’t put anything past Snape. But what’s
he after? What’s that dog guarding?”
Harry went to bed with his head buzzing with the same question. Neville
was snoring loudly, but Harry couldn’t sleep. He tried to empty his mind — he
needed to sleep, he had to, he had his first Quidditch match in a few hours –
but
the expression on Snape’s face when Harry had seen his leg wasn’t easy to
forget.
The next morning dawned very bright and cold. The Great Hall was full of
the delicious smell of fried sausages and the cheerful chatter of everyone
looking
forward to a good Quidditch match. “You’ve got to eat some breakfast.”
“I don’t want anything.”
“Just a bit of toast,” wheedled Hermione.
“I’m not hungry.”
Harry felt terrible. In an hour’s time he’d be walking onto the field.
“Harry, you need your strength,” said Seamus Finnigan. “Seekers are
always the ones who get clobbered by the other team.”
“Thanks, Seamus,” said Harry, watching Seamus pile ketchup on his
sausages.
By eleven o’clock the whole school seemed to be out in the stands around
the Quidditch pitch. Many students had binoculars. The seats might be raised
high in the air, but it was still difficult to see what was going on sometimes.
Ron and Hermione joined Neville, Seamus, and Dean the West Ham fan
up in the top row. As a surprise for Harry, they had painted a large banner on
one
of the sheets Scabbers had ruined. It said Potter for President, and Dean, who
was good at drawing, had done a large Gryffindor lion underneath. Then
Hermione had performed a tricky little charm so that the paint flashed
different
colors. Meanwhile, in the locker room, Harry and the rest of the team were
changing into their scarlet Quidditch robes (Slytherin would be playing in
green).
Wood cleared his throat for silence.
“Okay, men,” he said.
“And women,” said Chaser Angelina Johnson.
“And women,” Wood agreed. “This is it.”
“The big one,” said Fred Weasley.
“The one we’ve all been waiting for,” said George.
“We know Oliver’s speech by heart,” Fred told Harry, “we were on the
team last year.”
“Shut up, you two,” said Wood. “This is the best team Gryffindor’s had
in years. We’re going to win. I know it.”
He glared at them all as if to say, “Or else.”
“Right. It’s time. Good luck, all of you.”
Harry followed Fred and George out of the locker room and, hoping his
knees weren’t going to give way, walked onto the field to loud cheers. Madam Hooch was refereeing. She stood in the middle of the field
waiting for the two teams, her broom in her hand.
“Now, I want a nice fair game, all of you,” she said, once they were all
gathered around her. Harry noticed that she seemed to be speaking
particularly to
the Slytherin Captain, Marcus Flint, a sixth year. Harry thought Flint looked as
if
he had some troll blood in him. Out of the corner of his eye he saw the
fluttering
banner high above, flashing Potter for President over the crowd. His heart
skipped. He felt braver.
“Mount your brooms, please.”
Harry clambered onto his Nimbus Two Thousand. Madam Hooch gave a loud blast on her silver whistle.
Fifteen brooms rose up, high, high into the air. They were off.
“And the Quaffle is taken immediately by Angelina Johnson of
Gryffindor — what an excellent Chaser that girl is, and rather attractive, too —”“JORDAN!”
“Sorry, Professor.”
The Weasley twins’ friend, Lee Jordan, was doing the commentary for
the match, closely watched by Professor McGonagall.
“And she’s really belting along up there, a neat pass to Alicia Spinnet, a
good find of Oliver Wood’s, last year only a reserve — back to Johnson and —
no, the Slytherins have taken the Quaffle, Slytherin Captain Marcus Flint gains
the Quaffle and off he goes — Flint flying like an eagle up there — he’s going to
sc— no, stopped by an excellent move by Gryffindor Keeper Wood and the
Gryffindors take the Quaffle — that’s Chaser Katie Bell of Gryffindor there,
nice
dive around Flint, off up the field and — OUCH — that must have hurt, hit in
the back of the head by a Bludger — Quaffle taken by the Slytherins — that’s
Adrian Pucey speeding off toward the goal posts, but he’s blocked by a second
Bludger — sent his way by Fred or George Weasley, can’t tell which — nice
play by the Gryffindor Beater, anyway, and Johnson back in possession of the
Quaffle, a clear field ahead and off she goes — she’s really flying — dodges a
speeding Bludger — the goal posts are ahead — come on, now, Angelina —
KeeGper Bletchley dives — misses — GRYFFINDORS SCORE!” ryffindor cheers filled the cold air, with howls and moans from the
Slytherins.
“Budge up there, move along.”
“Hagrid!”
Ron and Hermione squeezed together to give Hagrid enough space to
join them.
“Bin watchin’ from me hut,” said Hagrid, patting a large pair of
binoculars around his neck, “But it isn’t the same as bein’ in the crowd. No
sign
of th“Ne oSpneit,”chsayiedt,Reohn?.”“Harry hasn’t had much to do yet.”
“Kept outta trouble, though, that’s somethin’,” said Hagrid, raising his
binoculars and peering skyward at the speck that was Harry.
Way up above them, Harry was gliding over the game, squinting about
for some sign of the Snitch. This was part of his and Wood’s game plan.
“Keep out of the way until you catch sight of the Snitch,” Wood had said.
“We don’t want you attacked before you have to be.” When Angelina had scored, Harry had done a couple of loop-the-loops to
let off his feelings. Now he was back to staring around for the Snitch. Once he
caught sight of a flash of gold, but it was just a reflection from one of the
Weasleys’ wristwatches, and once a Bludger decided to come pelting his way,
more like a cannonball than anything, but Harry dodged it and Fred Weasley
came chasing after it.
“All right there, Harry?” he had time to yell, as he beat the Bludger
furiously toward Marcus Flint.
“Slytherin in possession,” Lee Jordan was saying, “Chaser Pucey ducks
two Bludgers, two Weasleys, and Chaser Bell, and speeds toward the — wait a
moment — was that the Snitch?”
A murmur ran through the crowd as Adrian Pucey dropped the Quaffle,
too busy looking over his shoulder at the flash of gold that had passed his left
ear.
Harry saw it. In a great rush of excitement he dived downward after the
streak of gold. Slytherin Seeker Terence Higgs had seen it, too. Neck and neck
they hurtled toward the Snitch — all the Chasers seemed to have forgotten
what
they were supposed to be doing as they hung in midair to watch. Harry was faster than Higgs — he could see the little round ball, wings
fluttering, darting up ahead — he put on an extra spurt of speed — WHAM! A roar of rage echoed from the Gryffindors below — Marcus
Flint had blocked Harry on purpose, and Harry’s broom spun off course, Harry
holding on for dear life.
“Foul!” screamed the Gryffindors. Madam Hooch spoke angrily to Flint and then ordered a free shot at the
goal posts for Gryffindor. But in all the confusion, of course, the Golden Snitch
had disappeared from sight again.
Down in the stands, Dean Thomas was yelling, “Send him off, ref! Red
card!”
“What are you talking about, Dean?” said Ron.
“Red card!” said Dean furiously. “In soccer you get shown the red card
and you’re out of the game!”
“But this isn’t soccer, Dean,” Ron reminded him.
Hagrid, however, was on Dean’s side.
“They oughta change the rules. Flint coulda knocked Harry outta the air.”
Lee Jordan was finding it difficult not to take sides.
“So — after that obvious and disgusting bit of cheating —”
“Jordan!” growled Professor McGonagall.
“I mean, after that open and revolting foul…”
“Jordan, I’m warning you —”
“All right, all right. Flint nearly kills the Gryffindor Seeker, which could happen to anyone, I’m sure, so a penalty to Gryffindor, taken by Spinner, who
puts it away, no trouble, and we continue play, Gryffindor still in possession.”
It was as Harry dodged another Bludger, which went spinning
dangerously past his head, that it happened. His broom gave a sudden,
frightening lurch. For a split second, he thought he was going to fall. He
gripped
the broom tightly with both his hands and knees. He’d never felt anything like
that.It happened again. It was as though the broom was trying to buck him
off. But Nimbus Two Thousands did not suddenly decide to buck their riders
off.
Harry tried to turn back toward the Gryffindor goal-posts — he had half a mind
to ask Wood to call time-out — and then he realized that his broom was
completely out of his control. He couldn’t turn it. He couldn’t direct it at all. It
was zigzagging through the air, and every now and then making violent
swishing
movements that almost unseated him. Lee was still commentating.
“Slytherin in possession — Flint with the Quaffle — passes Spinnet —
passes Bell — hit hard in the face by a Bludger, hope it broke his nose — only
joking, Professor — Slytherins score — A no…”
The Slytherins were cheering. No one seemed to have noticed that
Harry’s broom was behaving strangely. It was carrying him slowly higher,
away
from the game, jerking and twitching as it went. “Dunno what Harry thinks he’s doing,” Hagrid mumbled. He stared
through his binoculars. “If I didn’ know better, I’d say he’d lost control of his
broom…but he can’t have.…”
Suddenly, people were pointing up at Harry all over the stands. His
broom had started to roll over and over, with him only just managing to hold
on.
Then the whole crowd gasped. Harry’s broom had given a wild jerk and Harry
swung off it. He was now dangling from it, holding on with only one hand. “Did something happen to it when Flint blocked him?” Seamus
whispered.
“Can’t have,” Hagrid said, his voice shaking. “Can’t nothing interfere
with a broomstick except powerful Dark magic — no kid could do that to a
Nimbus Two Thousand.”
At these words, Hermione seized Hagrid’s binoculars, but instead of
looking up at Harry, she started looking frantically at the crowd.
“What are you doing?” moaned Ron, gray-faced.
“I knew it,” Hermione gasped, “Snape — look.”
Ron grabbed the binoculars. Snape was in the middle of the stands
opposite them. He had his eyes fixed on Harry and was muttering nonstop
under
his “bHreeath. ’s doing something — jinxing the broom,” said Hermione.
“What should we do?”
“Leave it to me.”
Before Ron could say another word, Hermione had disappeared. Ron
turned the binoculars back on Harry. His broom was vibrating so hard, it was
almost impossible for him to hang on much longer. The whole crowd was on its
feet, watching, terrified, as the Weasleys flew up to try and pull Harry safely
onto one of their brooms, but it was no good – every time they got near him,
the
broom would jump higher still. They dropped lower and circled beneath him,
obviously hoping to catch him if he fell. Marcus Flint seized the Quaffle and
scored five times without anyone noticing.
“Come on, Hermione,” Ron muttered desperately.
Hermione had fought her way across to the stand where Snape stood, and
was now racing along the row behind him; she didn’t even stop to say sorry as
she knocked Professor Quirrell headfirst into the row in front. Reaching Snape,
she crouched down, pulled out her wand, and whispered a few, well-chosen
words. Bright blue flames shot from her wand onto the hem of Snape’s robes.
It took perhaps thirty seconds for Snape to realize that he was on fire. A
sudden yelp told her she had done her job. Scooping the fire off him into a little
jar in her pocket, she scrambled back along the row — Snape would never
know
what had happened. It was enough. Up in the air, Harry was suddenly able to clamber back on
to his broom.
“Neville, you can look!” Ron said. Neville had been sobbing into
Hagrid’s jacket for the last five minutes.
Harry was speeding toward the ground when the crowd saw him clap his
hand to his mouth as though he was about to be sick — he hit the field on all
fours — coughed — and something gold fell into his hand.
“I’ve got the Snitch!” he shouted, waving it above his head, and the game
ended in complete confusion.
“He didn’t catch it, he nearly swallowed it,” Flint was still howling
twenty minutes later, but it made no difference — Harry hadn’t broken any
rules
and Lee Jordan was still happily shouting the results — Gryffindor had won by
one hundred and seventy points to sixty. Harry heard none of this, though. He
was being made a cup of strong tea back in Hagrid’s hut, with Ron and
Hermione. “It was Snape,” Ron was explaining, “Hermione and I saw him. He was
cursing your broomstick, muttering, he wouldn’t take his eyes off you.”
“Rubbish,” said Hagrid, who hadn’t heard a word of what had gone on
next to him in the stands. “Why would Snape do somethin’ like that?”
Harry, Ron, and Hermione looked at one another, wondering what to tell
him. Harry decided on the truth.
“I found out something about him,” he told Hagrid. “He tried to get past
that three-headed dog on Halloween. It bit him. We think he was trying to steal
whatever it’s guarding.”
Hagrid dropped the teapot.
“How do you know about Fluffy?” he said.
“Fluffy?”
“Yeah — he’s mine — bought him off a Greek chappie I met in the pub
las’ year — I lent him to Dumbledore to guard the —”
“Yes?” said Harry eagerly.
“Now, don’t ask me anymore,” said Hagrid gruffly. “That’s top secret,
that is.”
“But Snape’s trying to steal it.”
“Rubbish,” said Hagrid again. “Snape’s a Hogwarts teacher, he’d do
nothin’ of the sort.”
“So why did he just try and kill Harry?” cried Hermione.
The afternoon’s events certainly seemed to have changed her mind about
Snape.
“I know a jinx when I see one, Hagrid, I’ve read all about them! You’ve
got to keep eye contact, and Snape wasn’t blinking at all, I saw him!”
“I’m tellin’ yeh, yer wrong!” said Hagrid hotly. “I don’ know why
Harry’s broom acted like that, but Snape wouldn’ try an’ kill a student! Now,
listen to me, all three of yeh — yer meddlin’ in things that don’ concern yeh.
It’s
dangerous. You forget that dog, an’ you forget what it’s guardin’, that’s
between
Professor Dumbledore an’ Nicolas Flamel —”
“Aha!” said Harry, “so there’s someone called Nicolas Flamel involved,
is there?”
Hagrid looked furious with himself.
HP 1 - Harry Potter and the
Sorcerer's Stone
CHAPTER TWELVE
THE MIRROR OF ERISED
C hristmas was coming. One morning in mid-December, Hogwarts woke to
find itself covered in several feet of snow. The lake froze solid and the Weasley
twins were punished for bewitching several snowballs so that they followed
Quirrell around, bouncing off the back of his turban. The few owls that
managed
to battle their way through the stormy sky to deliver mail had to be nursed
back
to health by Hagrid before they could fly off again. No one could wait for the holidays to start. While the Gryffindor
common room and the Great Hall had roaring fires, the drafty corridors had
become icy and a bitter wind rattled the windows in the classrooms. Worst of
all
were Professor Snape’s classes down in the dungeons, where their breath rose
in
a mist before them and they kept as close as possible to their hot cauldrons.
“I do feel so sorry,” said Draco Malfoy, one Potions class, “for all those
people who have to stay at Hogwarts for Christmas because they’re not wanted
at home.”
He was looking over at Harry as he spoke. Crabbe and Goyle chuckled.
Harry, who was measuring out powdered spine of lionfish, ignored them. Malfoy
had been even more unpleasant than usual since the Quidditch match.
Disgusted
that the Slytherins had lost, he had tried to get everyone laughing at how a
widemouthed tree frog would be replacing Harry as Seeker next. Then he’d realized
that nobody found this funny, because they were all so impressed at the way
Harry had managed to stay on his bucking broomstick. So Malfoy, jealous and
angry, had gone back to taunting Harry about having no proper family.
It was true that Harry wasn’t going back to Privet Drive for Christmas.
Professor McGonagall had come around the week before, making a list of
students who would be staying for the holidays, and Harry had signed up at
once. He didn’t feel sorry for himself at all; this would probably be the best
Christmas he’d ever had. Ron and his brothers were staying, too, because Mr.
and Mrs. Weasley were going to Romania to visit Charlie.
When they left the dungeons at the end of Potions, they found a large fir
tree blocking the corridor ahead. Two enormous feet sticking out at the bottom
and a loud puffing sound told them that Hagrid was behind it.
“Hi, Hagrid, want any help?” Ron asked, sticking his head through the
branches.
“Nah, I’m all right, thanks, Ron.”
“Would you mind moving out of the way?” came Malfoy’s cold drawl
from behind them. “Are you trying to earn some extra money, Weasley? Hoping
to be gamekeeper yourself when you leave Hogwarts, I suppose — that hut of
Hagrid’s must seem like a palace compared to what your family’s used to.”
Ron dived at Malfoy just as Snape came up the stairs.
“WEASLEY!”
Ron let go of the front of Malfoy’s robes.
“He was provoked, Professor Snape,” said Hagrid, sticking his huge
hairy face out from behind the tree. “Malfoy was insultin’ his family.”
“Be that as it may, fighting is against Hogwarts rules, Hagrid,” said
Snape silkily. “Five points from Gryffindor, Weasley, and be grateful it isn’t
more. Move along, all of you.”
Malfoy, Crabbe, and Goyle pushed roughly past the tree, scattering
needles everywhere and smirking.
“I’ll get him,” said Ron, grinding his teeth at Malfoy’s back, “one of
these days, I’ll get him —”
“I hate them both,” said Harry, “Malfoy and Snape.”
“Come on, cheer up, it’s nearly Christmas,” said Hagrid. “Tell yeh what,
come with me an’ see the Great Hall, looks a treat.”
So the three of them followed Hagrid and his tree off to the Great Hall,
where Professor McGonagall and Professor Flitwick were busy with the
Christmas decorations.
“Ah, Hagrid, the last tree — put it in the far corner, would you?”
The hall looked spectacular. Festoons of holly and mistletoe hung all around the walls, and no less than twelve towering Christmas trees stood
around
the room, some sparkling with tiny icicles, some glittering with hundreds of
candles. “How many days you got left until yer holidays?” Hagrid asked.
“Just one,” said Hermione. “And that reminds me — Harry, Ron, we’ve
got half an hour before lunch, we should be in the library.”
“Oh yeah, you’re right,” said Ron, tearing his eyes away from Professor
Flitwick, who had golden bubbles blossoming out of his wand and was trailing
them over the branches of the new tree.
“The library?” said Hagrid, following them out of the hall. “Just before
the holidays? Bit keen, aren’t yeh?”
“Oh, we’re not working,” Harry told him brightly. “Ever since you
mentioned Nicolas Flamel we’ve been trying to find out who he is.”
“You what?” Hagrid looked shocked. “Listen here — I’ve told yeh —
drop it. It’s nothin’ to you what that dog’s guardin’.”
“We just want to know who Nicolas Flamel is, that’s all,” said Hermione.
“Unless you’d like to tell us and save us the trouble?” Harry added. “We
must’ve been through hundreds of books already and we can’t find him
anywhere — just give us a hint — I know I’ve read his name somewhere.”
“I’m sayin’ nothin’, said Hagrid flatly.
“Just have to find out for ourselves, then,” said Ron, and they left Hagrid
looking disgruntled and hurried off to the library.
They had indeed been searching books for Flamel’s name ever since
Hagrid had let it slip, because how else were they going to find out what Snape
was trying to steal? The trouble was, it was very hard to know where to begin,
not knowing what Flamel might have done to get himself into a book. He
wasn’t
in Great Wizards of the Twentieth Century, or Notable Magical Names of Our
Time; he was missing, too, from Important Modern Magical Discoveries, and A
Study of Recent Developments in Wizardry. And then, of course, there was the
sheer size of the library; tens of thousands of books; thousands of shelves;
hundreds of narrow rows. Hermione took out a list of subjects and titles she had decided to search
while Ron strode off down a row of books and started pulling them off the
shelves at random. Harry wandered over to the Restricted Section. He had
been
wondering for a while if Flamel wasn’t somewhere in there. Unfortunately, you
needed a specially signed note from one of the teachers to look in any of the
restricted books, and he knew he’d never get one. These were the books
containing powerful Dark Magic never taught at Hogwarts, and only read by
older students studying advanced Defense Against the Dark Arts.
“What are you looking for, boy?”
“Nothing,” said Harry. Madam Pince the librarian brandished a feather duster at him.
“You’d better get out, then. Go on — out!” Wishing he’d been a bit quicker at thinking up some story, Harry left the
library. He, Ron, and Hermione had already agreed they’d better not ask
Madam
Pince where they could find Flamel. They were sure she’d be able to tell them,
butHthaey couldn’t risk Snape hearing what they were up to. rry waited outside in the corridor to see if the other two had found
anything, but he wasn’t very hopeful. They had been looking for two weeks,
after A, but as they only had odd moments between lessons it wasn’t surprising
they’d found nothing. What they really needed was a nice long search without
Madam Pince breathing down their necks.
Five minutes later, Ron and Hermione joined him, shaking their heads.
They went off to lunch.
“You will keep looking while I’m away, won’t you?” said Hermione.
“And send me an owl if you find anything.”
“And you could ask your parents if they know who Flamel is,” said Ron.
“It’d be safe to ask them.”
“Very safe, as they’re both dentists,” said Hermione.
Once the holidays had started, Ron and Harry were having too good a time
thintko much about Flamel. They had the dormitory to themselves and the
common room was far emptier than usual, so they were able to get the good
armchairs by the fire. They sat by the hour eating anything they could spear on
a
toasting fork — bread, English muffins, marshmallows — and plotting ways of
getting Malfoy expelled, which were fun to talk about even if they wouldn’t
work. Ron also started teaching Harry wizard chess. This was exactly like
Muggle chess except that the figures were alive, which made it a lot like
directing troops in battle. Ron’s set was very old and battered. Like everything
else he owned, it had once belonged to someone else in his family — in this
case, his grandfather. However, old chessmen weren’t a drawback at all. Ron
knew them so well he never had trouble getting them to do what he wanted.
Harry played with chessmen Seamus Finnigan had lent him, and they
didn’t trust him at all. He wasn’t a very good player yet and they kept shouting
different bits of advice at him, which was confusing. “Don’t send me there,
can’t
youOsee his knight? Send him, we can afford to lose him.” n Christmas Eve, Harry went to bed looking forward to the next day for
the food and the fun, but not expecting any presents at all. When he woke early
in the morning, however, the first thing he saw was a small pile of packages at
the foot of his bed.
“Merry Christmas,” said Ron sleepily as Harry scrambled out of bed and
pulled on his bathrobe.
“You, too,” said Harry. “Will you look at this? I’ve got some presents!”
“What did you expect, turnips?” said Ron, turning to his own pile, which
was a lot bigger than Harry’s.
Harry picked up the top parcel. It was wrapped in thick brown paper and
scrawled across it was To Harry, from Hagrid. Inside was a roughly cut
wooden
flute. Hagrid had obviously whittled it himself. Harry blew it — it sounded a bit
like an owl. A second, very small parcel contained a note.
We received your message and enclose your Christmas present. From
Uncle Vernon and Aunt Petunia. Taped to the note was a fifty-pence piece.
“That’s friendly,” said Harry.
Ron was fascinated by the fifty pence.
“Weird!” he said, ‘What a shape! This is money?”
“You can keep it,” said Harry, laughing at how pleased Ron was. “Hagrid
and my aunt and uncle — so who sent these?”
“I think I know who that one’s from,” said Ron, turning a bit pink and
pointing to a very lumpy parcel. “My mom. I told her you didn’t expect any
presents and — oh, no,” he groaned, “she’s made you a Weasley sweater.”
Harry had torn open the parcel to find a thick, hand-knitted sweater in
emerald green and a large box of homemade fudge.
“Every year she makes us a sweater,” said Ron, unwrapping his own,
“and mine’s always maroon.”
“That’s really nice of her,” said Harry, trying the fudge, which was very
tasty.
His next present also contained candy — a large box of Chocolate Frogs
from Hermione.
This only left one parcel. Harry picked it up and felt it. It was very light.
He unwrapped it.
Something fluid and silvery gray went slithering to the floor where it lay
in gleaming folds. Ron gasped.
“I’ve heard of those,” he said in a hushed voice, dropping the box of
Every Flavor Beans he’d gotten from Hermione. “If that’s what I think it is —
they’re really rare, and really valuable.”
“What is it?”
Harry picked the shining, silvery cloth off the floor. It was strange to the
touch, like water woven into material.
“It’s an invisibility cloak,” said Ron, a look of awe on his face. “I’m sure
it is — try it on.”
Harry threw the cloak around his shoulders and Ron gave a yell.
“It is! Look down!”
Harry looked down at his feet, but they were gone. He dashed to the
mirror. Sure enough, his reflection looked back at him, just his head suspended
in midair, his body completely invisible. He pulled the cloak over his head and
his reflection vanished completely.
“There’s a note!” said Ron suddenly. “A note fell out of it!”
Harry pulled off the cloak and seized the letter. Written in narrow, loopy
writing he had never seen before were the following words:
Your father left this in my possession before he died.
It is time it was returned to you.
Use it well.
A Very Merry Christmas to you.
There was no signature. Harry stared at the note. Ron was admiring the cloak.
“I’d give anything for one of these,” he said. “Anything. What’s the
matter?”
“Nothing,” said Harry. He felt very strange. Who had sent the cloak? Had
it really once belonged to his father?
Before he could say or think anything else, the dormitory door was flung
open and Fred and George Weasley bounded in. Harry stuffed the cloak
quickly
out“oMf seight. He didn’t feel like sharing it with anyone else yet. rry Christmas!”
“Hey, look — Harry’s got a Weasley sweater, too!”
Fred and George were wearing blue sweaters, one with a large yellow F
on it, the other a G.
“Harry’s is better than ours, though,” said Fred, holding up Harry’s
sweater. “She obviously makes more of an effort if you’re not family.”
“Why aren’t you wearing yours, Ron?” George demanded. “Come on,
get it on, they’re lovely and warm.”
“I hate maroon,” Ron moaned halfheartedly as he pulled it over his head.
“You haven’t got a letter on yours,” George observed. “I suppose she
thinks you don’t forget your name. But we’re not stupid — we know we’re
called Gred and Forge.”
“What’s all this noise?”
Percy Weasley stuck his head through the door, looking disapproving. He
had clearly gotten halfway through unwrapping his presents as he, too, carried
a
lum“pPy sweater over his arm, which Fred seized. for prefect! Get it on, Percy, come on, we’re all wearing ours, even
Harry got one.”
“I — don’t — want —” said Percy thickly, as the twins forced the
sweater over his head, knocking his glasses askew.
“And you’re not sitting with the prefects today, either,” said George.
“Christmas is a time for family.”
They frog-marched Percy from the room, his arms pinned to his side by
his sweater.
Harry had never in all his life had such a Christmas dinner. A hundred fat,
roast turkeys; mountains of roast and boiled potatoes; platters of chipolatas;
tureens of buttered peas, silver boats of thick, rich gravy and cranberry sauce
–
and stacks of wizard crackers every few feet along the table. These fantastic
party favors were nothing like the feeble Muggle ones the Dursleys usually
bought, with their little plastic toys and their flimsy paper hats inside. Harry
pulled a wizard cracker with Fred and it didn’t just bang, it went off with a
blast
like a cannon and engulfed them all in a cloud of blue smoke, while from the
inside exploded a rear admiral’s hat and several live, white mice. Up at the
High
Flaming Christmas puddings followed the turkey. Percy nearly broke his
Table, Dumbledore had swapped his pointed wizard’s hat for a flowered
bonnet,
and was chuckling merrily at a joke Professor Flitwick had just read him.
teeth on a silver sickle embedded in his slice. Harry watched Hagrid getting
redder and redder in the face as he called for more wine, finally kissing
Professor McGonagall on the cheek, who, to Harry’s amazement, giggled and
blushed, her top hat lopsided. When Harry finally left the table, he was laden down with a stack of
things out of the crackers, including a pack of nonexplodable, luminous
balloons, a Grow-Your-Own-Warts kit, and his own new wizard chess set. The
white mice had disappeared and Harry had a nasty feeling they were going to
end up as Mrs. Norris’s Christmas dinner.
Harry and the Weasleys spent a happy afternoon having a furious
snowball fight on the grounds. Then, cold, wet, and gasping for breath, they
returned to the fire in the Gryffindor common room, where Harry broke in his
new chess set by losing spectacularly to Ron. He suspected he wouldn’t have
lost so badly if Percy hadn’t tried to help him so much.
After a meal of turkey sandwiches, crumpets, trifle, and Christmas cake,
everyone felt too full and sleepy to do much before bed except sit and watch
Percy chase Fred and George all over Gryffindor tower because they’d stolen
his
prefect badge. It had been Harry’s best Christmas day ever. Yet something had been
nagging at the back of his mind all day. Not until he climbed into bed was he
free to think about it: the invisibility cloak and whoever had sent it.
Ron, full of turkey and cake and with nothing mysterious to bother him,
fell asleep almost as soon as he’d drawn the curtains of his four-poster. Harry
leaned over the side of his own bed and pulled the cloak out from under it.
His father’s…this had been his father’s. He let the material flow over his
hands, smoother than silk, light as air. Use it well, the note had said.
He had to try it, now. He slipped out of bed and wrapped the cloak
around himself. Looking down at his legs, he saw only moonlight and shadows.
It was a very funny feeling.
Use it well.
Suddenly, Harry felt wide-awake. The whole of Hogwarts was open to
him in this cloak. Excitement flooded through him as he stood there in the dark
and silence. He could go anywhere in this, anywhere, and Filch would never
know.
Ron grunted in his sleep. Should Harry wake him? Something held him
back — his father’s cloak — he felt that this time — the first time — he wanted
to use it alone.
He crept out of the dormitory, down the stairs, across the common room,
and climbed through the portrait hole.
“Who’s there?” squawked the Fat Lady. Harry said nothing. He walked
quickly down the corridor. Where should he go? He stopped, his heart racing, and thought. And then
it came to him. The Restricted Section in the library. He’d be able to read as
long
as he liked, as long as it took to find out who Flamel was. He set off, drawing
the
invisibility cloak tight around him as he walked.
The library was pitch-black and very eerie. Harry lit a lamp to see his
way along the rows of books. The lamp looked as if it was floating along in
midair, and even though Harry could feel his arm supporting it, the sight gave
him the creeps.
The Restricted Section was right at the back of the library. Stepping
carefully over the rope that separated these books from the rest of the library,
he
held up his lamp to read the titles.
They didn’t tell him much. Their peeling, faded gold letters spelled
words in languages Harry couldn’t understand. Some had no title at all. One
book had a dark stain on it that looked horribly like blood. The hairs on the
back
of Harry’s neck prickled. Maybe he was imagining it, maybe not, but he
thought
a faint whispering was coming from the books, as though they knew someone
was there who shouldn’t be.
He had to start somewhere. Setting the lamp down carefully on the floor,
he looked along the bottom shelf for an interesting looking book. A large black
and silver volume caught his eye. He pulled it out with difficulty, because it
was
very heavy, and, balancing it on his knee, let it fall open. A piercing, bloodcurdling shriek split the silence — the book was
screaming! Harry snapped it shut, but the shriek went on and on, one high,
unbroken, earsplitting note. He stumbled backward and knocked over his
lamp,
which went out at once. Panicking, he heard footsteps coming down the
corridor
outside — stuffing the shrieking book back on the shelf, he ran for it. He
passed
Filch in the doorway; Filch’s pale, wild eyes looked straight through him, and
Harry slipped under Filch’s outstretched arm and streaked off up the corridor,
the
book’s shrieks still ringing in his ears.
He came to a sudden halt in front of a tall suit of armor. He had been so
busy getting away from the library, he hadn’t paid attention to where he was
going. Perhaps because it was dark, he didn’t recognize where he was at all.
There was a suit of armor near the kitchens, he knew, but he must be five
floors
above there. “You asked me to come directly to you, Professor, if anyone was
wandering around at night, and somebody’s been in the library Restricted
Section.”
Harry felt the blood drain out of his face. Wherever he was, Filch must
know a shortcut, because his soft, greasy voice was getting nearer, and to his
horror, it was Snape who replied, “The Restricted Section? Well, they can’t be
far, we’ll catch them.”
Harry stood rooted to the spot as Filch and Snape came around the corner
ahead. They couldn’t see him, of course, but it was a narrow corridor and if
they
came much nearer they’d knock right into him — the cloak didn’t stop him
from
being solid.
He backed away as quietly as he could. A door stood ajar to his left. It
was his only hope. He squeezed through it, holding his breath, trying not to
move it, and to his relief he managed to get inside the room without their
noticing anything. They walked straight past, and Harry leaned against the
wall,
breathing deeply, listening to their footsteps dying away. That had been close,
very close. It was a few seconds before he noticed anything about the room he
had hidden in.
It looked like an unused classroom. The dark shapes of desks and chairs
were piled against the walls, and there was an upturned wastepaper basket –
but
propped against the wall facing him was something that didn’t look as if it
belonged there, something that looked as if someone had just put it there to
keep
it out of the way.
It was a magnificent mirror, as high as the ceiling, with an ornate gold
frame, standing on two clawed feet. There was an inscription carved around
the
top: Erised stra ehru oyt ube cafru oyt on wohsi. His panic fading now that
there
was no sound of Filch and Snape, Harry moved nearer to the mirror, wanting
to
look at himself but see no reflection again. He stepped in front of it.
He had to clap his hands to his mouth to stop himself from screaming. He
whirled around. His heart was pounding far more furiously than when the book
had screamed — for he had seen not only himself in the mirror, but a whole
crowd of people standing right behind him.
But the room was empty. Breathing very fast, he turned slowly back to
the mirror.
There he was, reflected in it, white and scared-looking, and there,
reflected behind him, were at least ten others. Harry looked over his shoulder —
but still, no one was there. Or were they all invisible, too? Was he in fact in a
room full of invisible people and this mirror’s trick was that it reflected them,
invisible or not? He looked in the mirror again. A woman standing right behind his
reflection was smiling at him and waving. He reached out a hand and felt the
air
behind him. If she was really there, he’d touch her, their reflections were so
close together, but he felt only air – she and the others existed only in the
mirror.
She was a very pretty woman. She had dark red hair and her eyes — her
eyes are just like mine, Harry thought, edging a little closer to the glass. Bright
green — exactly the same shape, but then he noticed that she was crying;
smiling, but crying at the same time. The tall, thin, black-haired man standing
next to her put his arm around her. He wore glasses, and his hair was very
untidy. It stuck up at the back, just as Harry’s did.
Harry was so close to the mirror now that his nose was nearly touching
that of his reflection.
“Mom?” he whispered. “Dad?”
They just looked at him, smiling. And slowly, Harry looked into the faces
of the other people in the mirror, and saw other pairs of green eyes like his,
other
noses like his, even a little old man who looked as though he had Harry’s
knoTbhbelyPkonees — Harry was looking at his family, for the first time in his life. tters smiled and waved at Harry and he stared hungrily back at
them, his hands pressed flat against the glass as though he was hoping to fall
right through it and reach them. He had a powerful kind of ache inside him,
half
joy, half terrible sadness. How long he stood there, he didn’t know. The reflections did not fade
and he looked and looked until a distant noise brought him back to his senses.
He couldn’t stay here, he had to find his way back to bed. He tore his eyes
away
from his mother’s face, whispered, “I’ll come back,” and hurried from the
room. “You could have woken me up,” said Ron, crossly.
“You can come tonight, I’m going back, I want to show you the mirror.
“I’d like to see your mom and dad,” Ron said eagerly.
“And I want to see all your family, all the Weasleys, you’ll be able to
show me your other brothers and everyone.”
“You can see them any old time,” said Ron. “Just come round my house
this summer. Anyway, maybe it only shows dead people. Shame about not
finding Flamel, though. Have some bacon or something, why aren’t you eating
anything?”
Harry couldn’t eat. He had seen his parents and would be seeing them
again tonight. He had almost forgotten about Flamel. It didn’t seem very
important anymore. Who cared what the three headed dog was guarding?
What
did it matter if Snape stole it, really? “Are you all right?” said Ron. “You look odd.”
What Harry feared most was that he might not be able to find the mirror
room again. With Ron covered in the cloak, too, they had to walk much more
slowly the next night. They tried retracing Harry’s route from the library,
wandering around the dark passageways for nearly an hour.
“I’m freezing,” said Ron. “Let’s forget it and go back.”
“No!” Harry hissed. I know it’s here somewhere.”
They passed the ghost of a tall witch gliding in the opposite direction, but
saw no one else. just as Ron started moaning that his feet were dead with cold,
Harry spotted the suit of armor.
“It’s here — just here — yes!”
They pushed the door open. Harry dropped the cloak from around his
shoulders and ran to the mirror.
There they were. His mother and father beamed at the sight of him.
“See?” Harry whispered.
“I can’t see anything.”
“Look! Look at them all…there are loads of them.…”
“I can only see you.”
“Look in it properly, go on, stand where I am.”
Harry stepped aside, but with Ron in front of the mirror, he couldn’t see
his family anymore, just Ron in his paisley pajamas.
Ron, though, was staring transfixed at his image.
“Look at me!” he said.
“Can you see all your family standing around you?”
“No — I’m alone — but I’m different — I look older — and I’m head
boy!”
“What?”
“I am — I’m wearing the badge like Bill used to — and I’m holding the
house cup and the Quidditch cup — I’m Quidditch captain, too.”
Ron tore his eyes away from this splendid sight to look excitedly at
Harry.
“Do you think this mirror shows the future?”
“How can it? All my family are dead — let me have another look —”
“You had it to yourself all last night, give me a bit more time.”
w “You’re only holding the Quidditch cup, what’s interesting about that? I ant to see my parents.”
“Don’t push me —”
A sudden noise outside in the corridor put an end to their discussion.
They hadn’t realized how loudly they had been talking.
“Quick!”
Ron threw the cloak back over them as the luminous eyes of Mrs. Norris
came round the door. Ron and Harry stood quite still, both thinking the same
thing — did the cloak work on cats? After what seemed an age, she turned and
left.
“This isn’t safe — she might have gone for Filch, I bet she heard us.
Come on.”
And Ron pulled Harry out of the room.
The snow still hadn’t melted the next morning.
“Want to play chess, Harry?” said Ron.
“No.”
“Why don’t we go down and visit Hagrid?”
“No…you go…”
“I know what you’re thinking about, Harry, that mirror. Don’t go back
tonight.”
“Why not?”
“I dunno, I’ve just got a bad feeling about it — and anyway, you’ve had
too many close shaves already. Filch, Snape, and Mrs. Norris are wandering
around. So what if they can’t see you? What if they walk into you? What if you
knock something over?”
“You sound like Hermione.”
“I’m serious, Harry, don’t go.”
But Harry only had one thought in his head, which was to get back in
front of the mirror, and Ron wasn’t going to stop him.
That third night he found his way more quickly than before. He was walking
so fast he knew he was making more noise than was wise, but he didn’t meet
anyone.
And there were his mother and father smiling at him again, and one of
his grandfathers nodding happily. Harry sank down to sit on the floor in front
of
the mirror. There was nothing to stop him from staying here all night with his
family. Nothing at all. Except —
“So — back again, Harry?”
Harry felt as though his insides had turned to ice. He looked behind him.
Sitting on one of the desks by the wall was none other than Albus Dumbledore.
Harry must have walked straight past him, so desperate to get to the mirror he
hadn’t noticed him.
“I — I didn’t see you, sir.”
“Strange how nearsighted being invisible can make you,” said
Dumbledore, and Harry was relieved to see that he was smiling.
“So,” said Dumbledore, slipping off the desk to sit on the floor with
Harry, “you, like hundreds before you, have discovered the delights of the
Mirror
of Erised.”
“I didn’t know it was called that, Sir.”
“But I expect you’ve realized by now what it does?”
“It — well — it shows me my family —”
“And it showed your friend Ron himself as head boy.”
“How did you know —?”
“I don’t need a cloak to become invisible,” said Dumbledore gently.
“Now, can you think what the Mirror of Erised shows us all?”
Harry shook his head.
“Let me explain. The happiest man on earth would be able to use the
Mirror of Erised like a normal mirror, that is, he would look into it and see
himself exactly as he is. Does that help?”
Harry thought. Then he said slowly, “It shows us what we want…
whatever we want…”
“Yes and no,” said Dumbledore quietly. “It shows us nothing more or less
than the deepest, most desperate desire of our hearts. You, who have never
known your family, see them standing around you. Ronald Weasley, who has
always been overshadowed by his brothers, sees himself standing alone, the
best
of all of them. However, this mirror will give us neither knowledge or truth. Men
have wasted away before it, entranced by what they have seen, or been driven
mad, not knowing if what it shows is real or even possible.
“The Mirror will be moved to a new home tomorrow, Harry, and I ask
you not to go looking for it again. If you ever do run across it, you will now be
prepared. It does not do to dwell on dreams and forget to live, remember that.
NowH, why don’t you put that admirable cloak back on and get off to bed?” arry stood up.
“Sir — Professor Dumbledore? Can I ask you something?”
“Obviously, you’ve just done so,” Dumbledore smiled. “You may ask me
one more thing, however.”
“What do you see when you look in the mirror?”
“I? I see myself holding a pair of thick, woolen socks.”
Harry stared.
“One can never have enough socks,” said Dumbledore. “Another
Christmas has come and gone and I didn’t get a single pair. People will insist
on
giviIntgwmase obnoloykws.h”en he was back in bed that it struck Harry that
Dumbledore might not have been quite truthful. But then, he thought, as he
shoved Scabbers off his pillow, it had been quite a personal question.
HP 1 - Harry Potter and the
Sorcerer's Stone
CHAPTER THIRTEEN
NICHOLAS FLAMEL
D umbledore had convinced Harry not to go looking for the Mirror of Erised
again, and for the rest of the Christmas holidays the invisibility cloak stayed
folded at the bottom of his trunk. Harry wished he could forget what he’d seen
in
the mirror as easily, but he couldn’t. He started having nightmares. Over and
over again he dreamed about his parents disappearing in a flash of green light,
while a high voice cackled with laughter. “You see, Dumbledore was right, that mirror could drive you mad,” said
Ron, when Harry told him about these dreams.
Hermione, who came back the day before term started, took a different
view of things. She was torn between horror at the idea of Harry being out of
bed, roaming the school three nights in a row (“If Filch had caught you!”), and
disappointment that he hadn’t at least found out who Nicolas Flamel was.
They had almost given up hope of ever finding Flamel in a library book,
even though Harry was still sure he’d read the name somewhere. Once term
had
started, they were back to skimming through books for ten minutes during
their
breaks. Harry had even less time than the other two, because Quidditch
practice
had started again.
Wood was working the team harder than ever. Even the endless rain that
had replaced the snow couldn’t dampen his spirits. The Weasleys complained
that Wood was becoming a fanatic, but Harry was on Wood’s side. If they won
their next match, against Hufflepuff, they would overtake Slytherin in the
house
championship for the first time in seven years. Quite apart from wanting to
win,
Harry found that he had fewer nightmares when he was tired out after
training.
Then, during one particularly wet and muddy practice session, Wood
gave the team a bit of bad news. He’d just gotten very angry with the
Weasleys,
who“Wkept dive-bombing each other and pretending to fall off their brooms. ill you stop messing around!” he yelled. “That’s exactly the sort of
thing that’ll lose us the match! Snape’s refereeing this time, and he’ll be
looking
for GaneyoregxecuWseatsolekynorecakllpyodinidtsfoalflf oGfrfyhfifsinbdrooro!”m at these words.
“Snape’s refereeing?” he spluttered through a mouthful of mud. “When’s he ever refereed a Quidditch match? He’s not going to be fair if we might
overtake Slytherin.”
The rest of the team landed next to George to complain, too.
“It’s not my fault,” said Wood. “We’ve just got to make sure we play a
clean game, so Snape hasn’t got an excuse to pick on us.” Which was all very well, thought Harry, but he had another reason for
not wanting Snape near him while he was playing Quidditch.…
The rest of the team hung back to talk to one another as usual at the end
of practice, but Harry headed straight back to the Gryffindor common room,
where he found Ron and Hermione playing chess. Chess was the only thing
Hermione ever lost at, something Harry and Ron thought was very good for
her.“Don’t talk to me for a moment,” said Ron when Harry sat down next to
him, “I need to concen—” He caught sight of Harry’s face. “What’s the matter with you? You look terrible.”
Speaking quietly so that no one else would hear, Harry told the other two
about Snape’s sudden, sinister desire to be a Quidditch referee.
“Don’t play,” said Hermione at once.
“Say you’re ill,” said Ron.
“Pretend to break your leg,” Hermione suggested.
“Really break your leg,” said Ron.
“I can’t,” said Harry. “There isn’t a reserve Seeker. If I back out,
Gryffindor can’t play at all.”
At that moment Neville toppled into the common room. How he had
managed to climb through the portrait hole was anyone’s guess, because his
legs
had been stuck together with what they recognized at once as the Leg-Locker
Curse. He must have had to bunny hop all the way up to Gryffindor tower. Everyone fell over laughing except Hermione, who leapt up and
performed the countercurse. Neville’s legs sprang apart and he got to his feet,
trembling. “What happened?” Hermione asked him, leading him over to sit
with
Harry and Ron. “Malfoy,” said Neville shakily. “I met him outside the library. He said
he’d been looking for someone to practice that on.”
“Go to Professor McGonagall!” Hermione urged Neville. “Report him!”
Neville shook his head.
“I don’t want more trouble,” he mumbled.
“You’ve got to stand up to him, Neville!” said Ron. “He’s used to
walking all over people, but that’s no reason to lie down in front of him and
make it easier.”
“There’s no need to tell me I’m not brave enough to be in Gryffindor, Malfoy’s already done that,” Neville choked out.
Harry felt in the pocket of his robes and pulled out a Chocolate Frog, the
very last one from the box Hermione had given him for Christmas. He gave it
to
Neville, who looked as though he might cry. “You’re worth twelve of Malfoy,” Harry said. “The Sorting Hat chose
you for Gryffindor, didn’t it? And where’s Malfoy? In stinking Slytherin.”
Neville’s lips twitched in a weak smile as he unwrapped the frog.
coll“eTcht athnekms,,Hdaornr’yt…yoIut?h”ink I’ll go to bed.…D’you want the card, you
As Neville walked away, Harry looked at the Famous Wizard card.
“Dumbledore again,” he said, “He was the first one I ever —”
He gasped. He stared at the back of the card. Then he looked up at Ron
and Hermione.
“I’ve found him!” he whispered. “I’ve found Flamel! I told you I’d read
the name somewhere before, I read it on the train coming here — listen to this:
‘Dumbledore is particularly famous for his defeat of the dark wizard
Grindelwald in 1945, for the discovery of the twelve uses of dragon’s blood,
and
his work on alchemy with his partner, Nicolas Flamel’!” Hermione jumped to her feet. She hadn’t looked so excited since they’d
gotten back the marks for their very first piece of homework.
“Stay there!” she said, and she sprinted up the stairs to the girls’
dormitories. Harry and Ron barely had time to exchange mystified looks before
she was dashing back, an enormous old book in her arms.
“I never thought to look in here!” she whispered excitedly. “I got this out
of the library weeks ago for a bit of light reading.”
“Light?” said Ron, but Hermione told him to be quiet until she’d looked
something up, and started flicking frantically through the pages, muttering to
herself.
At last she found what she was looking for.
“I knew it! I knew it!”
“Are we allowed to speak yet?” said Ron grumpily. Hermione ignored
him.
“Nicolas Flamel,” she whispered dramatically, “is the only known maker
of the Sorcerer’s Stone!”
This didn’t have quite the effect she’d expected.
“The what?” said Harry and Ron.
“Oh, honestly, don’t you two read? Look – read that, there.”
She pushed the book toward them, and Harry and Ron read:
The ancient study of alchemy is concerned with making the Sorcerer’s
Stone,
a legendary substance with astonishing powers. The stone will transform any
metal into pure gold. It also produces the Elixir of Life, which will make the
drinker immortal.
There have been many reports of the Sorcerer’s Stone over the centuries,
but
the only Stone currently in existence belongs to Mr. Nicolas Flamel, the noted
alchemist and opera lover. Mr. Flamel, who celebrated his six hundred and
sixtyfifth birthday last year, enjoys a quiet life in Devon with his wife, Perenelle (six
hundred and fifty-eight). “See?” said Hermione, when Harry and Ron had finished. “The dog must be
guarding Flamel’s Sorcerer’s Stone! I bet he asked Dumbledore to keep it safe
for him, because they’re friends and he knew someone was after it, that’s why
he
wanted the Stone moved out of Gringotts!” “A stone that makes gold and stops you from ever dying!” said Harry.
“No wonder Snape’s after it! Anyone would want it.”
“And no wonder we couldn’t find Flamel in that Study of Recent
Developments in Wizardry,” said Ron. “He’s not exactly recent if he’s six
hundred and sixty-five, is he?”
The next morning in Defense Against the Dark Arts, while copying down
different ways of treating werewolf bites, Harry and Ron were still discussing
what they’d do with a Sorcerer’s Stone if they had one. It wasn’t until Ron said
he’d buy his own Quidditch team that Harry remembered about Snape and the
coming match.
“I’m going to play,” he told Ron and Hermione. “If I don’t, all the
Slytherins will think I’m just too scared to face Snape. I’ll show them…it’ll
really wipe the smiles off their faces if we win.”
“Just as long as we’re not wiping you off the field,” said Hermione.
As the match drew nearer, however, Harry became more and more nervous,
whatever he told Ron and Hermione. The rest of the team wasn’t too calm,
either. The idea of overtaking Slytherin in the house championship was
wonderful, no one had done it for seven years, but would they be allowed to,
with such a biased referee?
Harry didn’t know whether he was imagining it or not, but he seemed to
keep running into Snape wherever he went. At times, he even wondered
whether
Snape was following him, trying to catch him on his own. Potions lessons were
turning into a sort of weekly torture, Snape was so horrible to Harry. Could
Snape possibly know they’d found out about the Sorcerer’s Stone? Harry didn’t
see how he could — yet he sometimes had the horrible feeling that Snape could
read minds.
Harry knew, when they wished him good luck outside the locker rooms the
next afternoon, that Ron and Hermione were wondering whether they’d ever
see
him alive again. This wasn’t what you’d call comforting. Harry hardly heard a
word of Wood’s pep talk as he pulled on his Quidditch robes and picked up his
Nimbus Two Thousand. Ron and Hermione, meanwhile, had found a place in the stands next to
Neville, who couldn’t understand why they looked so grim and worried, or why
they had both brought their wands to the match. Little did Harry know that
Ron
and Hermione had been secretly practicing the Leg-Locker Curse. They’d
gotten
the idea from Malfoy using it on Neville, and were ready to use it on Snape if
he
showed any sign of wanting to hurt Harry.
“Now, don’t forget, it’s Locomotor Mortis,” Hermione muttered as Ron
slipped his wand up his sleeve.
“I know,” Ron snapped. “Don’t nag.”
Back in the locker room, Wood had taken Harry aside.
“Don’t want to pressure you, Potter, but if we ever need an early capture
of the Snitch it’s now. Finish the game before Snape can favor Hufflepuff too
much.”
“The whole school’s out there!” said Fred Weasley, peering out of the
door. “Even — blimey — Dumbledore’s come to watch!”
Harry’s heart did a somersault.
“Dumbledore?” he said, dashing to the door to make sure. Fred was right.
There was no mistaking that silver beard.
Harry could have laughed out loud with relief He was safe. There was
simply no way that Snape would dare to try to hurt him if Dumbledore was
watching.
Perhaps that was why Snape was looking so angry as the teams marched
onto the field, something that Ron noticed, too.
“I’ve never seen Snape look so mean,” he told Hermione. “Look —
they’re off. Ouch!”
Someone had poked Ron in the back of the head. It was Malfoy.
“Oh, sorry, Weasley, didn’t see you there.” Malfoy grinned broadly at Crabbe and Goyle.
“Wonder how long Potter’s going to stay on his broom this time? Anyone
want a bet? What about you, Weasley?”
Ron didn’t answer; Snape had just awarded Hufflepuff a penalty because
George Weasley had hit a Bludger at him. Hermione, who had all her fingers
crossed in her lap, was squinting fixedly at Harry, who was circling the game
like a hawk, looking for the Snitch.
“You know how I think they choose people for the Gryffindor team?”
said Malfoy loudly a few minutes later, as Snape awarded Hufflepuff another
penalty for no reason at all. “It’s people they feel sorry for. See, there’s Potter,
who’s got no parents, then there’s the Weasleys, who’ve got no money — you
should be on the team, Longbottom, you’ve got no brains.”
Neville went bright red but turned in his seat to face Malfoy.
“I’m worth twelve of you, Malfoy,” he stammered. Malfoy, Crabbe, and Goyle howled with laughter, but Ron, still not
daring to take his eyes from the game, said, “You tell him, Neville.”
“Longbottom, if brains were gold you’d be poorer than Weasley, and
that’s saying something.”
Ron’s nerves were already stretched to the breaking point with anxiety
about Harry.
“I’m warning you, Malfoy — one more word—”
“Ron!” said Hermione suddenly, “Harry —”
“What? Where?”
Harry had suddenly gone into a spectacular dive, which drew gasps and
cheers from the crowd. Hermione stood up, her crossed fingers in her mouth,
as
Har“rYyosutreaked toward the ground like a bullet. ’re in luck, Weasley, Potter’s obviously spotted some money on the
ground!” said Malfoy.
Ron snapped. Before Malfoy knew what was happening, Ron was on top
of him, wrestling him to the ground. Neville hesitated, then clambered over the
back of his seat to help.
“Come on, Harry!” Hermione screamed, leaping onto her seat to watch
as Harry sped straight at Snape — she didn’t even notice Malfoy and Ron
rolling
around under her seat, or the scuffles and yelps coming from the whirl of fists
thatUwas Neville, Crabbe, and Goyle. p in the air, Snape turned on his broomstick just in time to see
something scarlet shoot past him, missing him by inches — the next second,
Harry had pulled out of the dive, his arm raised in triumph, the Snitch clasped
in
his Thhaneds.tands erupted; it had to be a record, no one could ever remember the Snitch being caught so quickly.
“Ron! Ron! Where are you? The game’s over! Harry’s won! We’ve won!
Gryffindor is in the lead!” shrieked Hermione, dancing up and down on her
seat
and hugging Parvati Patil in the row in front.
Harry jumped off his broom, a foot from the ground. He couldn’t believe
it. He’d done it — the game was over; it had barely lasted five minutes. As
Gryffindors came spilling onto the field, he saw Snape land nearby, white-faced
and tight-lipped — then Harry felt a hand on his shoulder and looked up into
Dumbledore’s smiling face.
“Well done,” said Dumbledore quietly, so that only Harry could hear.
“Nice to see you haven’t been brooding about that mirror...been keeping
busy...excellent...” Snape spat bitterly on the ground.
Harry left the locker room alone some time later, to take his Nimbus Two
Thousand back to the broomshed. He couldn’t ever remember feeling happier.
He’d really done something to be proud of now – no one could say he was just a
famous name any more. The evening air had never smelled so sweet. He
walked
over the damp grass, reliving the last hour in his head, which was a happy
blur:
Gryffindors running to lift him onto their shoulders; Ron and Hermione in the
distance, jumping up and down, Ron cheering through a heavy nosebleed. Harry had reached the shed. He leaned against the wooden door and
looked up at Hogwarts, with its windows glowing red in the setting sun.
Gryffindor in the lead. He’d done it, he’d shown Snape ....
And speaking of Snape…
A hooded figure came swiftly down the front steps of the castle. Clearly
not wanting to be seen, it walked as fast as possible toward the forbidden
forest.
Harry’s victory faded from his mind as he watched. He recognized the figure’s
prowling walk. Snape, sneaking into the forest while everyone else was at
dinner — what was going on?
Harry jumped back on his Nimbus Two Thousand and took off. Gliding
silently over the castle he saw Snape enter the forest at a run. He followed.
The trees were so thick he couldn’t see where Snape had gone. He flew
in circles, lower and lower, brushing the top branches of trees until he heard
voices. He glided toward them and landed noiselessly in a towering beech tree.
He climbed carefully along one of the branches, holding tight to his
broomstick, trying to see through the leaves.
Below, in a shadowy clearing, stood Snape, but he wasn’t alone. Quirrell
was there, too. Harry couldn’t make out the look on his face, but he was
stuttering worse than ever. Harry strained to catch what they were saying.
“…d-don’t know why you wanted t-t-to meet here of all p-places,
Severus…”
“Oh, I thought we’d keep this private,” said Snape, his voice icy.
“Students aren’t supposed to know about the Sorcerer’s Stone, after all.”
Harry leaned forward. Quirrell was mumbling something. Snape
interrupted him.
“Have you found out how to get past that beast of Hagrid’s yet?”
“B-b-but Severus, I —”
“You don’t want me as your enemy, Quirrell,” said Snape, taking a step
toward him.
“I-I don’t know what you—”
“You know perfectly well what I mean.”
An owl hooted loudly, and Harry nearly fell out of the tree. He steadied
himself in time to hear Snape say, “— your little bit of hocus-pocus. I’m
waiting.”
“B-but I d-d-don’t —”
“Very well,” Snape cut in. “We’ll have another little chat soon, when
you’ve had time to think things over and decided where your loyalties lie.”
He threw his cloak over his head and strode out of the clearing. It was
almost dark now, but Harry could see Quirrell, standing quite still as though he
was petrified.
“Harry, where have you been?” Hermione squeaked.
“We won! You won! We won!” shouted Ron, thumping Harry on the
back. “And I gave Malfoy a black eye, and Neville tried to take on Crabbe and
Goyle single-handed! He’s still out cold but Madam Pomfrey says he’ll be all
right — talk about showing Slytherin! I’ve waiting for you in the common room,
we’re having a party, Fred and George stole some cakes and stuff from the
kitchens.”
“Never mind that now,” said Harry breathlessly. “Let’s find an empty
room, you wait ’til you hear this....”
He made sure Peeves wasn’t inside before shutting the door behind them,
then he told them what he’d seen and heard.
“So we were right, it is the Sorcerer’s Stone, and Snape’s trying to force
Quirrell to help him get it. He asked if he knew how to get past Fluffy — and he
said something about Quirrell’s ‘hocus pocus’ — I reckon there are other
things
guarding the stone apart from Fluffy, loads of enchantments, probably, and
Quirrell would have done some anti-Dark Arts spell that Snape needs to break
through —”
“So you mean the Stone’s only safe as long as Quirrell stands up to
Snape?” said Hermione in alarm.
“It’ll be gone by next Tuesday,” said Ron.
HP 1 - Harry Potter and the
Sorcerer's Stone
CHAPTER FOURTEEN
NORBERT THE NORWEGIAN RIDGEBACK
Q uirrell, however, must have been braver than they’d thought. In the
thatwfeoellkoswed he did seem to be getting paler and thinner, but it didn’t look as
though he’d cracked yet.
Every time they passed the third-floor corridor, Harry, Ron, and
Hermione would press their ears to the door to check that Fluffy was still
growling inside. Snape was sweeping about in his usual bad temper, which
surely meant that the Stone was still safe. Whenever Harry passed Quirrell
these
days he gave him an encouraging sort of smile, and Ron had started telling
people off for laughing at Quirrell’s stutter. Hermione, however, had more on her mind than the Sorcerer’s Stone.
She had started drawing up study schedules and color coding all her notes.
Harry
and“RHoen wouldn’t have minded, but she kept nagging them to do the same. rmione, the exams are ages away.”
“Ten weeks,” Hermione snapped. “That’s not ages, that’s like a second to
Nicolas Flamel.”
“But we’re not six hundred years old,” Ron reminded her. “Anyway,
what are you studying for, you already know it’s an A.”
“What am I studying for? Are you crazy? You realize we need to pass
these exams to get into the second year? They’re very important, I should have
started studying a month ago, I don’t know what’s gotten into me.…” Unfortunately, the teachers seemed to be thinking along the same lines as
Hermione. They piled so much homework on them that the Easter holidays
weren’t nearly as much fun as the Christmas ones. It was hard to relax with
Hermione next to you reciting the twelve uses of dragon’s blood or practicing
wand movements. Moaning and yawning, Harry and Ron spent most of their
free
time in the library with her, trying to get through all their extra work. “I’ll never remember this,” Ron burst out one afternoon, throwing down
his quill and looking longingly out of the library window. It was the first really
fine day they’d had in months. The sky was a clear, forget-me-not blue, and
there was a feeling in the air of summer coming.
Harry, who was looking up “Dittany” in One Thousand Magical Herbs
and Fungi, didn’t look up until he heard Ron say, “Hagrid! What are you doing
in the library?”
Hagrid shuffled into view, hiding something behind his back. He looked
very out of place in his moleskin overcoat.
“Jus’ lookin’,” he said, in a shifty voice that got their interest at once.
“An’ what’re you lot up ter?” He looked suddenly suspicious. “Yer not still
lookin’ fer Nicolas Flamel, are yeh?”
“Oh, we found out who he is ages ago,” said Ron impressively. “And we
know what that dog’s guarding, it’s a Sorcerer’s St—”
“Shhhh!” Hagrid looked around quickly to see if anyone was listening.
“Don’ go shoutin’ about it, what’s the matter with yeh?”
“There are a few things we wanted to ask you, as a matter of fact,” said
Harry, “about what’s guarding the Stone apart from Fluffy —”
“SHHHH!” said Hagrid again. “Listen — come an’ see me later, I’m not
promisin’ I’ll tell yeh anythin’, mind, but don’ go rabbitin’ about it in here,
students aren’ s’pposed ter know. They’ll think I’ve told yeh —”
“See you later, then,” said Harry.
Hagrid shuffled off.
“What was he hiding behind his back?” said Hermione thoughtfully.
“Do you think it had anything to do with the Stone?”
“I’m going to see what section he was in,” said Ron, who’d had enough
of working. He came back a minute later with a pile of books in his arms and
slammed them down on the table.
“Dragons!” he whispered. “Hagrid was looking up stuff about dragons!
Look at these: Dragon Species of Great Britain and Ireland; From Egg to
Inferno, A Dragon Keeper’s Guide.”
“Hagrid’s always wanted a dragon, he told me so the first time I ever met
him, “ said Harry.
“But it’s against our laws,” said Ron. “Dragon breeding was outlawed by
the Warlocks’ Convention of 1709, everyone knows that. It’s hard to stop
Muggles from noticing us if we’re keeping dragons in the back garden —
anyway, you can’t tame dragons, it’s dangerous. You should see the burns
Charlie’s got off wild ones in Romania.”
“But there aren’t wild dragons in Britain?” said Harry.
“Of course there are,” said Ron. “Common Welsh Green and Hebridean
Blacks. The Ministry of Magic has a job hushing them up, I can tell you. Our
kind have to keep putting spells on Muggles who’ve spotted them, to make
them
forget.”
“So what on earth’s Hagrid up to?” said Hermione.
When they knocked on the door of the gamekeeper’s hut an hour later, they
were surprised to see that all the curtains were closed. Hagrid called “Who is
it?”
before he let them in, and then shut the door quickly behind them. It was stifling hot inside. Even though it was such a warm day, there was
a blazing fire in the grate. Hagrid made them tea and offered them stoat
sandwiches, which they refused.
“So — yeh wanted to ask me somethin’?”
“Yes,” said Harry. There was no point beating around the bush. “We were
wondering if you could tell us what’s guarding the Sorcerer’s Stone apart from
Fluffy.”
Hagrid frowned at him.
“O’ course I can’t,“ he said. “Number one, I don’ know meself. Number
two, yeh know too much already, so I wouldn’ tell yeh if I could. That Stone’s
here fer a good reason. It was almost stolen outta Gringotts — I s’ppose yeh’ve
worked that out an’ all? Beats me how yeh even know abou’ Fluffy.”
“Oh, come on, Hagrid, you might not want to tell us, but you do know,
you know everything that goes on round here,” said Hermione in a warm,
flattering voice. Hagrid’s beard twitched and they could tell he was smiling.
“We
only wondered who had done the guarding, really.” Hermione went on. “We
wondered who Dumbledore had trusted enough to help him, apart from you.” Hagrid’s chest swelled at these last words. Harry and Ron beamed at
Hermione.
“Well, I don’ s’pose it could hurt ter tell yeh that…let’s see…he
borrowed Fluffy from me…then some o’ the teachers did enchantments…
Professor Sprout — Professor Flitwick — Professor McGonagall —” he ticked
them off on his fingers, “Professor Quirrell — an’ Dumbledore himself did
somethin’, o’ course. Hang on, I’ve forgotten someone. Oh yeah, Professor
Snape.”
“Snape?”
“Yeah — yer not still on abou’ that, are yeh? Look, Snape helped protect
the Stone, he’s not about ter steal it.”
Harry knew Ron and Hermione were thinking the same as he was. If
Snape had been in on protecting the Stone, it must have been easy to find out
how the other teachers had guarded it. He probably knew everything —
except,
it seemed, Quirrell’s spell and how to get past Fluffy. “You’re the only one who knows how to get past Fluffy. aren’t you,
Hagrid?” said Harry anxiously. “And you wouldn’t tell anyone, would you? Not
even one of the teachers?”
“Not a soul knows except me an’ Dumbledore,” said Hagrid proudly.
“Well, that’s something,” Harry muttered to the others. “Hagrid, can we
have a window open? I’m boiling.”
“Can’t, Harry, sorry,” said Hagrid. Harry noticed him glance at the fire.
Harry looked at it, too.
“Hagrid — what’s that?”
But he already knew what it was. In the very heart of the fire, underneath
the kettle, was a huge, black egg.
“Ah,” said Hagrid, fiddling nervously with his beard, “That’s — er…”
“Where did you get it, Hagrid?” said Ron, crouching over the fire to get a
closer look at the egg. “It must’ve cost you a fortune.”
“Won it,” said Hagrid. “Las’ night. I was down in the village havin’ a few
drinks an’ got into a game o’ cards with a stranger. Think he was quite glad ter
get rid of it, ter be honest.”
“But what are you going to do with it when it’s hatched?” said Hermione.
“Well, I’ve bin doin’ some readin’,” said Hagrid, pulling a large book
from under his pillow. “Got this outta the library — Dragon Breeding for
Pleasure and Profit — it’s a bit outta date, o’ course, but it’s all in here. Keep
the
egg in the fire, ‘cause their mothers breathe on I em, see, an’ when it hatches,
feed it on a bucket o’ brandy mixed with chicken blood every half hour. An’ see
here — how ter recognize diff’rent eggs — what I got there’s a Norwegian
Ridgeback. They’re rare, them.” He looked very pleased with himself, but Hermione didn’t.
“Hagrid, you live in a wooden house,” she said.
But Hagrid wasn’t listening. He was humming merrily as he stoked the
fire.
So now they had something else to worry about: what might happen to
Hagrid if anyone found out he was hiding an illegal dragon in his hut.
“Wonder what it’s like to have a peaceful life,” Ron sighed, as evening
after evening they struggled through all the extra homework they were
getting.
Hermione had now started making study schedules for Harry and Ron, too. It
was driving them nuts. Then, one breakfast time, Hedwig brought Harry another note from
Hagrid. He had written only two words: It’s hatching.
Ron wanted to skip Herbology and go straight down to the hut. Hermione
wouldn’t hear of it.
“Hermione, how many times in our lives are we going to see a dragon
hatching?”
“We’ve got lessons, we’ll get into trouble, and that’s nothing to what
Hagrid’s going to be in when someone finds out what he’s doing—”
“Shut up!” Harry whispered. Malfoy was only a few feet away and he had stopped dead to listen. How
much had he heard? Harry didn’t like the look on Malfoy’s face at all.
Ron and Hermione argued all the way to Herbology and in the end,
Hermione agreed to run down to Hagrid’s with the other two during morning
break. When the bell sounded from the castle at the end of their lesson, the
three
of them dropped their trowels at once and hurried through the grounds to the
edg“eItof the forest. Hagrid greeted them, looking flushed and excited. ’s nearly out.” He ushered them inside.
The egg was lying on the table. There were deep cracks in it. Something
was moving inside; a funny clicking noise was coming from it.
They all drew their chairs up to the table and watched with bated breath.
All at once there was a scraping noise and the egg split open. The baby dragon flopped onto the table. It wasn’t exactly pretty; Harry thought it looked
like a crumpled, black umbrella. Its spiny wings were huge compared to its
skinny jet body, it had a long snout with wide nostrils, the stubs of horns and
bulging, orange eyes.
It sneezed. A couple of sparks flew out of its snout.
“Isn’t he beautiful?” Hagrid murmured. He reached out a hand to stroke
the dragon’s head. It snapped at his fingers, showing pointed fangs.
“Bless him, look, he knows his mommy!” said Hagrid.
“Hagrid,” said Hermione, “how fast do Norwegian Ridgebacks grow,
exactly?”
Hagrid was about to answer when the color suddenly drained from his
face — he leapt to his feet and ran to the window.
“What’s the matter?”
“Someone was lookin’ through the gap in the curtains — it’s a kid —
he’s runnin’ back up ter the school.”
Harry bolted to the door and looked out. Even at a distance there was no
mistaking him.
Malfoy had seen the dragon.
Something about the smile lurking on Malfoy’s face during the next week
made Harry, Ron, and Hermione very nervous. They spent most of their free
time in Hagrid’s darkened hut, trying to reason with him.
“Just let him go,” Harry urged. “Set him free.”
“I can’t,” said Hagrid. “He’s too little. He’d die.”
They looked at the dragon. It had grown three times in length in just a
week. Smoke kept furling out of its nostrils. Hagrid hadn’t been doing his
gamekeeping duties because the dragon was keeping him so busy. There were
empty brandy bottles and chicken feathers all over the floor.
“I’ve decided to call him Norbert,” said Hagrid, looking at the dragon
with misty eyes. “He really knows me now, watch. Norbert! Norbert! Where’s
Mommy?”
“He’s lost his marbles,” Ron muttered in Harry’s ear.
“Hagrid,” said Harry loudly, “give it two weeks and Norbert’s going to
be as long as your house. Malfoy could go to Dumbledore at any moment.”
Hagrid bit his lip.
“I — I know I can’t keep him forever, but I can’t jus’ dump him, I can’t.”
Harry suddenly turned to Ron. “Charlie.” he said.
“You’re losing it, too,” said Ron. “I’m Ron, remember?”
“No — Charlie — your brother, Charlie. In Romania. Studying dragons.
We could send Norbert to him. Charlie can take care of him and then put him
back in the wild!”
“Brilliant!” said Ron. “How about it, Hagrid?”
And in the end, Hagrid agreed that they could send an owl to Charlie to
ask him.
The following week dragged by. Wednesday night found Hermione and
Harry sitting alone in the common room, long after everyone else had gone to
bed. The clock on the wall had just chimed midnight when the portrait hole
burst
open. Ron appeared out of nowhere as he pulled off Harry’s invisibility cloak.
He had been down at Hagrid’s hut, helping him feed Norbert, who was now
eating dead rats by the crate. “It bit me!” he said, showing them his hand, which was wrapped in a
bloody handkerchief. “I’m not going to be able to hold a quill for a week. I tell
you, that dragon’s the most horrible animal I’ve ever met, but the way Hagrid
goes on about it, you’d think it was a fluffy little bunny rabbit. When it bit me
he
toldTmheereofwf faosrafrtiagphtoennitnhge idt.aArkndwiwnhdeonw.I left, he was singing it a lullaby.”
“It’s Hedwig!” said Harry, hurrying to let her in. “She’ll have Charlie’s
answer!”
The three of them put their heads together to read the note.
Dear Ron,
How are you? Thanks for the letter — I’d be glad to take the Norwegian
Ridgeback, but it won’t be easy getting him here. I think the best thing will be
to
send him over with some friends of mine who are coming to visit me next week.
TrouCble is, they mustn’t be seen carrying an illegal dragon. ould you get the Ridgeback up the tallest tower at midnight on Saturday?
They can meet you there and take him away while it’s still dark.
Send me an answer as soon as possible.
Love,
Charlie
They looked at one another.
“We’ve got the invisibility cloak,” said Harry. “It shouldn’t be too
difficult – I think the cloaks big enough to cover two of us and Norbert.”
It was a mark of how bad the last week had been that the other two
agreed with him. Anything to get rid of Norbert — and Malfoy.
There was a hitch. By the next morning, Ron’s bitten hand had swollen to
twice its usual size. He didn’t know whether it was safe to go to Madam
Pomfrey — would she recognize a dragon bite? By the afternoon, though, he
had
no choice. The cut had turned a nasty shade of green. It looked as if Norbert’s
fangs were poisonous. Harry and Hermione rushed up to the hospital wing at the end of the day
to find Ron in a terrible state in bed.
“It’s not just my hand,” he whispered, “although that feels like it’s about
to fall off. Malfoy told Madam Pomfrey he wanted to borrow one of my books
so he could come and have a good laugh at me. He kept threatening to tell her
what really bit me — I’ve told her it was a dog, but I don’t think she believes
me — IHshaorruyldann’dt hHaevremhiiotnheimtriaetdtthoecQaulmiddRiotcnhdmowatnc.h, that’s why he’s doing this.”
“It’ll all be over at midnight on Saturday,” said Hermione, but this didn’t
soothe Ron at all. On the contrary, he sat bolt upright and broke into a sweat.
“Midnight on Saturday!” he said in a hoarse voice. “Oh no oh no — I’ve
just remembered — Charlie’s letter was in that book Malfoy took, he’s going to
know we’re getting rid of Norbert.”
Harry and Hermione didn’t get a chance to answer. Madam Pomfrey
came over at that moment and made them leave, saying Ron needed sleep.
“It’s too late to change the plan now,” Harry told Hermione. “We haven’t
timegotot send Charlie another owl, and this could be our only chance to get rid
of
Norbert. We’ll have to risk it. And we have got the invisibility cloak, Malfoy
doesn’t know about that.”
They found Fang, the boarhound, sitting outside with a bandaged tail
when they went to tell Hagrid, who opened a window to talk to them.
“I won’t let you in,” he puffed. “Norbert’s at a tricky stage — nothin’ I
can’t handle.”
When they told him about Charlie’s letter, his eyes filled with tears,
although that might have been because Norbert had just bitten him on the leg.
“Aargh! It’s all right, he only got my boot — jus’ playin’ — he’s only a
baby, after all.”
The baby banged its tail on the wall, making the windows rattle. Harry
and Hermione walked back to the castle feeling Saturday couldn’t come
quickly
enough.
They would have felt sorry for Hagrid when the time came for him to say
good-bye to Norbert if they hadn’t been so worried about what they had to do.
It
was a very dark, cloudy night, and they were a bit late arriving at Hagrid’s hut
because they’d had to wait for Peeves to get out of their way in the entrance
hall,
where he’d been playing tennis against the wall. Hagrid had Norbert packed
and
ready in a large crate.
“He’s got lots o’ rats an’ some brandy fer the journey,” said Hagrid in a
muffled voice. “An’ I’ve packed his teddy bear in case he gets lonely.”
From inside the crate came ripping noises that sounded to Harry as
though the teddy was having his head torn off.
“Bye-bye, Norbert!” Hagrid sobbed, as Harry and Hermione covered the
crate with the invisibility cloak and stepped underneath it themselves.
“Mommy
willHnoewvetrhfeoyrgmeatnyaogue!”d to get the crate back up to the castle, they never
knew. Midnight ticked nearer as they heaved Norbert up the marble staircase
in
the entrance hall and along the dark corridors. UP another staircase, then
another
– even one of Harry’s shortcuts didn’t make the work much easier.
“Nearly there!” Harry panted as they reached the corridor beneath the
tallest tower.
Then a sudden movement ahead of them made them almost drop the
crate. Forgetting that they were already invisible, they shrank into the
shadows,
staring at the dark outlines of two people grappling with each other ten feet
away. A lamp flared.
Professor McGonagall, in a tartan bathrobe and a hair net, had Malfoy by
the ear.
“Detention!” she shouted. “And twenty points from Slytherin! Wandering
around in the middle of the night, how dare you —”
“You don’t understand, Professor. Harry Potter’s coming — he’s got a
dragon!”
“What utter rubbish! How dare you tell such lies! Come on — I shall see
Professor Snape about you, Malfoy!”
The steep spiral staircase up to the top of the tower seemed the easiest
thing in the world after that. Not until they’d stepped out into the cold night air
did they throw off the cloak, glad to be able to breathe properly again.
Hermione
did a sort of jig. “Malfoy’s got detention! I could sing!”
“Don’t,” Harry advised her.
Chuckling about Malfoy, they waited, Norbert thrashing about in his
crate. About ten minutes later, four broomsticks came swooping down out of
the
darkCnheasrs.lie’s friends were a cheery lot. They showed Harry and Hermione
the harness they’d rigged up, so they could suspend Norbert between them.
They
all helped buckle Norbert safely into it and then Harry and Hermione shook
hands with the others and thanked them very much. At last, Norbert was going…going…gone.
They slipped back down the spiral staircase, their hearts as light as their
hands, now that Norbert was off them. No more dragon — Malfoy in detention — what could spoil their happiness?
The answer to that was waiting at the foot of the stairs. As they stepped
into the corridor, Filch’s face loomed suddenly out of the darkness.
“Well, well, well,” he whispered, “we are in trouble.”
They’d left the invisibility cloak on top of the tower.
HP 1 - Harry Potter and the
Sorcerer's Stone
CHAPTER FIFTEEN
THE FORBIDDEN FOREST
T hings couldn’t have been worse.
Filch took them down to Professor McGonagall’s study on the first floor, where they sat and waited without saying a word to each other. Hermione was
trembling. Excuses, alibis, and wild cover- up stories chased each other around
Harry’s brain, each more feeble than the last. He couldn’t see how they were
going to get out of trouble this time. They were cornered. How could they have
been so stupid as to forget the cloak? There was no reason on earth that
Professor McGonagall would accept for their being out of bed and creeping
around the school in the dead of night, let alone being up the tallest astronomy
tower, which was out-of-bounds except for classes. Add Norbert and the
invisibility cloak, and they might as well be packing their bags already.
Had Harry thought that things couldn’t have been worse? He was wrong. When Professor McGonagall appeared, she was leading Neville.
“Harry!” Neville burst out, the moment he saw the other two. “I was
trying to find you to warn you, I heard Malfoy saying he was going to catch
you,
he sHaid you had a drag—” arry shook his head violently to shut Neville up, but Professor
McGonagall had seen. She looked more likely to breathe fire than Norbert as
she
tow“ered over the three of them. I would never have believed it of any of you. Mr. Filch says you were
up in the astronomy tower. It’s one o’clock in the morning. Explain
youIrtsewlvaesst.h”e first time Hermione had ever failed to answer a teacher’s
question. She was staring at her slippers, as still as a statue.
“I think I’ve got a good idea of what’s been going on,” said Professor
McGonagall. “It doesn’t take a genius to work it out. You fed Draco Malfoy
some cock-and-bull story about a dragon, trying to get him out of bed and into
trouble. I’ve already caught him. I suppose you think it’s funny that
Longbottom
here heard the story and believed it, too?” Harry caught Neville’s eye and tried to tell him without words that this
wasn’t true, because Neville was looking stunned and hurt. Poor, blundering
Neville — Harry knew what it must have cost him to try and find them in the
dark, to warn them.
“I’m disgusted,” said Professor McGonagall. “Four students out of bed in
one night! I’ve never heard of such a thing before! You, Miss Granger, I
thought
you had more sense. As for you, Mr. Potter, I thought Gryffindor meant more to
you than this. All three of you will receive detentions — yes, you too, Mr.
Longbottom, nothing gives you the right to walk around school at night,
especially these days, it’s very dangerous — and fifty points will be taken from
Gryffindor.” “Fifty?” Harry gasped — they would lose the lead, the lead he’d won in
the last Quidditch match.
“Fifty points each,” said Professor McGonagall, breathing heavily
through her long, pointed nose.
“Professor — please —”
“You can’t —”
“Don’t tell me what I can and can’t do, Potter. Now get back to bed, all
of you. I’ve never been more ashamed of Gryffindor students.”
A hundred and fifty points lost. That put Gryffindor in last place. In one
night, they’d ruined any chance Gryffindor had had for the house cup. Harry
felt
as though the bottom had dropped out of his stomach. How could they ever
make up for this? Harry didn’t sleep all night. He could hear Neville sobbing into his
pillow for what seemed like hours. Harry couldn’t think of anything to say to
comfort him. He knew Neville, like himself, was dreading the dawn. What
would happen when the rest of Gryffindor found out what they’d done?
At first, Gryffindors passing the giant hourglasses that recorded the house
points the next day thought there’d been a mistake. How could they suddenly
have a hundred and fifty points fewer than yesterday? And then the story
started
to spread: Harry Potter, the famous Harry Potter, their hero of two Quidditch
matches, had lost them all those points, him and a couple of other stupid first
years. From being one of the most popular and admired people at the school,
Harry was suddenly the most hated. Even Ravenclaws and Hufflepuffs turned
on
him, because everyone had been longing to see Slytherin lose the house cup.
Everywhere Harry went, people pointed and didn’t trouble to lower their
voices
as they insulted him. Slytherins, on the other hand, clapped as he walked past
them, whistling and cheering, “Thanks Potter, we owe you one!” Only Ron stood by him.
“They’ll all forget this in a few weeks. Fred and George have lost loads
of points in all the time they’ve been here, and people still like them.”
“They’ve never lost a hundred and fifty points in one go, though, have
they?” said Harry miserably.
“Well — no,” Ron admitted.
It was a bit late to repair the damage, but Harry swore to himself not to
meddle in things that weren’t his business from now on. He’d had it with
sneaking around and spying. He felt so ashamed of himself that he went to
Wood
and“oRfefesred to resign from the Quidditch team. ign?” Wood thundered. “What good’ll that do? How are we going to
get any points back if we can’t win at Quidditch?”
But even Quidditch had lost its fun. The rest of the team wouldn’t speak
to Harry during practice, and if they had to speak about him, they called him
“the Seeker.”
Hermione and Neville were suffering, too. They didn’t have as bad a time
as Harry, because they weren’t as well-known, but nobody would speak to
them,
either. Hermione had stopped drawing attention to herself in class, keeping
her
head down and working in silence.
Harry was almost glad that the exams weren’t far away. All the studying
he had to do kept his mind off his misery. He, Ron, and Hermione kept to
themselves, working late into the night, trying to remember the ingredients in
complicated potions, learn charms and spells by heart, memorize the dates of
magical discoveries and goblin rebellions....
Then, about a week before the exams were due to start, Harry’s new
resolution not to interfere in anything that didn’t concern him was put to an
unexpected test. Walking back from the library on his own one afternoon, he
heard somebody whimpering from a classroom up ahead. As he drew closer, he
heard Quirrell’s voice.
“No — no — not again, please —”
It sounded as though someone was threatening him. Harry moved closer.
“All right — all right —” he heard Quirrell sob.
Next second, Quirrell came hurrying out of the classroom straightening
his turban. He was pale and looked as though he was about to cry. He strode
out
of sight; Harry didn’t think Quirrell had even noticed him. He waited until
Quirrell’s footsteps had disappeared, then peered into the classroom. It was
empty, but a door stood ajar at the other end. Harry was halfway toward it
before
he remembered what he’d promised himself about not meddling.
All the same, he’d have gambled twelve Sorcerer’s Stones that Snape had
just left the room, and from what Harry had just heard, Snape would be
walking
withHaa new spring in his step — Quirrell seemed to have given in at last. rry went back to the library, where Hermione was testing Ron on
Astronomy. Harry told them what he’d heard.
“Snape’s done it, then!” said Ron. “If Quirrell’s told him how to break
his Anti-Dark Force spell —”
“There’s still Fluffy, though,” said Hermione.
“Maybe Snape’s found out how to get past him without asking Hagrid,”
said Ron, looking up at the thousands of books surrounding them. “I bet
there’s a
book somewhere in here telling you how to get past a giant three-headed dog.
So
what do we do, Harry?”
The light of adventure was kindling again in Ron’s eyes, but Hermione
answered before Harry could.
“Go to Dumbledore. That’s what we should have done ages ago. If we try
anything ourselves we’ll be thrown out for sure.”
“But we’ve got no proof!” said Harry. “Quirrell’s too scared to back us
up. Snape’s only got to say he doesn’t know how the troll got in at Halloween
and that he was nowhere near the third floor — who do you think they’ll
believe,
him or us? It’s not exactly a secret we hate him, Dumbledore’ll think we made
it
up to get him sacked. Filch wouldn’t help us if his life depended on it, he’s too
friendly with Snape, and the more students get thrown out, the better, he’ll
think.
And don’t forget, we’re not supposed to know about the Stone or Fluffy. That’ll
take a lot of explaining.”
Hermione looked convinced, but Ron didn’t.
“If we just do a bit of poking around —”
“No,” said Harry flatly, “we’ve done enough poking around.”
He pulled a map of Jupiter toward him and started to learn the names of
its moons.
The following morning, notes were delivered to Harry, Hermione, and
Neville at the breakfast table. They were all the same:
Your detention will take place at eleven o’clock tonight. Meet Mr. Filch in the entrance hall.
Professor McGonagall
Harry had forgotten they still had detentions to do in the furor over the
points they’d lost. He half expected Hermione to complain that this was a whole night
of studying lost, but she didn’t say a word. Like Harry, she felt they deserved
whaAt they’d got. t eleven o’clock that night, they said good-bye to Ron in the common
room and went down to the entrance hall with Neville. Filch was already there
— and so was Malfoy. Harry had also forgotten that Malfoy had gotten a
detention, too.
“Follow me,” said Filch, lighting a lamp and leading them outside.
“I bet you’ll think twice about breaking a school rule again, won’t you,
eh?” he said, leering at them. “Oh yes…hard work and pain are the best
teachers
if you ask me….It’s just a pity they let the old punishments die out…hang you
by your wrists from the ceiling for a few days, I’ve got the chains still in my
office, keep ‘em well oiled in case they’re ever needed…Right, off we go, and
don’t think of running off, now, it’ll be worse for you if you do.” They marched off across the dark grounds. Neville kept sniffing. Harry
wondered what their punishment was going to be. It must be something really
horrible, or Filch wouldn’t be sounding so delighted.
The moon was bright, but clouds scudding across it kept throwing them
into darkness. Ahead, Harry could see the lighted windows of Hagrid’s hut.
Then
they“ heard a distant shout. Is that you, Filch? Hurry up, I want ter get started.”
Harry’s heart rose; if they were going to be working with Hagrid it
wouldn’t be so bad. His relief must have showed in his face, because Filch said,
“I suppose you think you’ll be enjoying yourself with that oaf? Well, think
again,
boy — it’s into the forest you’re going and I’m much mistaken if you’ll all come
out in one piece.” At this, Neville let out a little moan, and Malfoy stopped dead in his
tracks.
“The forest?” he repeated, and he didn’t sound quite as cool as usual.
“We can’t go in there at night — there’s all sorts of things in there —
werewolves, I heard.”
Neville clutched the sleeve of Harry’s robe and made a choking noise.
“That’s your problem, isn’t it?” said Filch, his voice cracking with glee.
“Should’ve thought of them werewolves before you got in trouble, shouldn’t
you?”
Hagrid came striding toward them out of the dark, Fang at his heel. He
was carrying his large crossbow, and a quiver of arrows hung over his
sho“uAldbeoru.’ time,” he said. “I bin waitin’ fer half an hour already. All right,
Harry, Hermione?”
“I shouldn’t be too friendly to them, Hagrid,” said Filch coldly, they’re
here to be punished, after all.”
“That’s why yer late, is it?” said Hagrid, frowning at Filch. “Bin lecturin’
them, eh? ‘Snot your place ter do that. Yeh’ve done yer bit, I’ll take over from
here.”
“I’ll be back at dawn,” said Filch, “for what’s left of them,” he added
nastily, and he turned and started back toward the castle, his lamp bobbing
away
in thMe darkness. alfoy now turned to Hagrid.
“I’m not going in that forest,” he said, and Harry was pleased to hear the
note of panic in his voice.
“Yeh are if yeh want ter stay at Hogwarts,” said Hagrid fiercely. “Yeh’ve
done wrong an’ now yeh’ve got ter pay fer it.”
“But this is servant stuff, it’s not for students to do. I thought we’d be
copying lines or something, if my father knew I was doing this, he’d—”
“—tell yer that’s how it is at Hogwarts,” Hagrid growled. “Copyin’ lines!
What good’s that ter anyone? Yeh’ll do summat useful or yeh’ll get out. If yeh
think yer father’d rather you were expelled, then get back off ter the castle an’
pack. Go on.”
Malfoy didn’t move. He looked at Hagrid furiously, but then dropped his
gaze.
“Right then,” said Hagrid, “now, listen carefully, ‘cause it’s dangerous
what we’re gonna do tonight, an’ I don’ want no one takin’ risks. Follow me
over
hereHae lmedomtheenmt.”to the very edge of the forest. Holding his lamp up high, he
pointed down a narrow, winding earth track that disappeared into the thick
black
trees. A light breeze lifted their hair as they looked into the forest. “Look there,” said Hagrid, “see that stuff shinin’ on the ground? Silvery
stuff? That’s unicorn blood. There’s a unicorn in there bin hurt badly by
summat.
This is the second time in a week. I found one dead last Wednesday. We’re
gonna try an’ find the poor thing. We might have ter put it out of its misery.” “And what if whatever hurt the unicorn finds us first?” said Malfoy,
unable to keep the fear out of his voice.
“There’s nothin’ that lives in the forest that’ll hurt yeh if yer with me or
Fang,” said Hagrid. “An’ keep ter the path. Right, now, we’re gonna split inter
two parties an’ follow the trail in diff’rent directions. There’s blood all over the
place, it must’ve bin staggerin’ around since last night at least.”
“I want Fang,” said Malfoy quickly, looking at Fang’s long teeth.
“All right, but I warn yeh, he’s a coward,” said Hagrid. “So me, Harry,
an’ Hermione’ll go one way an’ Draco, Neville, an’ Fang’ll go the other. Now, if
any of us finds the unicorn, we’ll send up green sparks, right? Get yer wands
out
an’ practice now — that’s it — an’ if anyone gets in trouble, send up red sparks,
an’ we’ll all come an’ find yeh — so, be careful — let’s go.” The forest was black and silent. A little way into it they reached a fork in
the earth path, and Harry, Hermione, and Hagrid took the left path while
Malfoy,
NevTilhlee,yawnad Fang took the right. lked in silence, their eyes on the ground. Every now and then a
ray of moonlight through the branches above lit a spot of silver-blue blood on
the fallen leaves.
Harry saw that Hagrid looked very worried.
“Could a werewolf be killing the unicorns?” Harry asked.
“Not fast enough,” said Hagrid. “It’s not easy ter catch a unicorn, they’re
powerful magic creatures. I never knew one ter be hurt before.”
They walked past a mossy tree stump. Harry could hear running water;
there must be a stream somewhere close by. There were still spots of unicorn
blood here and there along the winding path.
“You all right, Hermione?” Hagrid whispered. “Don’ worry, it can’t’ve
gone far if it’s this badly hurt, an’ then we’ll be able ter — GET BEHIND THAT
TREE!”
Hagrid seized Harry and Hermione and hoisted them off the path behind
a towering oak. He pulled out an arrow and fitted it into his crossbow, raising
it,
ready to fire. The three of them listened. Something was slithering over dead
leaves nearby: it sounded like a cloak trailing along the ground. Hagrid was
squinting up the dark path, but after a few seconds, the sound faded away. “I knew it,” he murmured. “There’s summat in here that shouldn’ be.”
“A werewolf?” Harry suggested.
“That wasn’ no werewolf an’ it wasn’ no unicorn, neither,” said Hagrid
grimly. “Right, follow me, but careful, now.”
They walked more slowly, ears straining for the faintest sound. Suddenly,
in a clearing ahead, something definitely moved.
“Who’s there?” Hagrid called. “Show yerself — I’m armed!”
And into the clearing came — was it a man, or a horse? To the waist, a
man, with red hair and beard, but below that was a horse’s gleaming chestnut
body with a long, reddish tail. Harry and Hermione’s jaws dropped.
“Oh, it’s you, Ronan,” said Hagrid in relief. “How are yeh?”
He walked forward and shook the centaur’s hand.
“Good evening to you, Hagrid,” said Ronan. He had a deep, sorrowful
voice. “Were you going to shoot me?”
“Can’t be too careful, Ronan,” said Hagrid, patting his crossbow.
“There’s summat bad loose in this forest. This is Harry Potter an’ Hermione
Granger, by the way. Students up at the school. An’ this is Ronan, you two.
He’s
a centaur. “We’d noticed,” said Hermione faintly.
“Good evening,” said Ronan. “Students, are you? And do you learn
much, up at the school?”
“Erm —”
“A bit,” said Hermione timidly.
“A bit. Well, that’s something.” Ronan sighed. He flung back his head
and stared at the sky. “Mars is bright tonight.”
“Yeah,” said Hagrid, glancing up, too. “Listen, I’m glad we’ve run inter
yeh, Ronan, ‘cause there’s a unicorn bin hurt — you seen anythin’?”
Ronan didn’t answer immediately. He stared unblinkingly upward, then
sighed again.
“Always the innocent are the first victims,” he said. “So it has been for
ages past, so it is now.”
“Yeah,” said Hagrid, “but have yeh seen anythin’ Ronan? Anythin’
unusual?”
“Mars is bright tonight,” Ronan repeated, while Hagrid watched him
impatiently. “Unusually bright.”
H “Yeah, but I was meanin’ anythin’ unusual a bit nearer home, said agrid. “So yeh haven’t noticed anythin’ strange?”
Yet again, Ronan took a while to answer. At last, he said, “The forest
hides many secrets.”
A movement in the trees behind Ronan made Hagrid raise his bow again,
but it was only a second centaur, black-haired and -bodied and wilder-looking
than Ronan.
“Hullo, Bane,” said Hagrid. “All right?”
“Good evening, Hagrid, I hope you are well?”
“Well enough. Look, I’ve jus’ bin askin’ Ronan, you seen anythin’ odd in
here lately? There’s a unicorn bin injured — would yeh know anythin’ about
it?”Bane walked over to stand next to Ronan. He looked skyward. “Mars is
bright tonight,” he said simply.
“We’ve heard,” said Hagrid grumpily. “Well, if either of you do see
anythin’, let me know, won’t yeh? We’ll be off, then.”
Harry and Hermione followed him out of the clearing, staring over their
shoulders at Ronan and Bane until the trees blocked their view.
“Never,” said Hagrid irritably, “try an’ get a straight answer out of a
centaur. Ruddy stargazers. Not interested in anythin’ closer’n the moon.”
“Are there many of them in here?” asked Hermione.
“Oh, a fair few….Keep themselves to themselves mostly, but they’re
good enough about turnin’ up if ever I want a word. They’re deep, mind,
centaurs…they know things…jus’ don’ let on much.”
“D’you think that was a centaur we heard earlier?” said Harry.
“Did that sound like hooves to you? Nah, if yeh ask me, that was what’s
bin killin’ the unicorns – never heard anythin’ like it before.”
They walked on through the dense, dark trees. Harry kept looking
nervously over his shoulder. He had the nasty feeling they were being
watched.
He was very glad they had Hagrid and his crossbow with them. They had just
passed a bend in the path when Hermione grabbed Hagrid’s arm. “Hagrid! Look! Red sparks, the others are in trouble!”
“You two wait here!” Hagrid shouted. “Stay on the path, I’ll come back
for yeh!”
They heard him crashing away through the undergrowth and stood
looking at each other, very scared, until they couldn’t hear anything but the
rustling of leaves around them.
“You don’t think they’ve been hurt, do you?” whispered Hermione.
“I don’t care if Malfoy has, but if something’s got Neville…it’s our fault
he’s here in the first place.”
The minutes dragged by. Their ears seemed sharper than usual. Harry’s
seemed to be picking up every sigh of the wind, every cracking twig. What was
going on? Where were the others?
At last, a great crunching noise announced Hagrid’s return. Malfoy,
Neville, and Fang were with him. Hagrid was fuming. Malfoy, it seemed, had
sneaked up behind Neville and grabbed him as a joke. Neville had panicked
and
sent up the sparks. “We’ll be lucky ter catch anythin’ now, with the racket you two were
makin’. Right, we’re changin’ groups — Neville, you stay with me an’
Hermione, Harry, you go with Fang an’ this idiot. I’m sorry,” Hagrid added in a
whisper to Harry, “but he’ll have a harder time frightenin’ you, an’ we’ve gotta
get this done.”
So Harry set off into the heart of the forest with Malfoy and Fang. They
walked for nearly half an hour, deeper and deeper into the forest, until the
path
became almost impossible to follow because the trees were so thick. Harry
thought the blood seemed to be getting thicker. There were splashes on the
roots
of a tree, as though the poor creature had been thrashing around in pain close
by.
Harry could see a clearing ahead, through the tangled branches of an ancient
oak.
“Look —” he murmured, holding out his arm to stop Malfoy.
Something bright white was gleaming on the ground. They inched closer.
It was the unicorn all right, and it was dead. Harry had never seen
anything so beautiful and sad. Its long, slender legs were stuck out at odd
angles
where it had fallen and its mane was spread pearly-white on the dark leaves.
Harry had taken one step toward it when a slithering sound made him
freeze where he stood. A bush on the edge of the clearing quivered.…Then, out
of the shadows, a hooded figure came crawling across the ground like some
stalking beast. Harry, Malfoy, and Fang stood transfixed. The cloaked figure
reached the unicorn, lowered its head over the wound in the animal’s side, and
began to drink its blood.
“AAAAAAAAAARGH!” Malfoy let out a terrible scream and bolted — so did Fang. The hooded
figure raised its head and looked right at Harry — unicorn blood was dribbling
down its front. It got to its feet and came swiftly toward Harry — he couldn’t
move for fear. Then a pain like he’d never felt before pierced his head; it was as though
his scar were on fire. Half blinded, he staggered backward. He heard hooves
behind him, galloping, and something jumped clean over Harry, charging at
the
figure. The pain in Harry’s head was so bad he fell to his knees. It took a minute
or two to pass. When he looked up, the figure had gone. A centaur was
standing
over him, not Ronan or Bane; this one looked younger; he had white-blond hair
and a palomino body. “Are you all right?” said the centaur, pulling Harry to his feet.
“Yes — thank you — what was that?”
The centaur didn’t answer. He had astonishingly blue eyes, like pale
sapphires. He looked carefully at Harry, his eyes lingering on the scar that
stood
out,“Ylivoiud,aorentHhearPryo’tstefrorbeohye,”adh.e said. “You had better get back to Hagrid.
The forest is not safe at this time — especially for you. Can you ride? It will be
quicker this way.
“My name is Firenze,” he added, as he lowered himself on to his front
legs so that Harry could clamber onto his back.
There was suddenly a sound of more galloping from the other side of the
clearing. Ronan and Bane came bursting through the trees, their flanks
heaving
and“sFweaty. irenze!” Bane thundered. “What are you doing? You have a human on
your back! Have you no shame? Are you a common mule?”
quic“kDeor yhoeulereaavleiszethwishofotrheisst,ist?h”esbaeidtteFri.r”enze. “This is the Potter boy. The
“What have you been telling him?” growled Bane. “Remember, Firenze,
we are sworn not to set ourselves against the heavens. Have we not read what
is
to come in the movements of the planets?”
Ronan pawed the ground nervously. “I’m sure Firenze thought he was
acting for the best, “ he said in his gloomy voice.
Bane kicked his back legs in anger.
“For the best! What is that to do with us? Centaurs are concerned with
what has been foretold! It is not our business to run around like donkeys after
stray humans in our forest!”
Firenze suddenly reared on to his hind legs in anger, so that Harry had to
grab his shoulders to stay on.
“Do you not see that unicorn?” Firenze bellowed at Bane. “Do you not
understand why it was killed? Or have the planets not let you in on that secret?
I
set myself against what is lurking in this forest, Bane, yes, with humans
alonAgnsdidFe me if I must.” irenze whisked around; with Harry clutching on as best he could,
they plunged off into the trees, leaving Ronan and Bane behind them.
Harry didn’t have a clue what was going on.
“Why’s Bane so angry?” he asked. “What was that thing you saved me
from, anyway?”
Firenze slowed to a walk, warned Harry to keep his head bowed in case
of low-hanging branches, but did not answer Harry’s question. They made their
way through the trees in silence for so long that Harry thought Firenze didn’t
want to talk to him anymore. They were passing through a particularly dense
patch of trees, however, when Firenze suddenly stopped.
“Harry Potter, do you know what unicorn blood is used for?”
“No,” said Harry, startled by the odd question. “We’ve only used the horn
and tail hair in Potions.”
“That is because it is a monstrous thing, to slay a unicorn,” said Firenze.
“Only one who has nothing to lose, and everything to gain, would commit such
a
crime. The blood of a unicorn will keep you alive, even if you are an inch from
death, but at a terrible price. You have slain something pure and defenseless to
save yourself, and you will have but a half-life, a cursed life, from the moment
theHblood touches your lips.” arry stared at the back of Firenze’s head, which was dappled silver in
the moonlight.
“But who’d be that desperate?” he wondered aloud. “If you’re going to
be cursed forever, death’s better, isn’t it?”
“It is,” Firenze agreed, “unless all you need is to stay alive long enough
to drink something else — something that will bring you back to full strength
and power — something that will mean you can never die. Mr. Potter, do you
know what is hidden in the school at this very moment?”
“The Sorcerer’s Stone! Of course — the Elixir of Life! But I don’t
understand who —”
“Can you think of nobody who has waited many years to return to power,
who has clung to life, awaiting their chance?”
It was as though an iron fist had clenched suddenly around Harry’s heart.
Over the rustling of the trees, he seemed to hear once more what Hagrid had
told
him on the night they had met: “Some say he died. Codswallop, in my opinion.
Dunno if he had enough human left in him to die.” “Do you mean,” Harry croaked, “that was Vol-”
“Harry! Harry, are you all right?”
Hermione was running toward them down the path, Hagrid puffing along
behind her.
“I’m fine,” said Harry, hardly knowing what he was saying. “The
unicorn’s dead, Hagrid, it’s in that clearing back there.”
“This is where I leave you,” Firenze murmured as Hagrid hurried off to
examine the unicorn. “You are safe now.”
Harry slid off his back.
“Good luck, Harry Potter,” said Firenze. “The planets have been read
wrongly before now, even by centaurs. I hope this is one of those times.”
He turned and cantered back into the depths of the forest, leaving Harry
shivering behind him.
Ron had fallen asleep in the dark common room, waiting for them to return.
He shouted something about Quidditch fouls when Harry roughly shook him
awake. In a matter of seconds, though, he was wide-eyed as Harry began to tell
him and Hermione what had happened in the forest.
Harry couldn’t sit down. He paced up and down in front of the fire. He
was still shaking.
“Snape wants the stone for Voldemort…and Voldemort’s waiting in the
forest…and all this time we thought Snape just wanted to get rich….”
“Stop saying the name!” said Ron in a terrified whisper, as if he thought
Voldemort could hear them.
Harry wasn’t listening.
“Firenze saved me, but he shouldn’t have done so.…Bane was furious…
he was talking about interfering with what the planets say is going to
happen….They must show that Voldemort’s coming back.…Bane thinks Firenze
should have let Voldemort kill me.…I suppose that’s written in the stars as
wel“l.W” ill you stop saying the name!” Ron hissed.
“So all I’ve got to wait for now is Snape to steal the Stone,” Harry went
on feverishly, “then Voldemort will be able to come and finish me off ... Well, I
suppose Bane’ll be happy.”
Hermione looked very frightened, but she had a word of comfort.
“Harry, everyone says Dumbledore’s the only one You-Know-Who was
ever afraid of with Dumbledore around, You-Know-Who won’t touch you.
Anyway, who says the centaurs are right? It sounds like fortune-telling to me,
and Professor McGonagall says that’s a very imprecise branch of magic.”
The sky had turned light before they stopped talking. They went to bed
exhausted, their throats sore. But the night’s surprises weren’t over.
When Harry pulled back his sheets, he found his invisibility cloak folded
neatly underneath them. There was a note pinned to it:
Just in case.
HP 1 - Harry Potter and the
Sorcerer's Stone
CHAPTER SIXTEEN
THROUGH THE TRAPDOOR
I n years to come, Harry would never quite remember how he had managed
to get through his exams when he half expected Voldemort to come bursting
through the door at any moment. Yet the days crept by, and there could be no
doubt that Fluffy was still alive and well behind the locked door.
It was sweltering hot, especially in the large classroom where they did
their written papers. They had been given special, new quills for the exams,
which had been bewitched with an Anticheating spell.
They had practical exams as well. Professor Flitwick called them one by
one into his class to see if they could make a pineapple tapdance across a desk.
Professor McGonagall watched them turn a mouse into a snuffbox — points
were given for how pretty the snuffbox was, but taken away if it had whiskers.
Snape made them all nervous, breathing down their necks while they tried to
remember how to make a Forgetfulness potion.
Harry did the best he could, trying to ignore the stabbing pains in his
forehead, which had been bothering him ever since his trip into the forest.
Neville thought Harry had a bad case of exam nerves because Harry couldn’t
sleep, but the truth was that Harry kept being woken by his old nightmare,
except that it was now worse than ever because there was a hooded figure
dripping blood in it.
Maybe it was because they hadn’t seen what Harry had seen in the forest,
or because they didn’t have scars burning on their foreheads, but Ron and
Hermione didn’t seem as worried about the Stone as Harry. The idea of
Voldemort certainly scared them, but he didn’t keep visiting them in dreams,
and
they were so busy with their studying they didn’t have much time to fret about
what Snape or anyone else might be up to.
Their very last exam was History of Magic. One hour of answering
questions about batty old wizards who’d invented selfstirring cauldrons and
they’d be free, free for a whole wonderful week until their exam results came
out. When the ghost of Professor Binns told them to put down their quills and
roll up their parchment, Harry couldn’t help cheering with the rest.
“That was far easier than I thought it would be,” said Hermione as they
joined the crowds flocking out onto the sunny grounds. “I needn’t have learned
about the 1637 Werewolf Code of Conduct or the uprising of Elfric the Eager.”
Hermione always liked to go through their exam papers afterward, but
Ron said this made him feel ill, so they wandered down to the lake and flopped
under a tree. The Weasley twins and Lee Jordan were tickling the tentacles of a
giant squid, which was basking in the warm shallows. “No more studying,” Ron
sighed happily, stretching out on the grass. “You could look more cheerful,
Harry, we’ve got a week before we find out how badly we’ve done, there’s no
need to worry yet.”
Harry was rubbing his forehead.
“I wish I knew what this means!” he burst out angrily. “My scar keeps
hurting — it’s happened before, but never as often as this.”
“Go to Madam Pomfrey,” Hermione suggested.
“I’m not ill,” said Harry. “I think it’s a warning…it means danger’s
coming….”
Ron couldn’t get worked up, it was too hot.
“Harry, relax, Hermione’s right, the Stone’s safe as long as Dumbledore’s
around. Anyway, we’ve never had any proof Snape found out how to get past
Fluffy. He nearly had his leg ripped off once, he’s not going to try it again in a
hurry. And Neville will play Quidditch for England before Hagrid lets
Dumbledore down.”
Harry nodded, but he couldn’t shake off a lurking feeling that there was
something he’d forgotten to do, something important. When he tried to explain
this, Hermione said, “That’s just the exams. I woke up last night and was
halfway through my Transfiguration notes before I remembered we’d done that
one.”
Harry was quite sure the unsettled feeling didn’t have anything to do with
work, though. He watched an owl flutter toward the school across the bright
blue
sky, a note clamped in its mouth. Hagrid was the only one who ever sent him
letters. Hagrid would never betray Dumbledore. Hagrid would never tell
anyone
how to get past Fluffy…never…but…. Harry suddenly jumped to his feet.
“Where’re you going?” said Ron sleepily.
“I’ve just thought of something,” said Harry. He had turned white.
“We’ve got to go and see Hagrid, now.”
“Why?” panted Hermione, hurrying to keep up.
“Don’t you think it’s a bit odd,” said Harry, scrambling up the grassy
slope, “that what Hagrid wants more than anything else is a dragon, and a
stranger turns up who just happens to have an egg in his pocket? How many
people wander around with dragon eggs if it’s against wizard law? Lucky they
found Hagrid, don’t you think? Why didn’t I see it before?”
“What are you talking about?” said Ron, but Harry, sprinting across the
grounds toward the forest, didn’t answer.
Hagrid was sitting in an armchair outside his house; his trousers and
sleeves were rolled up, and he was shelling peas into a large bowl.
“Hullo,” he said, smiling. “Finished yer exams? Got time fer a drink?”
“Yes, please,” said Ron, but Harry cut him off.
“No, we’re in a hurry. Hagrid, I’ve got to ask you something. You know
that night you won Norbert? What did the stranger you were playing cards
with
look“Dliuken?n”o,” said Hagrid casually, “he wouldn’ take his cloak off.”
He saw the three of them look stunned and raised his eyebrows.
“It’s not that unusual, yeh get a lot o’ funny folk in the Hog’s Head —
that’s the pub down in the village. Mighta bin a dragon dealer, mightn’ he? I
never saw his face, he kept his hood up.”
Harry sank down next to the bowl of peas. “What did you talk to him
about, Hagrid? Did you mention Hogwarts at all?”
“Mighta come up,” said Hagrid, frowning as he tried to remember.
“Yeah…he asked what I did, an’ I told him I was gamekeeper here…He asked a
bit about the sorta creatures I took after…so I told him…an’ I said what I’d
always really wanted was a dragon…an’ then…I can’ remember too well,
‘cause
he kept buyin’ me drinks…Let’s see…yeah, then he said he had the dragon egg
an’ we could play cards fer it if I wanted…but he had ter be sure I could handle
it, he didn’ want it ter go ter any old home….So I told him, after Fluffy, a
dragon
would be easy.…”
“And did he — did he seem interested in Fluffy?” Harry asked, trying to
keep his voice calm.
“Well — yeah — how many three-headed dogs d’yeh meet, even around
Hogwarts? So I told him, Fluffy’s a piece o’ cake if yeh know how to calm him
down, jus’ play him a bit o’ music an’ he’ll go straight off ter sleep —”
Hagrid suddenly looked horrified.
“I shouldn’ta told yeh that!” he blurted out. “Forget I said it! Hey —
where’re yeh goin’?”
Harry, Ron, and Hermione didn’t speak to each other at all until they
came to a halt in the entrance hall, which seemed very cold and gloomy after
the
grounds. “We’ve got to go to Dumbledore,” said Harry. “Hagrid told that stranger
how to get past Fluffy, and it was either Snape or Voldemort under that cloak —
it must’ve been easy, once he’d got Hagrid drunk. I just hope Dumbledore
believes us. Firenze might back us up if Bane doesn’t stop him. Where’s
Dumbledore’s office?”
They looked around, as if hoping to see a sign pointing them in the right
direction. They had never been told where Dumbledore lived, nor did they
know
any“oWneewho had been sent to see him.
’ll just have to —” Harry began, but a voice suddenly rang across the
hall.
“What are you three doing inside?”
It was Professor McGonagall, carrying a large pile of books.
“We want to see Professor Dumbledore,” said Hermione, rather bravely,
Harry and Ron thought.
“See Professor Dumbledore?” Professor McGonagall repeated, as though
this was a very fishy thing to want to do. “Why?”
Harry swallowed — now what?
“It’s sort of secret,” he said, but he wished at once he hadn’t, because
Pro“fePsrsoor McGonagall’s nostrils flared. fessor Dumbledore left ten minutes ago,” she said coldly. “He
received an urgent owl from the Ministry of Magic and flew off for London at
once.”
“He’s gone?” said Harry frantically. “Now?”
“Professor Dumbledore is a very great wizard, Potter, he has many
demands on his time – ”
“But this is important.”
“Something you have to say is more important than the Ministry of
Magic, Potter?”
“Look,” said Harry, throwing caution to the winds, “Professor — it’s
about the Sorcerer’s Stone —” Whatever Professor McGonagall had expected, it wasn’t that. The books
she was carrying tumbled out of her arms, but she didn’t pick them up.
“How do you know —?” she spluttered.
“Professor, I think — I know — that Sn— that someone’s going to try
and steal the Stone. I’ve got to talk to Professor Dumbledore.”
She eyed him with a mixture of shock and suspicion.
“Professor Dumbledore will be back tomorrow,” she said finally. I don’t
know how you found out about the Stone, but rest assured, no one can possibly
steal it, it’s too well protected.”
“But Professor —”
“Potter, I know what I’m talking about,” she said shortly. She bent down
and gathered up the fallen books. I suggest you all go back outside and enjoy
the
sunshine.”
But they didn’t.
“It’s tonight,” said Harry, once he was sure Professor McGonagall was
out of earshot. “Snape’s going through the trapdoor tonight. He’s found out
everything he needs, and now he’s got Dumbledore out of the way. He sent
that
note, I bet the Ministry of Magic will get a real shock when Dumbledore turns
up.”“But what can we —”
Hermione gasped. Harry and Ron wheeled round.
Snape was standing there.
“Good afternoon,” he said smoothly.
They stared at him.
“You shouldn’t be inside on a day like this,” he said, with an odd, twisted
smile.
“We were —” Harry began, without any idea what he was going to say.
“You want to be more careful,” said Snape. “Hanging around like this,
people will think you’re up to something. And Gryffindor really can’t afford to
lose any more points, can it?”
Harry flushed. They turned to go outside, but Snape called them back.
“Be warned, Potter — any more nighttime wanderings and I will
personally make sure you are expelled. Good day to you.”
He strode off in the direction of the staffroom.
Out on the stone steps, Harry turned to the others.
“Right, here’s what we’ve got to do,” he whispered urgently. “One of us
has got to keep an eye on Snape — wait outside the staff room and follow him
if
he l“eWavheysmite. ?H”ermione, you’d better do that.”
“It’s obvious,” said Ron. “You can pretend to be waiting for Professor
Flitwick, you know.” He put on a high voice, “‘Oh Professor Flitwick, I’m so
worried, I think I got question fourteen b wrong….’”
“Oh, shut up,” said Hermione, but she agreed to go and watch out for
Snape.
“And we’d better stay outside the third-floor corridor,” Harry told Ron.
“Come on.”
But that part of the plan didn’t work. No sooner had they reached the
door separating Fluffy from the rest of the school than Professor McGonagall
turned up again and this time, she lost her temper.
“I suppose you think you’re harder to get past than a pack of
enchantments!” she stormed. “Enough of this nonsense! If I hear you’ve come
anywhere near here again, I’ll take another fifty points from Gryffindor! Yes, Weasley, from my own house!”
Harry and Ron went back to the common room, Harry had just said, “At
least Hermione’s on Snape’s tail,” when the portrait of the Fat Lady swung
open
and Hermione came in. “I’m sorry, Harry!” she wailed. “Snape came out and asked me what I
was doing, so I said I was waiting for Flitwick, and Snape went to get him, and
I’ve only just got away, I don’t know where Snape went.”
“Well, that’s it then, isn’t it?” Harry said.
The other two stared at him. He was pale and his eyes were glittering.
“I’m going out of here tonight and I’m going to try and get to the Stone
first.”
“You’re mad!” said Ron.
“You can’t!” said Hermione. “After what McGonagall and Snape have
said? You’ll be expelled!”
“SO WHAT” Harry shouted. “Don’t you understand? If Snape gets hold
of the Stone, Voldemort’s coming back! Haven’t you heard what it was like
when he was trying to take over? There won’t be any Hogwarts to get expelled
from! He’ll flatten it, or turn it into a school for the Dark Arts! Losing points
doesn’t matter anymore, can’t you see? D’you think he’ll leave you and your
families alone if Gryffindor wins the house cup? If I get caught before I can get
to the Stone, well, I’ll have to go back to the Dursleys and wait for Voldemort
to
find me there, it’s only dying a bit later than I would have, because I’m never
going over to the Dark Side! I’m going through that trapdoor tonight and
nothing
you two say is going to stop me! Voldemort killed my parents, remember?”
He glared at them.
“You’re right Harry,” said Hermione in a small voice.
“I’ll use the invisibility cloak,” said Harry. “It’s just lucky I got it back.”
“But will it cover all three of us?” said Ron.
“All — all three of us?”
“Oh, come off it, you don’t think we’d let you go alone?”
“Of course not,” said Hermione briskly. “How do you think you’d get to
the Stone without us? I’d better go and took through my books, there might be
something useful….”
“But if we get caught, you two will be expelled, too.”
“Not if I can help it,” said Hermione grimly. “Flitwick told me in secret
that I got a hundred and twelve percent on his exam. They’re not throwing me
out after that.”
After dinner the three of them sat nervously apart in the common room.
Nobody bothered them; none of the Gryffindors had anything to say to Harry
any more, after all. This was the first night he hadn’t been upset by it.
Hermione
was skimming through all her notes, hoping to come across one of the
enchantments they were about to try to break. Harry and Ron didn’t talk much.
BothSlofwtlhye, mthewreoroemtheinmkpintigedabaosuptewohpalet dthreifytewdeorfef atobobuetd.to do.
“Better get the cloak,” Ron muttered, as Lee Jordan finally left,
stretching and yawning. Harry ran upstairs to their dark dormitory. He pulled
out
the cloak and then his eyes fell on the flute Hagrid had given him for
Christmas.
He pocketed it to use on Fluffy — he didn’t feel much like singing.
He ran back down to the common room.
“We’d better put the cloak on here, and make sure it covers all three of us
– if Filch spots one of our feet wandering along on its own —”
“What are you doing?” said a voice from the corner of the room. Neville
appeared from behind an armchair, clutching Trevor the toad, who looked as
though he’d been making another bid for freedom.
“Nothing, Neville, nothing,” said Harry, hurriedly putting the cloak
behind his back.
Neville stared at their guilty faces.
“You’re going out again,” he said.
“No, no, no,” said Hermione. “No, we’re not. Why don’t you go to bed,
Neville?”
Harry looked at the grandfather clock by the door. They couldn’t afford
to waste any more time, Snape might even now be playing Fluffy to sleep.
“You can’t go out,” said Neville, “you’ll be caught again. Gryffindor will
be in even more trouble.”
“You don’t understand,” said Harry, “this is important.”
But Neville was clearly steeling himself to do something desperate.
I won’t let you do it,” he said, hurrying to stand in front of the portrait
hole. “I’ll — I’ll fight you!”
“Neville, “Ron exploded, “get away from that hole and don’t be an idiot —”
“Don’t you call me an idiot!” said Neville. I don’t think you should be
breaking any more rules! And you were the one who told me to stand up to
people!”
“Yes, but not to us,” said Ron in exasperation. “Neville, you don’t know
what you’re doing.”
He took a step forward and Neville dropped Trevor the toad, who leapt
out of sight.
“Go on then, try and hit me!” said Neville, raising his fists. “I’m ready!”
Harry turned to Hermione.
“Do something,” he said desperately.
Hermione stepped forward.
“Neville,” she said, “I’m really, really sorry about this.”
She raised her wand.
“Petrificus Totalus!” she cried, pointing it at Neville.
Neville’s arms snapped to his sides. His legs sprang together. His whole
body rigid, he swayed where he stood and then fell flat on his face, stiff as a
board.
Hermione ran to turn him over. Neville’s jaws were jammed together so
he couldn’t speak. Only his eyes were moving, looking at them in horror.
“What’ve you done to him?” Harry whispered.
“It’s the full Body-Bind,” said Hermione miserably. “Oh, Neville, I’m so
sorry.”
“We had to, Neville, no time to explain,” said Harry.
“You’ll understand later, Neville,” said Ron as they stepped over him and
pulled on the invisibility cloak.
But leaving Neville lying motionless on the floor didn’t feel like a very
good omen. In their nervous state, every statue’s shadow looked like Filch,
every
distant breath of wind sounded like Peeves swooping down on them. At the foot
of the first set of stairs, they spotted Mrs. Norris skulking near the top. “Oh, let’s kick her, just this once,” Ron whispered in Harry’s ear, but
Harry shook his head. As they climbed carefully around her, Mrs. Norris
turned
herTlahmeypldike eyes on them, but didn’t do anything. idn’t meet anyone else until they reached the staircase up to the
third floor. Peeves was bobbing halfway up, loosening the carpet so that people
would trip.
“Who’s there?” he said suddenly as they climbed toward him. He
narrowed his wicked black eyes. “Know you’re there, even if I can’t see you.
Are you ghoulie or ghostie or wee student beastie?”
He rose up in the air and floated there, squinting at them.
“Should call Filch, I should, if something’s a-creeping around unseen.”
Harry had a sudden idea.
“Peeves,” he said, in a hoarse whisper, “the Bloody Baron has his own
reasons for being invisible.”
Peeves almost fell out of the air in shock. He caught himself in time and
hovered about a foot off the stairs.
“So sorry, your bloodiness, Mr. Baron, Sir,” he said greasily. “My
mistake, my mistake — I didn’t see you — of course I didn’t, you’re invisible —
forgive old Peevsie his little joke, sir.”
“I have business here, Peeves,” croaked Harry. “Stay away from this
place tonight.”
“I will, sir, I most certainly will,” said Peeves, rising up in the air again.
“Hope your business goes well, Baron, I’ll not bother you.”
And he scooted off.
“Brilliant, Harry!” whispered Ron.
A few seconds later, they were there, outside the third-floor corridor —
and the door was already ajar.
“Well, there you are,” Harry said quietly, “Snape’s already got past
Fluffy.”
Seeing the open door somehow seemed to impress upon all three of them
what was facing them. Underneath the cloak, Harry turned to the other two.
“If you want to go back, I won’t blame you,” he said. “You can take the
cloak, I won’t need it now.”
“Don’t be stupid,” said Ron.
“We’re coming,” said Hermione.
Harry pushed the door open.
As the door creaked, low, rumbling growls met their ears. All three of the
dog’s noses sniffed madly in their direction, even though it couldn’t see them.
“What’s that at its feet?” Hermione whispered.
“Looks like a harp,” said Ron. “Snape must have left it there.”
“It must wake up the moment you stop playing,” said Harry. “Well, here
goes ….”
He put Hagrid’s flute to his lips and blew. It wasn’t really a tune, but
from the first note the beast’s eyes began to droop. Harry hardly drew breath.
Slowly, the dog’s growls ceased — it tottered on its paws and fell to its knees,
then it slumped to the ground, fast asleep.
“Keep playing,” Ron warned Harry as they slipped out of the cloak and
crept toward the trapdoor. They could feel the dog’s hot, smelly breath as they
approached the giant heads. “I think we’ll be able to pull the door open,” said
Ron, peering over the dog’s back. “Want to go first, Hermione?”
“No, I don’t!”
“All right.” Ron gritted his teeth and stepped carefully over the dog’s
legs. He bent and pulled the ring of the trapdoor, which swung up and open. “What can you see?” Hermione said anxiously.
“Nothing — just black — there’s no way of climbing down, we’ll just
have to drop.”
Harry, who was still playing the flute, waved at Ron to get his attention
and pointed at himself.
“You want to go first? Are you sure?” said Ron. “I don’t know how deep
this thing goes. Give the flute to Hermione so she can keep him asleep.”
Harry handed the flute over. In the few seconds’ silence, the dog growled
and twitched, but the moment Hermione began to play, it fell back into its deep
sleep.
Harry climbed over it and looked down through the trapdoor. There was
no sign of the bottom.
He lowered himself through the hole until he was hanging on by his
fingertips. Then he looked up at Ron and said, “If anything happens to me,
don’t
follo“wRi
.gGhot,”stsraai
idghRtotno. the owlery and send Hedwig to Dumbledore, right?”
“See you in a minute, I hope …”
And Harry let go. Cold, damp air rushed past him as he fell down, down,
down and —
FLUMP. With a funny, muffled sort of thump he landed on something
soft. He sat up and felt around, his eyes not used to the gloom. It felt as though
he was sitting on some sort of plant.
“It’s okay!” he called up to the light the size of a postage stamp, which
was the open trapdoor, “it’s a soft landing, you can jump!”
Ron followed right away. He landed, sprawled next to Harry.
“What’s this stuff?” were his first words.
“Dunno, some sort of plant thing. I suppose it’s here to break the fall.
Come on, Hermione!”
The distant music stopped. There was a loud bark from the dog, but
Hermione had already jumped. She landed on Harry’s other side.
“We must be miles under the school,” she said.
“Lucky this plant thing’s here, really,” said Ron.
“Lucky!” shrieked Hermione. “Look at you both!”
She leapt up and struggled toward a damp wall. She had to struggle
because the moment she had landed, the plant had started to twist snakelike
tendrils around her ankles. As for Harry and Ron, their legs had already been
bound tightly in long creepers without their noticing.
Hermione had managed to free herself before the plant got a firm grip on
her. Now she watched in horror as the two boys fought to pull the plant off
them,
but the more they strained against it, the tighter and faster the plant wound
around them.
“Stop moving!” Hermione ordered them. “I know what this is — it’s
Devil’s Snare!”
“Oh, I’m so glad we know what it’s called, that’s a great help,” snarled
Ron, leaning back, trying to stop the plant from curling around his neck. “Shut
up, I’m trying to remember how to kill it!” said Hermione.
“Well, hurry up, I can’t breathe!” Harry gasped, wrestling with it as it
curled around his chest.
“Devil’s Snare, Devil’s Snare…what did Professor Sprout say? — it likes
the dark and the damp.”
“So light a fire!” Harry choked.
“Yes — of course — but there’s no wood!” Hermione cried, wringing her
hands.
“HAVE YOU GONE MAD?” Ron bellowed. “ARE YOU A WITCH OR
NOT?”
“Oh, right!” said Hermione, and she whipped out her wand, waved it,
muttered something, and sent a jet of the same bluebell flames she had used
on
Snape at the plant. In a matter of seconds, the two boys felt it loosening its
grip
as it cringed away from the light and warmth. Wriggling and flailing, it
unraveled itself from their bodies, and they were able to pull free.
“Lucky you pay attention in Herbology, Hermione,” said Harry as he
joined her by the wall, wiping sweat off his face.
“Yeah,” said Ron, “and lucky Harry doesn’t lose his head in a crisis —
‘there’s no wood,’ honestly.”
“This way,” said Harry, pointing down a stone passageway, which was
the only way forward.
All they could hear apart from their footsteps was the gentle drip of water
trickling down the walls. The passageway sloped downward, and Harry was
reminded of Gringotts. With an unpleasant jolt of the heart, he remembered
the
dragons said to be guarding vaults in the wizards’ bank. If they met a dragon, a
fully-grown dragon — Norbert had been bad enough…. “Can you hear something?” Ron whispered.
Harry listened. A soft rustling and clinking seemed to be coming from up
ahead.
“Do you think it’s a ghost?”
“I don’t know…sounds like wings to me.”
“There’s light ahead — I can see something moving.”
They reached the end of the passageway and saw before them a
brilliantly lit chamber, its ceiling arching high above them. It was full of small,
jewel-bright birds, fluttering and tumbling all around the room. On the
opposite
side of the chamber was a heavy wooden door.
“Do you think they’ll attack us if we cross the room?” said Ron.
“Probably,” said Harry. “They don’t look very vicious, but I suppose if
they all swooped down at once…well, there’s no other choice…I’ll run.”
He took a deep breath, covered his face with his arms, and sprinted
across the room. He expected to feel sharp beaks and claws tearing at him any
second, but nothing happened. He reached the door untouched. He pulled the
handle, but it was locked.
The other two followed him. They tugged and heaved at the door, but it
wouldn’t budge, not even when Hermione tried her Alohomora charm.
“Now what?” said Ron.
“These birds…they can’t be here just for decoration,” said Hermione.
They watched the birds soaring overhead, glittering — glittering?
“They’re not birds!” Harry said suddenly. “They’re keys! Winged keys
— look carefully. So that must mean…” he looked around the chamber while
the
other two squinted up at the flock of keys. “…yes — look! Broomsticks! We’ve
got“tBouctatthchertehaerkeehyutnodtrheedsdooofrt!h”em!”
Ron examined the lock on the door.
“We’re looking for a big, old-fashioned one — probably silver, like the
handle.”
They each seized a broomstick and kicked off into the air, soaring into
the midst of the cloud of keys. They grabbed and snatched, but the bewitched
keyNs darted and dived so quickly it was almost impossible to catch one. ot for nothing, though, was Harry the youngest Seeker in a century. He
had a knack for spotting things other people didn’t. After a minute’s weaving
about through the whirl of rainbow feathers, he noticed a large silver key that
had a bent wing, as if it had already been caught and stuffed roughly into the
keyhole.
“That one!” he called to the others. “That big one — there — no, there
— with bright blue wings — the feathers are all crumpled on one side.”
Ron went speeding in the direction that Harry was pointing, crashed into
the ceiling, and nearly fell off his broom.
“We’ve got to close in on it!” Harry called, not taking his eyes off the key
with the damaged wing. “Ron, you come at it from above — Hermione, stay
below and stop it from going down and I’ll try and catch it. Right, NOW!”
Ron dived, Hermione rocketed upward, the key dodged them both, and
Harry streaked after it; it sped toward the wall, Harry leaned forward and with
a
nasty, crunching noise, pinned it against the stone with one hand. Ron and
Hermione’s cheers echoed around the high chamber.
They landed quickly, and Harry ran to the door, the key struggling in his
hand. He rammed it into the lock and turned – it worked. The moment the lock
had clicked open, the key took flight again, looking very battered now that it
had
been caught twice. “Ready?” Harry asked the other two, his hand on the door handle. They
nodded. He pulled the door open.
The next chamber was so dark they couldn’t see anything at all. But as
they stepped into it, light suddenly flooded the room to reveal an astonishing
sight.
They were standing on the edge of a huge chessboard, behind the black
chessmen, which were all taller than they were and carved from what looked
like
black stone. Facing them, way across the chamber, were the white pieces.
Harry,
Ron and Hermione shivered slightly – the towering white chessmen had no
faces.
“Now what do we do?” Harry whispered.
“It’s obvious, isn’t it?” said Ron. “We’ve got to play our way across the
room.”
Behind the white pieces they could see another door.
“How?” said Hermione nervously.
“I think,” said Ron, “we’re going to have to be chessmen.”
He walked up to a black knight and put his hand out to touch the knight’s
horse. At once, the stone sprang to life. The horse pawed the ground and the
knight turned his helmeted head to look down at Ron.
“Do we — er — have to join you to get across?” The black knight
nodded. Ron turned to the other two.
“This needs thinking about…” he said. “I suppose we’ve got to take the
place of three of the black pieces….”
Harry and Hermione stayed quiet, watching Ron think. Finally he said,
“Now, don’t be offended or anything, but neither of you are that good at chess —”
“We’re not offended,” said Harry quickly. “Just tell us what to do.”
“Well, Harry, you take the place of that bishop, and Hermione, you next
to him instead of that castle.”
“What about you?”
“I’m going to be a knight,” said Ron.
The chessmen seemed to have been listening, because at these words a
knight, a bishop, and a castle turned their backs on the white pieces and
walked
off the board, leaving three empty squares that Harry, Ron, and Hermione
took.
“White always plays first in chess,” said Ron, peering across the board.
“Yes…look…”
A white pawn had moved forward two squares.
Ron started to direct the black pieces. They moved silently wherever he
sent them. Harry’s knees were trembling. What if they lost?
“Harry — move diagonally four squares to the right.”
Their first real shock came when their other knight was taken. The white
queen smashed him to the floor and dragged him off the board, where he lay
quite still, facedown.
“Had to let that happen,” said Ron, looking shaken. “Leaves you free to
take that bishop, Hermione, go on.”
Every time one of their men was lost, the white pieces showed no mercy.
Soon there was a huddle of limp black players slumped along the wall. Twice,
Ron only just noticed in time that Harry and Hermione were in danger. He
himself darted around the board, taking almost as many white pieces as they
had
lost black ones. “We’re nearly there,” he muttered suddenly. “Let me think — let me
think…”
The white queen turned her blank face toward him.
“Yes…” said Ron softly, “It’s the only way…I’ve got to be taken.”
“NO!” Harry and Hermione shouted.
“That’s chess!” snapped Ron. “You’ve got to make some sacrifices! I
take one step forward and she’ll take me — that leaves you free to checkmate
the king, Harry!”
“But —”
“Do you want to stop Snape or not?”
“Ron —”
“Look, if you don’t hurry up, he’ll already have the Stone!”
There was no alternative.
“Ready?” Ron called, his face pale but determined. “Here I go — now,
don’t hang around once you’ve won.”
He stepped forward, and the white queen pounced. She struck Ron hard
across the head with her stone arm, and he crashed to the floor — Hermione
screamed but stayed on her square — the white queen dragged Ron to one
side.
He Slohoked as if he’d been knocked out. aking, Harry moved three spaces to the left.
The white king took off his crown and threw it at Harry’s feet. They had
won. The chessmen parted and bowed, leaving the door ahead clear. With one
last desperate look back at Ron, Harry and Hermione charged through the
door
and up the next passageway.
“What if he’s —?”
“He’ll be all right,” said Harry, trying to convince himself. “What do you
reckon’s next?”
“We’ve had Sprout’s, that was the Devil’s Snare; Flitwick must’ve put
charms on the keys; McGonagall transfigured the chessmen to make them
alive;
thatTlheeayvehsadQureirarcehlle’sdsapneolt
l,haenrddoSonra.pe’s.”
“All right?” Harry whispered.
“Go on.”
Harry pushed it open.
A disgusting smell filled their nostrils, making both of them pull their
robes up over their noses. Eyes watering, they saw, flat on the floor in front of
them, a troll even larger than the one they had tackled, out cold with a bloody
lump on its head.
“I’m glad we didn’t have to fight that one,” Harry whispered as they
stepped carefully over one of its massive legs. “Come on, I can’t breathe.”
He pulled open the next door, both of them hardly daring to look at what
came next - but there was nothing very frightening in here, just a table with
seven differently shaped bottles standing on it in a line.
“Snape’s,” said Harry. “What do we have to do?”
They stepped over the threshold, and immediately a fire sprang up behind
them in the doorway. It wasn’t ordinary fire either; it was purple. At the same
instant, black flames shot up in the doorway leading onward. They were
trap“pLeodo.k!” Hermione seized a roll of paper lying next to the bottles. Harry
looked over her shoulder to read it:
Danger lies before you, while safety lies behind,
Two of us will help you, which ever you would find,
One among us seven will let you move ahead,
Another will transport the drinker back instead,
Two among our number hold only nettle wine,
Three of us are killers, waiting bidden in line.
Choose, unless you wish to stay here forevermore,
To help you in your choice, we give you these clues four:
First, however slyly the poison tries to hide
You will always find some on nettle wine’s left side;
Second, different are those who stand at either end,
But if you would move onward, neither is your friend;
Third, as you see clearly, all are different size,
Neither dwarf nor giant holds death in their insides;
Fourth, the second left and the second on the right
Are twins once you taste them, though different at first sight.
Hermione let out a great sigh and Harry, amazed, saw that she was smiling,
the very last thing he felt like doing.
“Brilliant,” said Hermione. “This isn’t magic — it’s logic — a puzzle. A
lot of the greatest wizards haven’t got an ounce of logic, they’d be stuck in
here
forever.” “But so will we, won’t we?”
“Of course not,” said Hermione. “Everything we need is here on this
paper. Seven bottles: three are poison; two are wine; one will get us safely
through the black fire, and one will get us back through the purple.”
“But how do we know which to drink?”
“Give me a minute.”
Hermione read the paper several times. Then she walked up and down
the line of bottles, muttering to herself and pointing at them. At last, she
clapped
her“hGaontdist.,” she said. “The smallest bottle will get us through the black
fire — toward the Stone.”
Harry looked at the tiny bottle.
“There’s only enough there for one of us,” he said. “That’s hardly one
swallow.”
They looked at each other.
“Which one will get you back through the purple flames?”
Hermione pointed at a rounded bottle at the right end of the line.
“You drink that,” said Harry. “No, listen, get back and get Ron. Grab
brooms from the flying-key room, they’ll get you out of the trapdoor and past
Fluffy — go straight to the owlery and send Hedwig to Dumbledore, we need
him. I might be able to hold Snape off for a while, but I’m no match for him,
really.”
“But Harry — what if You-Know-Who’s with him?”
“Well — I was lucky once, wasn’t I?” said Harry, pointing at his scar. “I
might get lucky again.”
Hermione’s lip trembled, and she suddenly dashed at Harry and threw her
arms around him.
“Hermione!”
“Harry — you’re a great wizard, you know.”
“I’m not as good as you,” said Harry, very embarrassed, as she let go of
him.
“Me!” said Hermione. “Books! And cleverness! There are more
important things — friendship and bravery and — oh Harry — be careful!”
“You drink first,” said Harry. “You are sure which is which, aren’t you?”
“Positive,” said Hermione. She took a long drink from the round bottle at
the end, and shuddered.
“It’s not poison?” said Harry anxiously.
“No — but it’s like ice.”
“Quick, go, before it wears off.”
“Good luck — take care.”
“GO!”
Hermione turned and walked straight through the purple fire.
Harry took a deep breath and picked up the smallest bottle. He turned to
face the black flames.
“Here I come,” he said, and he drained the little bottle in one gulp.
It was indeed as though ice was flooding his body. He put the bottle
down and walked forward; he braced himself, saw the black flames licking his
body, but couldn’t feel them — for a moment he could see nothing but dark fire — then he was on the other side, in the last chamber.
There was already someone there — but it wasn’t Snape. It wasn’t even
Voldemort.
HP 1 - Harry Potter and the
Sorcerer's Stone
CHAPTER SEVENTEEN
THE MAN WITH TWO FACES
I t was Quirrell.
“You!” gasped Harry.
Quirrell smiled. His face wasn’t twitching at all.
“Me,” he said calmly. “I wondered whether I’d be meeting you here,
Potter.”
“But I thought — Snape —”
“Severus?” Quirrell laughed, and it wasn’t his usual quivering treble, either, but cold and sharp. “Yes, Severus does seem the type, doesn’t he? So
useful to have him swooping around like an overgrown bat. Next to him, who
would suspect p-p-poor, st-stuttering P-Professor Quirrell?”
Harry couldn’t take it in. This couldn’t be true, it couldn’t.
“But Snape tried to kill me!”
“No, no, no. I tried to kill you. Your friend Miss Granger accidentally
knocked me over as she rushed to set fire to Snape at that Quidditch match.
She
broke my eye contact with you. Another few seconds and I’d have got you off
that broom. I’d have managed it before then if Snape hadn’t been muttering a
countercurse, trying to save you.” “Snape was trying to save me?”
“Of course,” said Quirrell coolly. “Why do you think he wanted to
referee your next match? He was trying to make sure I didn’t do it again.
Funny,
really…he needn’t have bothered. I couldn’t do anything with Dumbledore
watching. All the other teachers thought Snape was trying to stop Gryffindor
from winning, he did make himself unpopular…and what a waste of time, when
afteQruai
lrlrtehlal ts,nIa’mppgeodinhgistfoinkgilelryso. uRotopneisgshpt.r”ang out of thin air and wrapped
themselves tightly around Harry.
“You’re too nosy to live, Potter. Scurrying around the school on
Halloween like that, for all I knew you’d seen me coming to look at what was
guarding the Stone.”
“You let the troll in?”
“Certainly. I have a special gift with trolls — you must have seen what I
did to the one in the chamber back there? Unfortunately, while everyone else
was running around looking for it, Snape, who already suspected me, went
straight to the third floor to head me off — and not only did my troll fail to beat
you to death, that three-headed dog didn’t even manage to bite Snape’s leg off
properly.
“Now, wait quietly, Potter. I need to examine this interesting mirror.”
It was only then that Harry realized what was standing behind Quirrell. It
was the Mirror of Erised.
“This mirror is the key to finding the Stone,” Quirrell murmured, tapping
his way around the frame. “Trust Dumbledore to come up with something like
this…but he’s in London…I’ll be far away by the time he gets back…”
All Harry could think of doing was to keep Quirrell talking and stop him
from concentrating on the mirror.
“I saw you and Snape in the forest —” he blurted out.
“Yes,” said Quirrell idly, walking around the mirror to look at the back.
“He was on to me by that time, trying to find out how far I’d got. He suspected
me all along. Tried to frighten me — as though he could, when I had Lord
Voldemort on my side….”
Quirrell came back out from behind the mirror and stared hungrily into it.
“I see the Stone…I’m presenting it to my master…but where is it?”
Harry struggled against the ropes binding him, but they didn’t give. He
had to keep Quirrell from giving his whole attention to the mirror.
“But Snape always seemed to hate me so much.”
“Oh, he does,” said Quirrell casually, “heavens, yes. He was at Hogwarts
with your father, didn’t you know? They loathed each other. But he never
wanted you dead.”
“But I heard you a few days ago, sobbing — I thought Snape was
threatening you.…”
For the first time, a spasm of fear flitted across Quirrell’s face.
“Sometimes,” he said, “I find it hard to follow my master’s instructions
— he is a great wizard and I am weak —”
“You mean he was there in the classroom with you?” Harry gasped.
“He is with me wherever I go,” said Quirrell quietly. “I met him when I
traveled around the world. A foolish young man I was then, full of ridiculous
ideas about good and evil. Lord Voldemort showed me how wrong I was. There
is no good and evil, there is only power, and those too weak to seek it…Since
then, I have served him faithfully, although I have let him down many times.
He
has had to be very hard on me.” Quirrell shivered suddenly. “He does not
forgive
mistakes easily. When I failed to steal the stone from Gringotts, he was most
displeased. He punished me…decided he would have to keep a closer watch on
me.…”
Quirrell’s voice trailed away. Harry was remembering his trip to Diagon
Alley — how could he have been so stupid? He’d seen Quirrell there that very
day, shaken hands with him in the Leaky Cauldron.
Quirrell cursed under his breath.
“I don’t understand…is the Stone inside the mirror? Should I break it?”
Harry’s mind was racing. What I want more than anything else in the world at the moment, he
thought, is to find the Stone before Quirrell does. So if I look in the mirror, I
should see myself finding it — which means I’ll see where it’s hidden! But how
can I look without Quirrell realizing what I’m up to?
He tried to edge to the left, to get in front of the glass without Quirrell
noticing, but the ropes around his ankles were too tight: he tripped and fell
over.
Qui“rrWehllaignored him. He was still talking to himself. t does this mirror do? How does it work? Help me, Master!”
And to Harry’s horror, a voice answered, and the voice seemed to come
from Quirrell himself.
“Use the boy…Use the boy.…”
Quirrell rounded on Harry.
“Yes — Potter — come here.”
He clapped his hands once, and the ropes binding Harry fell off. Harry
got slowly to his feet.
“Come here,” Quirrell repeated. “Look in the mirror and tell me what
you see.”
Harry walked toward him.
I must lie, he thought desperately. I must look and lie about what I see,
that’s all.
Quirrell moved close behind him. Harry breathed in the funny smell that
seemed to come from Quirrell’s turban. He closed his eyes, stepped in front of
the mirror, and opened them again.
He saw his reflection, pale and scared-looking at first. But a moment
later, the reflection smiled at him. It put its hand into its pocket and pulled out
a
blood-red stone. It winked and put the Stone back in its pocket — and as it did
so, Harry felt something heavy drop into his real pocket. Somehow —
incredibly — he’d gotten the Stone.
“Well?” said Quirrell impatiently. “What do you see?”
Harry screwed up his courage.
“I see myself shaking hands with Dumbledore,” he invented. “I — I’ve
won the house cup for Gryffindor.”
Quirrell cursed again.
“Get out of the way,” he said. As Harry moved aside, he felt the
Sorcerer’s Stone against his leg. Dare he make a break for it?
But he hadn’t walked five paces before a high voice spoke, though
Quirrell wasn’t moving his lips.
“He lies…He lies.…”
“Potter, come back here!” Quirrell shouted. “Tell me the truth! What did
you just see?”
The high voice spoke again.
“Let me speak to him…face-to-face…”
“Master, you are not strong enough!”
“I have strength enough…for this…”
Harry felt as if Devil’s Snare was rooting him to the spot. He couldn’t
move a muscle. Petrified, he watched as Quirrell reached up and began to
unwrap his turban. What was going on? The turban fell away. Quirrell’s head
looked strangely small without it. Then he turned slowly on the spot.
Harry would have screamed, but he couldn’t make a sound. Where there
should have been a back to Quirrell’s head, there was a face, the most terrible
face Harry had ever seen. It was chalk white with glaring red eyes and slits for
nostrils, like a snake.
“Harry Potter…” it whispered.
Harry tried to take a step backward but his legs wouldn’t move.
“See what I have become?” the face said. “Mere shadow and vapor….I
have form only when I can share another’s body…but there have always been
those willing to let me into their hearts and minds…Unicorn blood has
strengthened me, these past weeks…you saw faithful Quirrell drinking it for
me
in the forest…and once I have the Elixir of Life, I will be able to create a body
of my own….Now…why don’t you give me that Stone in your pocket?” So he knew. The feeling suddenly surged back into Harry’s legs. He
stumbled backward.
“Don’t be a fool,” snarled the face. “Better save your own life and join
me…or you’ll meet the same end as your parents…They died begging me for
mercy…”
“LIAR!” Harry shouted suddenly.
Quirrell was walking backward at him, so that Voldemort could still see
him. The evil face was now smiling.
“How touching…” it hissed. “I always value bravery….Yes, boy, your
parents were brave…I killed your father first; and he put up a courageous
fight…but your mother needn’t have died…she was trying to protect you…Now
give me the Stone, unless you want her to have died in vain.”
“NEVER!”
Harry sprang toward the flame door, but Voldemort screamed “SEIZE
HIM!” and the next second, Harry felt Quirrell’s hand close on his wrist. At
once, a needle-sharp pain seared across Harry’s scar; his head felt as though it
was about to split in two; he yelled, struggling with all his might, and to his
surprise, Quirrell let go of him. The pain in his head lessened — he looked
around wildly to see where Quirrell had gone, and saw him hunched in pain,
looking at his fingers — they were blistering before his eyes.
“Seize him! SEIZE HIM!” shrieked Voldemort again, and Quirrell
lunged, knocking Harry clean off his feet landing on top of him, both hands
around Harry’s neck — Harry’s scar was almost blinding him with pain, yet he
could see Quirrell howling in agony.
“Master, I cannot hold him — my hands — my hands!”
And Quirrell, though pinning Harry to the ground with his knees, let go
of his neck and stared, bewildered, at his own palms — Harry could see they
looked burned, raw, red, and shiny.
“Then kill him, fool, and be done!” screeched Voldemort.
Quirrell raised his hand to perform a deadly curse, but Harry, by instinct,
reached up and grabbed Quirrell’s face —
“AAAARGH!”
Quirrell rolled off him, his face blistering, too, and then Harry knew:
Quirrell couldn’t touch his bare skin, not without suffering terrible pain — his
only chance was to keep hold of Quirrell, keep him in enough pain to stop him
from doing a curse.
Harry jumped to his feet, caught Quirrell by the arm, and hung on as tight
as he could. Quirrell screamed and tried to throw Harry off — the pain in
Harry’s head was building — he couldn’t see — he could only hear Quirrell’s
terrible shrieks and Voldemort’s yells of, “KILL HIM! KILL HIM!” and other
voices, maybe in Harry’s own head, crying, “Harry! Harry!”
He felt Quirrell’s arm wrenched from his grasp, knew all was lost, and
fell into blackness, down…down… down….
Something gold was glinting just above him. The Snitch! He tried to catch
butiht,is arms were too heavy.
He blinked. It wasn’t the Snitch at all. It was a pair of glasses. How
strange.
He blinked again. The smiling face of Albus Dumbledore swam into
view above him.
“Good afternoon, Harry,” said Dumbledore.
Harry stared at him. Then he remembered: “Sir! The Stone! It was
Quirrell! He’s got the Stone! Sir, quick —”
“Calm yourself, dear boy, you are a little behind the times,” said
Dumbledore. “Quirrell does not have the Stone.”
“Then who does? Sir, I —”
“Harry, please relax, or Madam Pomfrey will have me thrown out.”
Harry swallowed and looked around him. He realized he must be in the
hospital wing. He was lying in a bed with white linen sheets, and next to him
was a table piled high with what looked like half the candy shop.
“Tokens from your friends and admirers,” said Dumbledore, beaming.
“What happened down in the dungeons between you and Professor Quirrell is a
complete secret, so, naturally, the whole school knows. I believe your friends
Misters Fred and George Weasley were responsible for trying to send you a
toilet
seat. No doubt they thought it would amuse you. Madam Pomfrey, however,
felt“How long have I been in here?”
it m“iTghrteneodt abyesv. eMryr.hRyognieanldicW, aenadslceoynafnisdcaMteisdsitG.”ranger will be most
relieved you have come round, they have been extremely worried.”
“But sir, the Stone —”
“I see you are not to be distracted. Very well, the Stone. Professor
Quirrell did not manage to take it from you. I arrived in time to prevent that,
although you were doing very well on your own, I must say.”
“You got there? You got Hermione’s owl?”
“We must have crossed in midair. No sooner had I reached London than
it became clear to me that the place I should be was the one I had just left. I
arrived just in time to pull Quirrell off you.”
“It was you.”
“I feared I might be too late.”
“You nearly were, I couldn’t have kept him off the Stone much longer –”
“Not the Stone, boy, you — the effort involved nearly killed you. For one
terrible moment there, I was afraid it had. As for the Stone, it has been
destroyed.”
“Destroyed?” said Harry blankly. “But your friend — Nicolas Flamel —”
“Oh, you know about Nicolas?” said Dumbledore, sounding quite
delighted. “You did do the thing properly, didn’t you? Well, Nicolas and I have
had a little chat, and agreed it’s all for the best.”
“But that means he and his wife will die, won’t they?”
“They have enough Elixir stored to set their affairs in order and then, yes,
they will die.”
Dumbledore smiled at the look of amazement on Harry’s face.
“To one as young as you, I’m sure it seems incredible, but to Nicolas and
Perenelle, it really is like going to bed after a very, very long day. After all, to
the
well-organized mind, death is but the next great adventure. You know, the
Stone
was really not such a wonderful thing. As much money and life as you could
want! The two things most human beings would choose above all — the trouble
is, humans do have a knack of choosing precisely those things that are worst
for
them.”
Harry lay there, lost for words. Dumbledore hummed a little and smiled
at the ceiling.
“Sir?” said Harry. “I’ve been thinking…sir — even if the Stone’s gone,
Vol-, I mean, You-Know-Who —”
“Call him Voldemort, Harry. Always use the proper name for things. Fear
of a name increases fear of the thing itself.”
“Yes, sir. Well, Voldemort’s going to try other ways of coming back, isn’t
he? I mean, he hasn’t gone, has he?”
“No, Harry, he has not. He is still out there somewhere, perhaps looking
for another body to share…not being truly alive, he cannot be killed. He left
Quirrell to die; he shows just as little mercy to his followers as his enemies.
Nevertheless, Harry, while you may only have delayed his return to power, it
will merely take someone else who is prepared to fight what seems a losing
battle next time — and if he is delayed again, and again, why, he may never
return to power.”
Harry nodded, but stopped quickly, because it made his head hurt. Then
he said, “Sir, there are some other things I’d like to know, if you can tell me…
things I want to know the truth about.…” “The truth.” Dumbledore sighed. “It is a beautiful and terrible thing, and
should therefore be treated with great caution. However, I shall answer your
questions unless I have a very good reason not to, in which case I beg you’ll
forgive me. I shall not, of course, lie.”
“Well…Voldemort said that he only killed my mother because she tried
to stop him from killing me. But why would he want to kill me in the first
place?”
Dumbledore sighed very deeply this time.
“Alas, the first thing you ask me, I cannot tell you. Not today. Not now.
You will know, one day…put it from your mind for now, Harry. When you are
older…I know you hate to hear this…when you are ready, you will know.”
And Harry knew it would be no good to argue.
“But why couldn’t Quirrell touch me?”
und“Your mother died to save you. If there is one thing Voldemort cannot erstand, it is love. He didn’t realize that love as powerful as your mother’s
for you leaves its own mark. Not a scar, no visible sign…to have been loved so
deeply, even though the person who loved us is gone, will give us some
protection forever. It is in your very skin. Quirrell, full of hatred, greed, and
ambition, sharing his soul with Voldemort, could not touch you for this reason.
It
was agony to touch a person marked by something so good.” Dumbledore now became very interested in a bird out on the windowsill,
which gave Harry time to dry his eyes on the sheet. When he had found his
voice
again, Harry said, “And the invisibility cloak — do you know who sent it to
me?”“Ah — your father happened to leave it in my possession, and I thought
you might like it.” Dumbledore’s eyes twinkled. “Useful things…your father
used it mainly for sneaking off to the kitchens to steal food when he was here.”
“And there’s something else…”
“Fire away.”
“Quirrell said Snape —”
“Professor Snape, Harry.”
“Yes, him — Quirrell said he hates me because he hated my father. Is that
true?”
“Well, they did rather detest each other. Not unlike yourself and Mr.
Malfoy. And then, your father did something Snape could never forgive.”
“What?”
“He saved his life.”
“What?”
“Yes…” said Dumbledore dreamily. “Funny, the way people’s minds
work, isn’t it? Professor Snape couldn’t bear being in your father’s debt…I do
believe he worked so hard to protect you this year because he felt that would
make him and your father even. Then he could go back to hating your father’s
memory in peace.…”
Harry tried to understand this but it made his head pound, so he stopped.
“And sir, there’s one more thing…”
“Just the one?”
“How did I get the Stone out of the mirror?”
“Ah, now, I’m glad you asked me that. It was one of my more brilliant
ideas, and between you and me, that’s saying something. You see, only one
who
wanted to find the Stone — find it, but not use it — would be able to get it,
otherwise they’d just see themselves making gold or drinking Elixir of Life. My
brain surprises even me sometimes…Now, enough questions. I suggest you
make a start on these sweets. Ah! Bettie Bott’s Every Flavor Beans! I was
unfortunate enough in my youth to come across a vomit flavored one, and since
then I’m afraid I’ve rather lost my liking for them — but I think I’ll be safe with
a nice toffee, don’t you?”
He smiled and popped the golden-brown bean into his mouth. Then he
choked and said, “Alas! Ear wax!”
Madam Pomfrey, the nurse, was a nice woman, but very strict.
“Just five minutes,” Harry pleaded.
“Absolutely not.”
“You let Professor Dumbledore in….”
“Well, of course, that was the headmaster, quite different. You need rest.”
“I am resting, look, lying down and everything. Oh, go on, Madam
Pomfrey…”
“Oh, very well,” she said. “But five minutes only.”
And she let Ron and Hermione in.
“Harry!”
Hermione looked ready to fling her arms around him again, but Harry
was glad she held herself in as his head was still very sore.
“Oh, Harry, we were sure you were going to — Dumbledore was so
worried —”
“The whole school’s talking about it,” said Ron. “What really
happened?”
It was one of those rare occasions when the true story is even more
strange and exciting than the wild rumors. Harry told them everything:
Quirrell;
the mirror; the Stone; and Voldemort. Ron and Hermione were a very good
audience; they gasped in all the right places, and when Harry told them what
was
under Quirrell’s turban, Hermione screamed out loud.
“So the Stone’s gone?” said Ron finally. “Flamel’s just going to die?”
“That’s what I said, but Dumbledore thinks that — what was it? — ‘to
the well-organized mind, death is but the next great adventure.’”
“I always said he was off his rocker,” said Ron, looking quite impressed
at how crazy his hero was.
“So what happened to you two?” said Harry.
“Well, I got back all right,” said Hermione. “I brought Ron round — that
took a while — and we were dashing up to the owlery to contact Dumbledore
when we met him in the entrance hall — he already knew — he just said,
‘Harry’s gone after him, hasn’t he?’ and hurtled off to the third floor.”
“D’you think he meant you to do it?” said Ron. “Sending you your
father’s cloak and everything?”
“Well, ” Hermione exploded, “if he did — I mean to say that’s terrible —
you could have been killed.”
“No, it isn’t,” said Harry thoughtfully. “He’s a funny man, Dumbledore. I
think he sort of wanted to give me a chance. I think he knows more or less
everything that goes on here, you know. I reckon he had a pretty good idea we
were going to try, and instead of stopping us, he just taught us enough to help.
I
don’t think it was an accident he let me find out how the mirror worked. It’s
almost like he thought I had the right to face Voldemort if I could….”
“Yeah, Dumbledore’s off his rocker, all right,” said Ron proudly. “Listen,
you’ve got to be up for the end-of-year feast tomorrow. The points are all in
and
Slytherin won, of course — you missed the last Quidditch match, we were
steaAmrollered by Ravenclaw without you — but the food’ll be good.” t that moment, Madam Pomfrey bustled over.
“You’ve had nearly fifteen minutes, now OUT” she said firmly.
After a good night’s sleep, Harry felt nearly back to normal.
I want to go to the feast,” he told Madam Pomfrey as she straightened his
many candy boxes. I can, can’t I?”
“Professor Dumbledore says you are to be allowed to go,” she said
stiffly, as though in her opinion Professor Dumbledore didn’t realize how risky
feasts could be. “And you have another visitor.”
“Oh, good,” said Harry. “Who is it?”
Hagrid sidled through the door as he spoke. As usual when he was
indoors, Hagrid looked too big to be allowed. He sat down next to Harry, took
one look at him, and burst into tears.
“It’s — all — my — ruddy — fault!” he sobbed, his face in his hands. I
told the evil git how ter get past Fluffy! I told him! It was the only thing he
didn’t know, an’ I told him! Yeh could’ve died! All fer a dragon egg! I’ll never
drink again! I should be chucked out an’ made ter live as a Muggle!”
“Hagrid!” said Harry, shocked to see Hagrid shaking with grief and
remorse, great tears leaking down into his beard. “Hagrid, he’d have found out
somehow, this is Voldemort we’re talking about, he’d have found out even if
you
had“nY’tehtocldouhlidm’v.”e died!” sobbed Hagrid. “An’ don’ say the name!”
“VOLDEMORT!” Harry bellowed, and Hagrid was so shocked, he
stopped crying. “I’ve met him and I’m calling him by his name. Please cheer
up,
Hagrid, we saved the Stone, it’s gone, he can’t use it. Have a Chocolate Frog,
I’ve got loads.…”
Hagrid wiped his nose on the back of his hand and said, “That reminds
me. I’ve got yeh a present.”
“It’s not a stoat sandwich, is it?” said Harry anxiously, and at last Hagrid
gave a weak chuckle.
“Nah. Dumbledore gave me the day off yesterday ter fix it. ‘course, he
shoulda sacked me instead — anyway, got yeh this.…”
It seemed to be a handsome, leather-covered book. Harry opened it
curiously. It was full of wizard photographs. Smiling and waving at him from
every page were his mother and father.
“Sent owls off ter all yer parents’ old school friends, askin’ fer photos…
knew yeh didn’ have any…d’yeh like it?”
Harry couldn’t speak, but Hagrid understood.
Harry made his way down to the end-of-year feast alone that night. He had
been held up by Madam Pomfrey’s fussing about, insisting on giving him one
last checkup, so the Great Hall was already full. It was decked out in the
Slytherin colors of green and silver to celebrate Slytherin’s winning the house
cup for the seventh year in a row. A huge banner showing the Slytherin
serpent
covered the wall behind the High Table. When Harry walked in there was a sudden hush, and then everybody
started talking loudly at once. He slipped into a seat between Ron and
Hermione
at the Gryffindor table and tried to ignore the fact that people were standing
up
to look at him.
Fortunately, Dumbledore arrived moments later. The babble died away.
“Another year gone!” Dumbledore said cheerfully. “And I must trouble
you with an old man’s wheezing waffle before we sink our teeth into our
delicious feast. What a year it has been! Hopefully your heads are all a little
fuller than they were…you have the whole summer ahead to get them nice and
empty before next year starts.…
“Now, as I understand it, the house cup here needs awarding, and the
points stand thus: In fourth place, Gryffindor, with three hundred and twelve
points; in third, Hufflepuff, with three hundred and fifty-two; Ravenclaw has
four hundred and twenty-six and Slytherin, four hundred and seventy-two.”
A storm of cheering and stamping broke out from the Slytherin table.
Harry could see Draco Malfoy banging his goblet on the table. It was a
sickening
sight. “Yes, Yes, well done, Slytherin,” said Dumbledore. “However, recent
events must be taken into account.”
The room went very still. The Slytherins’ smiles faded a little.
“Ahem,” said Dumbledore. “I have a few last-minute points to dish out.
Let me see. Yes…
“First — to Mr. Ronald Weasley…”
Ron went purple in the face; he looked like a radish with a bad sunburn.
“…for the best-played game of chess Hogwarts has seen in many years, I
award Gryffindor house fifty points.”
Gryffindor cheers nearly raised the bewitched ceiling; the stars overhead
seemed to quiver. Percy could be heard telling the other prefects, “My brother,
you know! My youngest brother! Got past McGonagall’s giant chess set!”
At last there was silence again.
“Second — to Miss Hermione Granger…for the use of cool logic in the
face of fire, I award Gryffindor house fifty points.”
Hermione buried her face in her arms; Harry strongly suspected she had
burst into tears. Gryffindors up and down the table were beside themselves —
they were a hundred points up.
“Third — to Mr. Harry Potter…” said Dumbledore. The room went
deadly quiet. “…for pure nerve and outstanding courage, I award Gryffindor
house sixty points.”
The din was deafening. Those who could add up while yelling
themselves hoarse knew that Gryffindor now had four hundred and seventytwo
points — exactly the same as Slytherin. They had tied for the house cup — if
onlyDDumbledore had given Harry just one more point. umbledore raised his hand. The room gradually fell silent.
“There are all kinds of courage,” said Dumbledore, smiling. “It takes a
great deal of bravery to stand up to our enemies, but just as much to stand up
to
ourSfroimenedosn.eIstthaenrdeifnogreoauwtsaidrde tthene GporienattsHtoalMl mr.igNhetvwilleellLhoanvgebtohttooumgh.”t some
sort of explosion had taken place, so loud was the noise that erupted from the
Gryffindor table. Harry, Ron, and Hermione stood up to yell and cheer as
Neville, white with shock, disappeared under a pile of people hugging him. He
had never won so much as a point for Gryffindor before. Harry, still cheering,
nudged Ron in the ribs and pointed at Malfoy, who couldn’t have looked more
stunned and horrified if he’d just had the Body-Bind Curse put on him.
“Which means,” Dumbledore called over the storm of applause, for even
Ravenclaw and Hufflepuff were celebrating the downfall of Slytherin, “we need
a little change of decoration.”
He clapped his hands. In an instant, the green hangings became scarlet
and the silver became gold; the huge Slytherin serpent vanished and a
towering
Gryffindor lion took its place. Snape was shaking Professor McGonagall’s hand,
with a horrible, forced smile. He caught Harry’s eye and Harry knew at once
that
Snape’s feelings toward him hadn’t changed one jot. This didn’t worry Harry. It
seemed as though life would be back to normal next year, or as normal as it
ever
was at Hogwarts.
It was the best evening of Harry’s life, better than winning at Quidditch,
or Christmas, or knocking out mountain trolls…he would never, ever forget
tonight.
Harry had almost forgotten that the exam results were still to come, but
theycodmide. To their great surprise, both he and Ron passed with good marks;
Hermione, of course, had the best grades of the first years. Even Neville
scraped
through, his good Herbology mark making up for his abysmal Potions one.
They
had hoped that Goyle, who was almost as stupid as he was mean, might be
thrown out, but he had passed, too. It was a shame, but as Ron said, you
couldn’t
have everything in life.
And suddenly, their wardrobes were empty, their trunks were packed,
Neville’s toad was found lurking in a corner of the toilets; notes were handed
out
to all students, warning them not to use magic over the holidays (“I always
hope
they’ll forget to give us these,” said Fred Weasley sadly); Hagrid was there to
take them down to the fleet of boats that sailed across the lake; they were
boarding the Hogwarts Express; talking and laughing as the countryside
became
greener and tidier; eating Bettie Bott’s Every Flavor Beans as they sped past
Muggle towns; pulling off their wizard robes and putting on jackets and coats;
It took quite a while for them all to get off the platform. A wizened old
pgulalrindgwinastoupplabtyfotrhme tnicinkeetabnadrtrhierre,el-eqtutianrgtetrhseamt Kgointgh’sroCurgohssthSetagtaioten.in twos
and
threes so they didn’t attract attention by all bursting out of a solid wall at once
and alarming the Muggles.
“You must come and stay this summer,” said Ron, “both of you — I’ll
send you an owl.”
“Thanks,” said Harry, “I’ll need something to look forward to.” People
jostled them as they moved forward toward the gateway back to the Muggle
world. Some of them called:
“Bye, Harry!”
“See you, Potter!”
“Still famous,” said Ron, grinning at him.
“Not where I’m going, I promise you,” said Harry.
He, Ron, and Hermione passed through the gateway together. “There he
is, Mom, there he is, look!”
It was Ginny Weasley, Ron’s younger sister, but she wasn’t pointing at
Ron.
“Harry Potter!” she squealed. “Look, Mom! I can see —”
“Be quiet, Ginny, and it’s rude to point.” Mrs. Weasley smiled down at them.
“Busy year?” she said.
“Very,” said Harry. “Thanks for the fudge and the sweater, Mrs.
Weasley.”
“Oh, it was nothing, dear.”
“Ready, are you?”
It was Uncle Vernon, still purple-faced, still mustached, still looking
furious at the nerve of Harry, carrying an owl in a cage in a station full of
ordinary people. Behind him stood Aunt Petunia and Dudley, looking terrified
at
the“vYeoruy smiguhst of Harry. t be Harry’s family!” said Mrs. Weasley.
“In a manner of speaking,” said Uncle Vernon. “Hurry up, boy, we
haven’t got all day.” He walked away.
Harry hung back for a last word with Ron and Hermione.
“See you over the summer, then.”
“Hope you have — er — a good holiday,” said Hermione, looking
uncertainly after Uncle Vernon, shocked that anyone could be so unpleasant.
“Oh, I will,” said Harry, and they were surprised at the grin that was
spreading over his face. “They don’t know we’re not allowed to use magic at
home. I’m going to have a lot of fun with Dudley this summer.…
